

A 

TRUE RELATION 

OF THE 

HOLY WAft, 

MADE BY 

KING SHADDAI 

UPON 

DIABOLUS, 

TOR THE 

REGAINING OF THE METROPOLIS OF THE WORLD » 
OR, THE LOSING AND TAKING AGAIN OF THE 

TOWN OF MANSOUL. 

By JOHN BUNUN. 



A NEW EDITION, 

ILLUSTRATED BY THE AUTHOR'S OWN^REFERENCES, 

and embellisher vr..J>t 

SIX BEAUTIFUL ENGRAVING*. 
BUNGAY : 

JMUNTED AND PUBLISHED BY BRIGHTLY AND tQ, 



■oR** 






; 



Mr. BUNYAJSTS ADVERTISEMENT 
TO THE READER. 



Some say the Pilgrim's Progress is not mine, 
Insinuating as if I would shine 
In name and fame by the "worth of another, 
Like some made rich by robbing of their brother; 
Or that so fond I am of being sire, 
I '11 father bastards ; or, if need require, 
I '11 tell a lie in print to get applause : 
I scorn it ; John such dirt-heap never was 
Siuce God converted him. Let this suffice 
To shew why 1 my Pilgrim patronize. 

It came from mine own heart, so to my head, 
And thence into my fingers trickled ; 
Then to my pen, from whence immediately 
On paper I did dribble it daintily. 

Manner and matter too were all mine own. 
Nor was it unto any mortal known, 
Till 1 had done it. Nor did any then, 
By books, by wits, by tongues, or hand or pea, 
Add five words to it, or write half a line ; 
Therefore the whole, and every whit is mine. 

Also for this thine eye is now upon, 
The matter in this manner came from none 
But the same heart, and head, fingers, and pei^ 
As did the others. Witness all good men ; 
For none in all the world, without a lie, 
Can say that this is mine, excepting I. 

I write not this of any ostentation, 
Nor 'cause I seek of men their commendation $ 
I do it to keep them from such surmise, 
As tempt them will my name to scandalize .• 
Witness my name, if anagram 'd to thee, 
The letters ma-ke, Nu liony in aB. 

JOILN BUN\aN 



ADDRESS, 



TIS strange to me, that they that lore to tell 
Things done of old, yea, and that do excel 
Their equals in Historiology, 
Speak not of MansouPs wars, but let them lie 
Dead like old fables, or such worthless things, 
That to the reader no advantage brings ; 
When men, like them, make what they will their own, 
Till they know this are to themselves unknown. 

Of stories I well know there's divers sorts, 
Some foreign, some domestic ; and reports 
Are thereof made, as fancy leads the writers ; 
(By books a man may guess at the inditers.) 

Some will again of that which never was, 
Nor will be, feign (and that without a cause) 
Such matter, raise such mountains, tell such things 
Of men, of laws, of countries and of kings ; 
.And in their story seem to be so sage, 
And with such gravity clothe every page, 
That though their frontispiece says all is vain, 
Yet to their way disciples they obtain. 

But, readers, I have somewhat else to do, 
Than with vain stories thus to trouble you ; 
What here I say some men do know so well, 
They can with tears of joy the story tell. 

The town of Mansoul is well known to many, 
Nor are h*r troubles doubted of by any 
That are acquainted with those histories 
That Mansoul and her wars anatomize. 

Then lend thine ear to what I do relate 
Touching the town of Mansoul, and her state ; 
How she was lost, took captive, made a slave ; 
And how against him set. that should her save j 



ADDRESS. 

Yea, how by hostile ways she did oppose 

Her Lord, and with his enemy did close; 

For they are true, he that will them deny, 

Must needs the best of records vilify. 

For my part, I myself was in the town, 

Both when 't was set up, and when pulling down s 

I saw Diabolus in its possession, 

And Mansoul also under his oppression. 

Yea, I was there when she own'd him for lord, 

And to him did submit with one accord. 

When Mansoul trampled upon things divine; 
And wallowed in filth as doth a swine : 
When she betook herself unto her arms, 
Fought her Emanuel and despised his charms ; 
Then I was there, and sorely griev'd to see 
Diabolus and Mansoul so agree. 

Let no man, then, count me a fable-maker, 
Nor make my name or credit a partaker 
Of their dciision ; what is here in view, 
Of mine own knowledge I dare say is true. 

I saw the Prince's armed men come down 
By troops, by thousands to besiege the town ; 
I saw the captains, heard the trumpets sound, 
And how his forces cover'd all the ground: 
Yea, how they set themselves in battle 'ray, 
1 shall remember to my dying day. 

I saw the colours waving in the wind, 
And they within to mischief how corabinM 
To ruin Mansoul, and to take away 
Her Prirnum Mobile without delay. 
I saw the mounts cast up against the town, 
And how the slings were plac'd to beat it down. 
I heard the stones fly whizzing by my ears ; 
(What's longer kept in mind, than got in fears ?) 
I heard them fall, and saw what work they made, 
And how old Mors did cover with his shade 
The face of Mansoul, and I heard her cry, 
Woe worth the day, " in dying I shall die I" 



Vi ADDRESS 

I saw the battering-rams, and how they pky'd 
To beat up Ear-gate : and I Avas afraid, 
Not only Ear-gate, but the very town 
Would by these battering-rams be beaten down. 
I saw the fights, and heard the captains shout, 
And in each battle saw who fac'd about : 
I saw who wounded were, and who were, slain, 
And who, when dead, would come to life again. 
I heard the cries of those that wounded were, 
(While others fought like men bereft of fear ;) 
And while the cry, Kill, kill was in mine ears, 
The gutters ran not so with blood as tears. 

Indeed the captains did not always fight, 
But when they would molest us day and night ; 
They cry, Up, fall on, let us take the town, 
Keep us from sleeping, or from lying down. 
I was there when the gates were broken ope, 
And saw how Mansoul then was stript of hope. 
I saw the captains march into the town, 
How there they fought, and did their foes cut down. 

I heard the Prince bid Boanerges go 
Up to 'the castle, and there seize his foe ; 
And saw him and his fellows bring him down 
In chains of great contempt quite through the town. 

I saw Emanuel, when he possest 
His town of Mansoul : and how greatly blest 
The town, his gallant town of Mansoul was 
When she received his pardon, lov'dhis laws. 

When the Diabolonians were caught, 
When tried, and when .to execution brought, 
Then 1 was there : yea, I was standing by 
\V hen Mansoul did the rebels crucify. 
I also saw Mansoul clad all in white, 
And heard her Prince call her his heart's delight ; 
I saw him put upon her chains of gold, - 
And rings and bracelets, goodly to behold. 

What shall I say ? I heard the people's cries, 
And saw the Prince wipe tears from MansouPs eyes. 



ADDRESS. "▼!' 

I heard the groans, and saw the joy of many;. 
Tel! you of all, I neither will, nor can I ; 
But by what here I say, you well may see 
That Mansoul's matchless wars no fables be. 
Mansoul ! the desire of both Princes was* 
One keep his gain would, t'other gain his loss; 
Diabolus would cry, The town is mine ; 
Emanuel would plead a right divine 
Unto his Mansoul; then to blows they go, 
And Mansoul cries, u These wars will me undo I" 
Mansoul, her wars seemed endless in her eyes, 
She's lost by one, becomes another's prize ; 
And he again that lost her last would swear, 
Have her I will, or her in pieces tear. 

Mansoul thus was the very seat of war ; 
Wherefore her troubles greater were by far 
Than only where the noise of war is heard, 
Or where the shaking of a sword is fear'd ! 
Or only where small skirmishes are fought, 
Or where the fancy fighteth with a thought. 

She^saw the swords of fighting men made red 9 
And heard the cries of those with them wounded. 
Must not her frights, then, be much more by far 
Than they that to such doings strangers are ? 
Or theirs that hear the beating of a drum. 
But need not fly for fear from house and home ? 
Mansoul not only heard the trumpet sound, 

But saw her gallants gasping on the ground ; 

Wherefore we must not think that she could rest 

With them whose greatest earnest is but jest ; 

Or where the blust'ring threat'nings of great wars 

Do end in parlies, or in wording jars. 

Mansoul hci mighty wars they do portend 

Her weal, her woe, and that world without end ; 

Wherefore she must be more concern 'd than they 

Whose fears begin and end the self-same day ; 

Or where none other harm doth come to him 

That is engaged but lose of life and limb ; 



T1U ADDBES8* 

As all must needs that now do dwell 
In Universe, and can this story tell. 

Count me not, then, with them who to amaze 
The people, set them on the stars to gaze ; 
Insinuating with much confidence 
They are the only men that have science 
Of some brave creatures ; yea, a world they will 
Have in each star, though it be past their skill 
To make it manifest unto a man 
That reason hath, or tell his fingers can. 

But I have too long held thee in the porch, 
And kept thee from the sun-shine with a torch. 
"Well, now go forward, step within the door, 
And there behold five hundred times much more 
Of all sorts of such inward rarities, 
As please the mind will, and will feed the eyes, 
With those which of a christian, thou wilt see ; 
Nor do thou go to work without my key, 
(In mysteries men do often lose their waj') 
And also turn it right ; if the a would 'st know 
My riddle, and with my heifer plow ; 
It lies there' in the window. Fare thee well, 
My neict may be to ring thy passing bell. 

JOHN BUNYAN, 



THE 



HOLY W A It, 



JLN my travels, as I walked through many regions 
and countries, it was my chance to arrive at that 
famous continent of Universe. A very large and 
spacious country it is : it lieth between the two 
poles,, and just amidst the four points of heaven. 
It is a place well watered, and richly adorned with 
hills and valleys, bravely situated ; and for the 
most part, at least where I was., very fruitful ; also 
well peopled, and a very sweet air. 

The people are not all of one complexion, nor 
yet of one language, mode, or way of religion ; but 
differ as much, it is said, as do the planets them- 
selves : some are right and some are wroug, even 
as it happeneth to be in lesser regions. 

In this country, as I said, it was my lot to travel ; 
there travel I did, and that so long, even till I had 
learned much of their mother-tongue, together with 
the customs and manners of them among whom I 
was. And, to speak the truth, I was much delight- 
ed to see and hear many things which I saw and 
beard among them : yea, I had, to be sure., even 



HOLY WAIL 



Ma nsoul originally a beautiful pi: 



lived and died a native among them, I was so taken 
with them and their doings, had not niy Master sent 
for me home to his house, there to do business for 
him, and to see business done. 

Now there is, in this gallant country of Universe, 
a fair and delicate town, a corporation called 
Mansoul ; a town for its building so curious, for 
its situation so commodious, for its privileges so ad- 
vantageous ( I mean with reference to its original) 
that I may say of it, as was said before of the con- 
tinent in which it is placed, " There is not its equal 
" under the whole heaven." 

As to the situation of this town, it lieth between 
two worlds : and the first founder and builder of it, 
io far as by the best and most authentic records I 
can. gather, was one SHADDAI ;'* and he built it 
for his own delight. f He made it the mirror and 
glory of all that he made, even the top-piece, be- 
yond any thing else that he did in that country. 
Yea, so goodly a town was Mansoul, when first 
built, that it is said by some, the gods, at the setting 
up thereof, came down to see it, and sung for joy, 
and as lie made it goodly to behold, so also mighty 
to have dominion over all the country round about. 
Yea all were commanded to acknowledge Man- 

* Shaddaimeans the All-sufficient, or Almighty. 

t And God said, Let us make man in our image, after our like- 
ness ; and let them have dominion over the fish of the sea, and over 
the fowl of the air, and over the cattle, and overall the earth, anil 
over every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth. Gen. i. 8$» 



HOLY WAR. 



A \ wrrj.. 



soil for their metropolitan, all were enjoined to do 
homage to it. Ay, the town itself had positive 
commission,, and power from her King, to demand 
service of all, and also to subdue those that any 
ways denied it. 

There was reared up in the midst of this town, 3 
most famous and stately palaee :* for strength, it 
may he called a castle ; for pleasantness, a paradise, 
for largeness, a place so copious as to contain all 
the world. f This place, the King Sua do at in- 
ieuded but for himself alone, and not another with 
him : partly because of his own delights, and partly 
because he vvoumj not that the terror of strangers 
should be upon the town. This place Shadoaj 
made also a garrison of; but lie committed the 
keeping of it only to the men of the town. 

The walls of tic town were well built ; yea, so fast 1 
and firm were they knit and compacted together, 
that, had it not been for the townsmen themselves, 
they could not have been shaken or broken for ever. 

For here lay the excellent wisdom of him that 
built Mansoul, that the. walls could never he 
broken down nor hurt, by the most mighty ad- 
verse potentates, unless the townsmen gave consent 
thereto. 

This famous town of Mais-soul had five o-ates, 



* The heart and condition of man m h's original sta.te. 
+ He hath made every thioa; beautiful h> his time : alio he hatl) 
Set the world in their heart. Keel. iii. 11, 



HOLY WAH. 



Piaeolus or Satan attacks Mansodl. 

at which to come out, and at which to go in ; and 
these were made likewise answerable to the wails, 
to wit, impregnable, and such as could never be 
opened nor forced, but by the wi!l and leave of 
those within. The names of the gates are these: 
Ear-gate, Eye-gate, Mouth-gate, Nose-gate, 
.and Feel-gate. 

Other things that were thai belonged to the tow» 
of Mansoul, which if you adjoin to these, will yet 
give further demonstration to all, of the glory and 
strength of the place. It had always a sufficiency of 
provision within its walls ; it had the best, most 
wholesome and excellent law that was then extant 
tin the world. There was not a rogue, rascal, or 
traitorous person then within its walis: they were 
all true men, and fast joined together : and this, you 
;know, is a great matter. And to all these, it had 
always, so long as it had the goodness to keep true 
.to Shaddai the king, his countenance, his protec- 
tion, and it was his delight, &c. 

Well, upon a time there was one Diabolus, a 
mighty giant, made an assault upon the famous 
-town of Mansoul, to take it, and make it his own 
habitation. This giant was one of the Blacks or 
Negroes, and a most raving prince he was. We 
will, if you please, first discourse of the original of 
this Diabolus, and then of his taking of this far 
ssnous town of Mansoul. 

This Diabolus is indeed a great and mighty 
prince, and yet both poor and beggarly. As to his 



HOLY. V* ATI. 



The conspiracy of the fallen 



original, he was at first one of the servants of king 
Shad dai, by whom lie was made, and raised to a 
most high and mighty place, yea, and was put into 
such-pricipalities as belonged to the best of his ter- 
ritories and dominions. This Diabolus was 
made son of the morning,* and a brave place he had 
ofit : it brought him much glory, and gave him much 
brightness : an income that might have contented 
his Luciferian heart, had it not been insatiable, and 
enlarged as hell itself. 

Well, he seeing himself thus exalted to greatness 
and honour, and raging; in his mind far higher state 
and degree, what doth he but begin to think with 
himself, how he might be set up as lord over aJ, 
and have the sole power over Shaddai. (N«rw 
that did the king reserve for his Ron, yea, and he 
had already bestowed it upon him) ; wherefore he 
^£rst consults with himself what had best to be done ; 
and then breaks his mind to some others of his com- 
panions, to which they also agreed. So, in tine, they 
came to this issue, that they should mike an attempt 
upon the King's Son to destroy him, that the inhe- 
ritance might be theirs. Well, to be short, the trea*- 
son, as I said, was concluded, the time tippointcd, 
the word given, the rebels rendezvoused, and the 
assault attempted. Now the King and his Sou 
being all and always eye, could not but discern all 

* How art thou fallen from heaven, O Lucifer, son of the morn" 

iig! how art thou cut down to the ground, which did weaken tiss 
Motions. Isa. siv. 1-2. 



HOLY AVAR. 



:-cteJ from heaven. 



passages in his dominions/, and he having always a 
love for his Son, as for himself, could not, at what 
he saw, bui be greatly provoked and offended : 
wherefore what does he but take them in the very 
nick, and first tr' i p that they made towards their 
design, convicts them of the treason, horrid rebellion, 
and conspiracy that tiizj had devised, and now at- 
tempted to put into practice, and easts them alto- 
gether oat of all place of trust, benefit, honour, and 
preferment: this done* he banishes them the court, 
turns them down into horrid pits : never more to 
expect the least favour from his hands, but to abide 
the judgment that he had appointed, and that for 
ever and ever.* 

Now they being thus cast out of all place of 
trust, profit and honour, and also knowing that they 
had lost their Prince's favour forever, being banished 
his court, and cast down to the horrible pits, you 
jnay be sure they would now add to their former 
pride what malice and rage against Shaddai, and 
against his Son, they could. Wherefore roving f 
and ranging in much fury from place to place, if 
perhaps they might find something that was the 
King's, to revenge themselves on him, by spoiling 



OTY 



► Ami the angels which kept not their first estate, but left theft 
n habitation, he hath reserved in everlasting chains, unto dark- 

pe&s, unto the judgment of the grcatday. Jude 6. 

t Be sober, be vigilant; because your adversary the Devil, as a 

routing Iiouj waiketh about seeking whom he may devour. I Pel. 

V. 8 



HOLY VVAIl. 



sci of the rallen angel 



thai ; at last they happened into this spacious coun- 
try of Universe, and steered their course towards 

the town oFMansoul: and considering that that 
town was one of the chief works and delights of 
King Shaddai ; what do ikey, out after counsel 
taken, make an assault upon that. 1 say, fhey knew 
that Mansoul belonged unto Shaddai : for they 
were there when he built and beautified it for him- 
self. So when they had found the place, they 
shouted horribly for joy, and roared on it like as a 
lion on its prey ; saying, Now we have found the 
prize, and how to be revenged on king Shaddai 
for what he hath done to us. So they sat down and 
called a counsel of war ; and considered with them- 
selves, what ways and methods they had best engage 
in, for the winning to themselves this famous town 
r>f Mansoul : and these four things were then 
propounded to be considered of. 

First, Whether they had best all of them to shew 
themselves m this design to the town of Mas- 

*OUL? 

Secondly, Whether they had best to go and dt 
down against Mansoul, in their now ragged and 
beggarly guise ? 

Thirdly, Whether they had best shew to Ma^soui, 
their intentions, and what design, they came about ; 
or whether to assault it with words and ways ot 
deceit ? 

Fourthly, Whether they had not best give out 
private orders, to some of their companions, te take 



IIOlv war. 



1) i a HaLus appointed to the attack. 



the advantage, if they see one or more of the prin- 
cipal townsmen, to shoot them ; if thereby they shall 
judge their cause and design will the better be pro- 
moted ? 

It was answered, to the first of these proposals, 
in the negative ; to wit, that it would not be best 
that all should shew themselves before the town, 
because the appearance of many of them might 
alarm and frighten the town ; whereas a few, or but 
one of. them, was not so likely to do it. And to 
cause this advice to take place, it was added further 
that if Mansoul was frighted, or did take the 
alarm, it is impossible, said Diabolus (for bespoke 
now ) that we should take the town: for that none 
can enter into it without its own consent. Let 
therefore but a few, or but one assault Ma&soul, 
and, in my opinion, said Diabolus, let me be he. 
Wherefore to this they all agreed : and then to the 
second proposal they came, namely, 

II. Whether they had best to go and sit dowu 
before Mansoul, in their now ragged and beggarly 
guise ? 

To which it was answered also in the negative, 
By no means ; and that because, though the town 
of Mansoul had been made to know, and to have 
to do with, before now, things that are invisible ; 
they never did as yet see any of their fellow creatures 
in so bad. and rascally a condition as they : and thin 
was the a.dvice of the fierce Alecto. Then said 
Asol.li.qn., The advice is pertinent ; for one ol 



HOLY WAIt 



Advice of the infernal spirits. 



us appearing- to them as we are now, must needs 
both beget and multiply such thoughts in them, as 
will put them into a consternation of spirit, and ne- 
cessitate them to put themselves upon their guard : 
and if so, said he, then, as Diabolus said but now, 
it is in vain for us to think of taking the town, 
Then said that mighty giant Beelzebub, The ad- 
vice that is already given is safe ; for though the 
men of Mansoul hath seen such things as we were 
once, yet hitherto they did never behold such things 
as we now are. And it is best, in my opinion, to 
come upon them in such a guise as is common to, 
and most familiar among them. To this when they 
had consented, the next thing to be considered was, 
in what shape, hue, or guise, Diabolus had best to 
shew himself, when he went about to make Man- 
soul his own. Then one said one thing and an- 
other the contrary. At last Lucifer answered, 
Tiiat, in his opinion, it was best his lordship should 
assume the body of one of those creatures that they 
of the town had dominion over: for, quoth lie, 
those are not only familiar to them, but, being un- 
der them, they will never imagine that any attempt 
should by them be made upon the town; and to- 
blind all, let him assume the body of one of those 
beasts that Mansoul deems to be wiser than anj 
of the rest.* This advice was applauded of all; so 

» Now the serpent was more subtile than any beast of the field- 
which the Lour* God had made-. An.i lie. bk«l kv\£o. ibfi woivur.,,. 
a. 



10 HOLY WAR. 



The third question discussed. 



it was determined that the giant Diaeolus should 
assume the dragon ; for that he was, in those days, 
as familiar with the town of Mansoul, as now is 
the bird with the boy; for nothing that was in its 
primitive state was at all amazing to them. They 
then proceeded to the third thing, which was, 

III. Whether they had best shew their inclina- 
tions, or the design of their coming to Mansoul of 
no ? 

This also was answered in the negative, because 
af the weight that was in their former reasons, to wit, 
for that Mansoul were a strong people, a strong 
people, in a strong town, whose wall and gates were 
impregnable (to say nothing of their castles), nor 
can they by any means be won but by their own 
censent. Besides, said Legion, for he gave 
answer to this, a discovery of our intentions may 
make them send to their king for aid ; and if that 
be done, I know what time of the day it will be with 
us : therefore let us assault them in all pretended 
fairness, covering our intentions with all manner of 
lies, flatteries, delusive words ; feigning things that 
will never be, and promising that to them which they 
shall never find: this is the way to win Man- 
soul, and to make them willingly open their gates 
to us ; yea, and desire us also to come in to them. 

And the reason why I think that this project will 



Yea, hath God said, Ye shall not eat of every tree of the garden, 
Gen. iii. I. 



HOLY WAR. 11 



The fourth proposition agreed on. 



do, is, because the people of Mansoul are now 
every one simple and innocent; all honest and 
true : nor do !uey as yet know what it is to be as- 
saulted with fraud, guile, and hypocrisy. They are 
strangers to lying and dissembling lips ; wherefore 
we cannot, if thus we be disguised, by them at all be 
discerned ; our lies shall go for true sayings, and 
our dissimulations for upright dealings. What we 
promise them, they will in that believe us ; espe- 
cially if in all our lies and feigned words we pretend 
great love to them, and that our design is only their 
advantage and honour. Now there was not one 
bit of a reply against this, for it went as current 
down as doth the water down a steep descent : 
wherefore they go to consider of the last proposal, 
which was, 

IV. Whether they had not best to give out orders 
to seme of their company, to shoot some one or 
more cf the principal of the townsmen; if they 
judge that their cause might be promoted thereby ? 

This was carried in the affirmative; and the man 
that was designed by this stratagem to be destroyed, 
was one Mr. Resistance, otherwise called Cap- 
tain Resistance, and a great man in Mansoul 
this Captain Resistance was; and a man that the 
giant Diabolus, and his band, more feared than 
they feared the whole town of Mansoul besides. 
Now who should be the actor to do the murder ? 
that was the next: and they appointed one T&si- 
PHONE, a fury of the lake, to do it. 

They thus having ended the counsel of war, rose 



Z2 HOLY WAR. 



The parly began. 



up, and assayed to do as they had determined : they 
marched towards Mansoul., but all in a manner 
invisible, save only one ; nor did he approach the 
town in his own likeness, but under the shape and 
in the body of the dragon. 

So they drew up, and sat downbefore Ear-gate ; 
for that was the place of hearing for all without the 
town, as Eye-gate was the place of perception, 
jSo, as I said, he came up with his train to the gate, 
and laid his ambuscade for captain Resistance, 
within bowshot of the town. This done, the giant 
ascended up close to the gate, and called to the town 
.of Man soul for audience. Nor took he any with 
him but one Ill-pause, who was his orator in all dif- 
ficult matters. Now, as I said, he being come up to 
the gate ( as the manner of ihose times was, ) sounded 
;his trumpet for audience; at which the chief of the 
town of Mansoul, suchasmylord Innocent, my 
lord Will-be-will, my Lord-mayor, Mr. Re- 
corder, and captain Resistance, came down to the 
wall to see who was there, and what was the matter. 
And my lord Will-be-will, when he looked over, 
and saw who stood at the gate, demanded what he 
was, and wherefore he was come, and why he roused 
.the town of Mansoul with so unusual a sound? 

Diabolus then, as if he had been a lamb, began 
his oration, and said, e Gentlemen of the famous 
■' town of Mansoul, I am, as you may perceive, 
i no far dweller from you, but near, and one that is 
f bound by the King to do you my homage, and 
' $>faH service I can ; wherefore that I may bf 



HOLY WAft. IS 



Satan suggests hard thoughts of Ooi 



f faithful to myself and to you, I have somewhat, of 
c concern to impart unto you ; wherefore errant me 

* jour audience, ar.d Iieai me patiently. Aid, first, 
' I will assure you, it is not myself but you, not 
' mine but your advantage, that I seek by what I 
r now do, as will full well be made manifest, by that 
r I have opened my mind to you. For, G-. .. , nen, 
' I am (to tell you the truth ) come to shew you bow 
' you may obtain great and ample deliverance from 
■ a bondage that unawares to yourselves you are 
e captivated and enslaved under/ Atthis the town 
of Mansoul began to prick up its ears. ■ And what 
' isit, pray ? what is it ?' thought they. And he said, 
? I have something to say to you concerning your 
' King, concerning his law, and also touching your- 
1 selves. Touching your King, 1 know he is great 
' and potent ; but yet all (Suit he has said to you is 
' neither true, nor yet for your advantage. 1. It is 
' not true ; for that wherewith he hath hitherto awed 
' you, shall not come to pass, tho' you do the thing 
' he hath forbidden. But if there was danger, what 
f a slavery is it to live always in fear of the greatest 
' of punishment, for doing so sma'l and trivia] a 
' thing as eating a little fruit is ! 2. Touching hi-s 

* laws, this I say, further, they are both unreason- 
< able, intricate, and intolerable. Unreasonable, 
' as was hinted before, for that the punishment h 
' not proportioned to the offence : there is a great 
' difference and dispropotion betwixt the life ami 

* an apnle ; yet the one must go for -the oihr.r, by 



U HOLY WAR. 



Satan excites to rebellion. 



' the law of your Shaddai. But it is also intri- 
' caie, in that he saith, first> you may eat of all; 
f and yet; after,, forbid the eating of one. And 

* then, in the last place, it must needs be intolera- 
' ble ; forasmuch as that fruit, which you are for- 

* bidden to eat of ( if you are forbidden any, ) is that, 
f and that alone, which is able, by your eating, to 
' minister you a good as yet unknown by you. This 

* is manifest by the very name of the tree, it is cali- 
s ed, The Tree of Knowledge of Good and Evil : 

* and have you that knowledge as yet ? No, no ; 
r nor can you conceive how good, how pleasant, 
' and how much to be desired to make one wise, it 
e is so long as you stand by your King's co-mniand- 
' raent, Why should you be holden in ignorance 
' and blindness ? Why should you not be enlarged 
e in knowledge and understanding ? And now, O 
f ye inhabitants of the famous town of Mansoul, 
' to speak more particularly to yourselves, ye are 

* not a free people, ye are kept both in bondage and 

* slavery, and that by a grievous threat„iio reason he- 

* ing annexed, but, So I will have ir, so it shall be. 
f And is it not grievous tc think on, that that very 
' thing you are forbidden to do, might you but doit, 

* would yield you both wisdom and honour ? for then 
g your eyes will be opened, and you shall be as gods. 
' Now since this is thus, quoth he, can you bekeptby 
f any prince in more slavery, and in greater bondage, 
' than you are under this day ? You are made under- 

* linrs, andarewra^tup in inconveniences, as I have 




T.WaWsScuJ* 



£ahlainl(esis/ance- kM-d dunna /hr hwfeu. 



HOLY WAR. 15 



Resist \xce slaia. 

' well made appear: for what bondage greater than 
*' to be kept in blindness? Will not reason tell you, 
' that it is better to have eve* than to be without 
' them? and that to be at liberty is better than to 
' be shut up in a dark and stinking cave ?' 

And just now, while Diabolus was speaking 
these words to Mansoul, Tisiphone shot at cap- 
tain Resistance, where he stood on the gate, and 
mortally wounded him in the head : so that he to 
the amazement of the townsmen, and the encourage- 
ment of Diabolus, fell down dead quite over the 
wall. Now when captain Resistance was dead, 
(and he was the only man of war in the town) poor 
Mansoul was wholly left naked of courage, nor 
had she now any heart to resist : but this was as the 
devil would have it. Then stood forth that He, 
Mr. Ill-pause, that Diabolus brought with him, 
who was his orator, and he addressed himself to 
speak to the town of Mansoul: the tenour of 
whose speech here follows : 

Ill-pause. Gentlemen, quoth he, it is my mas~ 
ter's happiness, that he has this day a quiet and 
teachable auditory ; and it is hoped by us, that we 
shall prevail with you not to cast off good advice : 
my master has a very great love for you ; and al- 
though he very well knows that he runs the hazard 
of the anger of king Skaddai, yet love to you will 
make him do more than that. Nor doth there need 
that a word more should be spoken to confirm for 
truth what he hath said : there is not a word but 



*0 HOLY WAR 



Ixnocexcy gone \vc become slaves to 



carries with itself evidence in its bowels ; the very 
name of the tree may put an end to all controversy 
in this matter. I therefore at this time shall only 
add this advice to yen, under and by the leave of my 
lord (and with that he made Biabolus a very low 
congee) : consider his words ; look on the tree, and 
the promising fruit thereof; remember also., that 
yet you know but little, and that this is the way to 
know more : and if your reason be not conquered 
to accept of such good counsel, you are not the 
men I took you to be. " But when the townsfolk 
saw that the tree was good for food, and that it was 
pleasant to the eye, and a tree -to be desired to make 
one wise," they did as old Ill-pause advised, they 
took and did eat thereof. 

Now this I should have told you before, that even 
then, when this Ill-pa^se was making his speech 
to the townsmen, my lord Innocency (whether by 
a shot from the camp of the giant, or from some 
qualm that suddenly took him, or whether by the 
stinking breath of that treacherous villain, old Ill- 
pause, for so I am most apt to think) sunk down 
in the place where he stood, nor could he be 
brought to life again. Thus these two brave men 
died : brave men I call them, for they were the 
beauty and glory of Mansoul, so long as they lived 
therein : nor did there now remain any more a noble 
spirit in Mansoul ; they all fell down and yielded: 
obedience to Diaectlus, and became his slaves an*!: 
vassals, as you shall hear. 



HOLY WAR, 17 



DiAnoLUS enters the ioypq. 



Now these being dead, what do the rest 
townsfolk, but as men that had found a fool's para- 
dise, they presently, as afore was hinted, feil to 
prove the truth of the giant's words: and first they 
did as Ill-pause had taught (hem, they looked, 
they considered, they were taken with the forbidden 
fruit, " they took thereof, and did eat;" arid having 
eaten, they became immediaiely drunken therewith ; 
so they opened the gates, both Ear-gats and Eye- 
gats, and let in Diabolus, with all his bauds, 
quite forgetting their good Shaddai, his law, and 
the judgments (bat he had annexed with solemn 
threatenings to the breach thereof. 

Diabolus, having now obtained entrance in at 
the gates of the town, marches up to the middle 
thereof, to make his conquest as sure as he could ; 
and Ending, by this time, the affections oi the 
people warmly inclining to him he thinking it was 
best striking while the iron was hot, made this fur- 
ther deceivable speech unto them, saying, ' Alas 
' my poor Man soul ! I have done thee indeed 
c this service, as to promote thee to honour, and 4o 
c greaten thy liberty ; but alas ! alas ! poor Man- 
e soul, thou wantest now one to defend thee ,- for 
" assure thyself, when Shaddai shall hear what is 

* done, he will come ; for sorry will he be that thou 
( hast broken his bonds, and cast his cords away 
f from thee. What wilt thou do ? Wilt thou, after 

* enlargement, suffer thy privileges to be invaded 



IS HOLY WAR. 



Satan gains the heart. 



( and taken away ? or what wilt thou resolve with 
1 thyself.' Then they all with one consent said to 
this bramble. Do thou reign oyer us. So he ac- 
cepted the motion, and became the king of the 
iown of Mansoul. This being done, the next 
thing was to giye him possession of the castle, and 
so of the whole strength of the town. Wherefore 
inte the castle he goes (it was that which Shaddai 
built in Mansoul, for his own delight and plea- 
sure) : this was now become a den and hold for the 
giant Diabolus. Now haying got possession of 
this stately palace or castle, what doth he, but 
make it a garrison for himself, and strengthens and 
fortifies it with all sorts of provisions against the 
king Shaddai, or those that should endeavour the 
regaining of it to him and his obedience again. 

This done, but not thinking himself yet secure 
enough, in the next place he bethinks himself of 
new modelling the town : and so he does, setting 
up one, and putting down another at pleasure. 
Wherefore my lord maj^or, whose name was my 
lord Understanding, and Mr. Recorder, whose 
name was Mr. Conscience, these he put out of 
place and power. 

As for my lord mayor, though he was an under- 
standing man, and one too that had complied with 
the rest of the town of Mansoul in admitting the 
giant into the town, yet Diabolus thought not fit 
to let him abide in his former lustre and glory, be- 



HO.LV WAR. 10 



He ilark-ens the undcisfandm,<:. 



cause lie was a seeing man,* wherefore he had 
darkened him not only by taking from him his of- 
fice and power, but by building of" an high and 
strong tower, just between the sun's reflections and 
the windows of my lord's palace; by which means 
the house, and the whole of his habitation., was 
made as dark as darkness itself: and thus being 
alienated from the light, he became as one that was 
born blind. f To this house my lord was confined, 
as to a prison ; nor might he upon his parole, go 
further than within his own bounds. And now had 
he had an heart to do good for Mansoul, what 
could he do for it, or wherein could he be profitable 
to her ? So then, so long as Mansoul was under 
the power and government of Diabolus (and so 
long it was under him 5 as it was obedient to him ; 
which was even until by a war it was rescued out 
of his hand); so long my lord mayor was rather 
an impediment in, than an advantage to, the famous 
town of Mansoul. 

As for Mr. Recorder, before the town was taken, 



* For the weapons of our warfare are not carnal, but mighty 
through God to the pulling clown of strong holds : Casting dowa 
imaginations, and every high thing that exaltcth itself against the 
knoukdgeof God, and bringing into captivity every thought to the 
obedience, of Christ. 2 Cor. x. 4, 5. 

+ Having the understanding darkened, being alienated from the 
life of God through the ignorance that is in them, because of the 
blindness of their heart. Who being past feeling have given them* 
selves over unto lasciviousness, to work all uncleanness withgreadU 
avss. Ep&.iv. 18, 19. 



HOLY WAR 



Conscience shakes the sinner at times 



be was a man well read in the laws of his king, and 
also a man of courage and faithfulness to speak truth 
on every occasion ; and he had a tongue as bravely 
liung, as he had an head filled with judgment. Now 
this man, Diabolus could by no means abide, be- 
cause, tho' he gave his consent to his coming into 
the town, yet he could not by ail wiles, trials, stra- 
tagems, and devices that he could use, make him his 
own. True he was much degenerated from his for- 
mer king, and also much pleased with the giant's 
service, and many of his laws. But this would not 
do, forasmuch as he was not wholly his : he would 
now and then think upon Shaddai, and have a 
dread of his law upon him, and then he would speak 
against Diabolus with a voice as great, as when a 
lion roareth : yea, and would also at certain times, 
when his fits were upon him (for you must know, 
that sometimes he had terrible fits), make the whole 
town of Mansoul shake with his voice ; and there- 
fore the new king of Mansoul could not abide 
Jiim. 

Diabolus therefore feared the Recorder more 
than any that was left alive in the town of Man 
soul, because, as I said, his words did shake the 
whole town ; they were like the rattling of thunder, 
and also like thunder-claps. Since therefore the 
giant could not make him wholly his own, what 
doth he do, but studies all that he could to debauch 
the old gentleman, and, by debauchery, to stupify 
liis mind, and more harden his heart in the ways of 



HOLY WAR. 51 



Co s scj ENcE s:iii)ificd and dis 



vanity. And as he attempted so be accompli 
his design ; lie debauched the man, and by li 
and little so drew him into- sin and wickedness, that 
at last he was not only debauched as at first, and so 
by consequence defiled, but was almost (at last, I 
say) past all conscience of sin. And this was the 
farthest Diabolus could go. Wherefore he be- 
thinks him of another project, and that was, to per- 
suade the men of the town that Mr. Reeor.der was 
med, and so not to be regarded. And for this he 
urged his fits, and said, If he be himself, why doth 
he not do thus always ? But, quoth he, all mad folk 
have their fits, and in them raving* language ; so 
hath this old and doating gentleman. Thus by one 
means or other he quickly got Mansoul to slight, 
neglect, and despise whatever Mr. Recorder could 
say. For, besides what, you have already heard, 
Diabolus had a way to make the old gentleman, 
when he was merry, unsay and deny what he in his 
fits had affirmed. And indeed this was the next way 
to make himself ridiculous, and to cause that no 
man should regard him. Also now he never spake 
freely for king Shaddai, but always by force and 
constraint. Besides, he would at one time be hot 
against that about which at another he would hold 
his peace, so uneven was he now in his doings. 
Sometimes he would be as if fast asleep, and again 
sometimes as dead, even then when the whole town 
of Mansoul was in her career after vanity^ and so 
her dance after the giant's pipe. 



m HOLY WAR. 



Satan persuades that Gen gives up the Sinner. 



Wherefore sometimes, when Mansoul did use to 
be frighted with the thundering voice of the Re- 
corder that was, and when they did tell Diabolus 
of it, he would answer, that what the old gentleman 
said, was neither out of love to him, nor pity to 
them, bat of a foolish fondness that he had to be 
prating; and so would hush, still, and put all to 
quiet again. And that he might leave no argument 
unurged that might tend to make them secure, he 
said, and said it often, Oh Mansoul ! consider, that 
notwithstanding the old gentleman's rage, and the 
rattle of his high and thundering words, your hear 
nothing of Suaddai himself (when, lyar and de- 
ceiver that he was, every outcry of Mr. Recorder 
against the sin of Mansoul was the voice of Goo 
in him to them). But he goes on, and says, Yoa 
see that he values not the loss nor rebellion of the 
town of Mans oui ; nor will he trouble himself 
with calling his town to a reckoning, for their giv- 
ing themselves to me. He knows, that though ye 
were his, now you are lawfully mine ; so leaving 
las to one another* he hath now shaken his hands of 

us. 

Moreover, O Mansoul ! quoth he, consider how 
I have served you, even to the uttermost of my 
power ; and that with the best that I have, could 
get, or procure for you in all the world : besides, 
1 dare say, that the laws and customs that you now 
are under, and by which you do homage to me, do 
Field you more solace and content than did the 



HOLY WAR. 23 



Conscience cannot be quieted or subdued. 

paradise that at first you possessed. Your liberty 
also, as yourselves do very well knew, has been 
greatly widened and enlarged by me : whereas I 
found you a pen'd up people, I have not laid any 
restraint upon you : you have no law, statute, or 
judgment of mine to fright you : I call none of you 
to account for your doings except the madman, you 
know who I mean : I have granted you to live, each 
man like a prince in his own palace, even with as 
little controul from me as I have from you. 

And thus would Diabolus hush up and quiet 
the town of Mansoul, when the Recorder that was, 
did at times molest them ; yea, and with such cursed 
orations as these would set the whole town in a rage 
and fury against the old gentleman ; yea, the ras- 
cally crew at some times would be for destroying 
him. They have often wished, in my hearing, that 
he had lived a thousand miles off from them: his 
company, his words, yea, the very sight of hirn, 
and especially when they remembered how in old 
times he did use to threaten and condemn them (for 
all he was now so debauched ) ; did terrify and affiict 
them sore. 

But all their wishes were vain; for I don't know 
how, unless by the power of Shaddai, and his wis- 
dom, he was preserved in being amongst them. Be- 
sides, his house was as strong as a castle, and stood 
hard by a strong hold of the town ; moreover, if at 
any time any of the crew or rabble attempted to 
make him away, he could pull up the sluices, and 



24 HOLY WAR. 



The will corrupted by pride. 



let in such floods as would drown all round about 
him. 

But to leave Mr. Recorder, and to come to my 
lord Will-be-will, another of the famous town ot 
Mansoul. This Will-be-will was as high-born 
in Mansoul, and was as much, if not more, a free- 
bolder, than many of them were : besides, if I re- 
member my tale aright, he had some privileges pe- 
culiar to himself in the famous town of Mansoul. 
Now, together with these, he was a man of great 
strength, resolution, and courage, nor in his occa- 
sion could any turn him away. But I say, whether 
he was proud of his estate, privileges, strength, or 
what (but sure it was through pride of something), 
he scorns now to be a slave in Mansoul; and 
therefore resolves to bear office under Diabolks, 
that he might (such a one as he was) be a petty 
ruler and governor in Mansoul ; and (headstrong 
man that he was) thus he began betimes ; for this 
man, when Diabolus did make his oration at 
Ear-gate, was one of the first that was for con- 
senting to his words, and for accepting of his coun- 
sel as wholesome, and that was for opening the gate,, 
and lettinghim into the town: wherefore Diabolus, 
had a kindness for him, and for that reason designed 
him for a place ; and, perceiving the valour and 
stoutness of the "man, he coveted to have him for one 
of his great ones, to act and do in matters of the 
highest concern. 

So he sent for him, and talked with him of that 



HOLY WAR- 



The mind and will subject tc Satan. 



secret matter which lay in his breast ; but there 
needed not much persuasion in the case ; for as at 
first he was willing that Diabolus should be let 
into the town, so now he was as willing- to serve him 
there. When the tyrant, therefore, perceived the 
willingness of my lord to serve him, and that hi« 
mind stood bending that way, he forthwith made him 
captain of the castle, governor of the wall, and 
keeper of the gates of Mansoul : yea, there was a 
clause in his commission, that nothing without lu'm 
should be done, in all the town of Mansoul : so that 
now, next to Diabolus himself, who but my lord 
Will-be-will in all the town of Mansoul ! nor 
could an; thinabenowdone, but at his will and plea- 
sure, throughout the town of Mansoul,* he had also 
one Mr. Mind for his clerk ; a man, to speak on, 
everyway like his master ; for he and his lord were 
in principle one, and in practice not far asunder. f 
And now was Mansoul brought under to purpose, 
and made to fulfil the lusts of the will, and of the 
mind. 

But it will not be out of my thoughts, what a des- 
perate one this Will-be- will was, when power 
was put into his hawd. First, he flatly denied that 

* Because the carnal mmd is enmuy against God; for it is not 
subject to the law of God, neither indeed can be. Rom. viii. 7. 

+ Wherein in time past ye walked according to the course of thia 
world, according to the prince of the power of the air, the spirit that 
now worketh in the children of disobedience: among whom also 
we all bad our conversation in times past in the lusts of our flesh, 
fulfilling the desires of the ri.es h and of the mind ; and were by n*=> 
ture the children of wrath, even as others. Eph. ii. g, $. 



m HOLY WAK. 



The law of God hateful to a sinful mind. 



Be owed any suit or serTice to his former prince and 
liege lord. This done, in the next place betook an 
oath, swore fidelity to his great master Diabolus, 
and then being stated and settled in his place, office, 
advancement, and preferment. Oh you cannot 
think, unless you had seen it, the strange work that 
this workman made in the town of Mansoul. 

First, He maligned Mr. Recorder to death ; he 
Would neither endure to see him, nor hear the 
words of his mouth : he would shut his eyes when 
lie saw him, and stop his ears when he heard hint apeak. 
Also he could not endure that so much as a fragment 
of JShaddai should he any where seen in the town. 
For example, his clerk, Mr. Mind, had some old 
rent and torn parchments of the law of good Shai>- 
DAiin his house: but when Will-be-will saw them 
he cast them behind his back.* True, Mr. Recorder 
had some ofthe laws in his study ; but my lord could 
by no means come at them : he also i .bought, and said, 
the windows of my old lord mayor's house were al- 
ways too light for the profit ofthe town of Mansouk. 
The light of a candle he could not endure. Now 
nothing at all pleased Will-be-will, but what 
pleased Diabolus his lord. 

There was no other like him to trumpet about 
the streets the brave nature, the wise conduct, and 



* Nevertheless they were disobedient, and rebelled against thee, 
and cast thy law behind their backs, and slew thy prophets, which 
testified against them to turn them to thee ; and they wrought great 
$r©Toeatiotts. Nehcm. iv. 25, 



HOLY WAtti 

The products of vile aiiections 



great glory of the kinn, Diabolus. He would range 
throughout all the streets of Mansoul. to cry up 
his illustrious lord; and would make himself even 
as an abject, am^ig the base and rascally crew, to 
cry up his valiant prince. And I say, when and 
wheresoever he found those vassals, he would even 
make himself as one of them. In all ill courses, he 
would act without bidding, and do mischief without 
commandment. 

The lord WiLL-BE-wiLLalso had a deputy under 
him, and his name was Mr. Affection : one that 
was also greatly debauched in his principles, and an- 
swered thereto in his life, * he was only given to 
the flesh, and therefore they call him Vile Affec- 
tion. Now there was he, and Carnal- lust, the 
daughter of Mr. Mind (like to like, quoth the devil 
to the collier), that fell in love and made a match, 
aud were married ; and, as I take it, they had seve- 
ral children, as Impudence, Black-mouth, and 
Hate- reproof. These three were black boys ; 
and, besides these three, they had three daughters, 
as Scorn-truth, Slight-God, and the name of 
the youngest was Revenge ; these were all married 
in the town, and also begot and yielded many bad 
brats, too many to be inserted. But to pass by 
this. 

When the giant had (bus ingarruoned himself in 

* Who changed the truth of God into a lye, and worshipped 
and served the creature more than the Creator s who is blessed for 
£?er. Amen. Rom. i. 25, 



2S liOLV WAR. 



The image of God erased from the sinner's mind. 

the town of Mansoul, and had put down and set 
up whom he thought good, he betakes himself to 
defacing. Now there was in the market-place of 
Mansoul, and also upon the gates of the castle, an 
image of the blessed king Shaddai : this image 
was so exactly engraven (and it was engraven 
jn gold) that it did the mos.t resemble Shaddai 
himself of any thing that then was extant in the 
world. This he basely commanded to be defaced, 
and it was basely done by the hand of Mr. No- 
truth. Now you must know, that as Diabolus 
had commanded, and that by the baud of Mr. No- 
teuth, the image of Shaddai was defaced; he 
Sikewise gave order that the same Mr. No-truth 
should set up in its stead the horrid and formidable 
image of Diabolus, to the great contempt of the 
former King, and debasing his town of Mansoul. 

Moreover, Diabolus made havoc of all remains 
of the laws and statutes of Shaddai, that could be 
found hi the town of Mansoul; to wit, such as 
contained either doctrines or morals, with all civil 
and natural documents: also relative duties he 
sought to extinguish. To be short, there was no- 
thing- of the remains of good in Mansoul, which he 
and Well-be-will sought not to destroy : for their 
design was, to turn Mansoul into a brute, and to 
make it like to the sensual sow, by the hand of Mr. 
No- truth. 

When he had destroyed what law and good orders 
be could, then, further to effect his design, namejy, 
to alienate Mansoul from Shaddai her king, he 



IfOl'A WAR. fcj 

St„.N [assesses ihe wliok-socl 



ivrnmauds, and they set up his own vain edicts, sta- 
tutes, and commandments, in all places of resort or 
concourse in Mansoul, to wit, such a.s gave liberty 
to "'the lasts of the flesh, the lusts of the eyes, 
" and the pride of life, which are not of Shaddai, 
" butof the world. 5 '* lie encouraged, countenanced, 
and promoted, iasciviousness and all ungodliness 
there. Yea, much more did Diabot.us to encou- 
rage wickedness in the town of Mansoul; he pro- 
mised them peace, content, joy, and bliss, in doing 
his commands,, and that they should never be called 
to an account for their not doing the contrary. And 
let this serve to give a taste to them that love to hcaz 
of what is done beyond their knowledge, afar off in 
other countries. 

Now Mansoul being wholly at his beck, and 
brought wholly to his bow, nothing was heard or seen 
therein, but that which tended to set up him. 

But now he, having disabled the lord mayor and 
Mr. Recorder from bearing any office in Mansoul, 
and seeing that the town, before he came to it, was 
the most antient of corporations in the world, and 
fearing, if he did not maintain greatness, they at any 
time should object that he had done them an injury ; 
therefore, I say, (that they might see that he did not 
intend to lessen their grandeur, or to take from them 
any of their advantageous things, ) he did cruise for 
them a lord mayor and a recorder to himself; and 

* For all that is in the world, the lust of the flesh, and the lust 
o* the eyes and the pride of life, is not of the Father, but is of the 
uorlJ. i John ii, 16. 



SO HOLY WAR. 



The soul governed by its lust. 



such as contented them to the heart, and such also 
as pleased him wondrous well. 

The name of the mayor that was of Diabolus's 
making, was the lord Lustings. A man that had 
.neither eyes nor ears; all that he did, whether as a 
man or an officer, he did it naturally as doth the 
beast; and that which made him yet more ignoble* 
though not to Mansoul, yet to them that be- 
held, and were grieved for its ruin., was that he could 
never savour good, but evil. 

The recorder was one whose name was Forget- 
good, and a very sorry fellow he was ; he could re- 
member nothing but mischief, and to do it with de- 
light. He was naturally prone to do things that are 
hurtful ; evenhurtful to the town of Mansoul, and 
to all the dwellers there. These two, therefore, by 
their power and practice, examples, and smiles upon 
evil, did much more mischief, and settled the com- 
mon people in hurtful ways; for who doth not per- 
ceive, that when those that sit aloft are vile and 
corrupt themselves, they corrupt the whole region 
and country where they are. 

Besides these, Diabolus made several burges&ei 
nd aldermen in Mansoul; such as out of whom' 
the town, when it needed, might chusethem officers, 
governors, and magistrates; and these are the 
names of the chief of them; Mr. Incredulity, Mr. 
Haughty, Mr. Swearing, Mr. Whoring, Mf. 
Hard-heart, Mr. Pitiless, Mr. Fury, Mr. 
No-truth, Mr. Stand to-lies M? ( False-peac^ 



HOLY WAR. 



Satan's strong tiokls. 



Mr. Drunkenness, Mr. Cheating, Mr. Athe- 
ism : thirteen in all. Mr. Incredulity is the 
eldest, and Mr. Atheism the youngest of the com- 
pany. _ 

There was also an election of c.ommon-council- 
men, and others : as bailiff, Serjeants, constables, &c. 
but all of them, like those afore-named, being either 
fathers, brothers, cousins, or nephews, to them, 
whose names, for brevity sake, I omit to mention. 

When the giant had thus far proceeded ia his 
work, in the next place he betook him to build some 
strong holds in the town ; and he built three that 
seemed to be impregnable. The first he called the 
hold of Defiance, because it was made to com- 
mand the whole town, and to keep it from the 
knowledge of its ancient King. The second he 
called MiDNiGHT-hold, because it was built on pur- 
pose to keep Mansoul from the true knowledge of 
itself. The third was called SwEET-siN-hold, be- 
cause by that he fortified Mansoul against all de- 
sires of good. The first of these holds stood close bv 
Eye-gate, that the light might as much as possible 
be darkened there. The second was built hard bv 
the old castle, to the end that that might be made 
more blind, if possible. And the third stood in the 
market-place. 

He that Diabolus made governor over the first 
of these, was one Spite-God, a most blasphemous 
wretch. He came with the whole rabble of them 
that came against Mansoul at first, and was him- 



22 HOLY WAR. 



The state of a soul in Satan's possession. 



self one of themselves. He that was made governor 
of MiDNiGiiT-hold was one Love-no-light, he 
was also one of them that came first against the 
town. And he that was made the governor of the 
hold called Sweet-sin-IicM, was one whose name 
was Love-flesh ; he was also a very lewd fellow 
but not of that country trom whence the others are 
bound. This fellow could find more sweetness when 
lie was sucking a lust, than he did in the Paradise 
ofGoD. 

And now Diabolus thought himself safe ; he 
had taken Mansoul ; he had ingarrisoned himself 
therein ; he had put down the old officers, and set 
up new ones ; he had defaced the image of Shad- 
dai, and had set up his own; he bad spoiled the 
old law books, and had promoted his own vain lies, 
he had made him new magistrates, and set up new 
aldermen ; he had built his new holds, and had 
manned them for himself. And all this he did to 
make himself secure, in case the good Shaddai or 
his Son, should come to make an incursion upon 
them. 

Now you may well think, tlmi, long before this 
time, word by some or other could not but be car- 
ried to the good king Shaddai, how his Mansoul 
on the continent of Universe was lost; and that 
ihe giant Diabolus, once one of hh Majesty's 
servants, had, in rebellion against the King, made 
sure thereof for himself, and that to a very circum- 
stance. 



HOLY WAR. 33 



The i» retched state of a stnaer. 



At first, How Diabolus came upon Mansoul 
(they being a simple people and innocent) with craft, 
subtiltv, lies, and guile: Item, That he had treacher- 
ously slain their right noble and valiant captain, the 
captain Resistance, as he stood upon the gate 
with the rest of the townsmen : Item, How my 
brave lord Innocent fell down dead (with grief 
some say : or with being poisoned with the stinking 
breath of one Ill-pause, as say others ) at the hear- 
ing of his just Lord and rightful prince Shaddai so 
abused by the mouth of so filthy a DiABOLONiANas 
that varlet Ill-pause was. The messenger furfiier 
told, that after this Ill-pause had made a short 
oration to the townsmen in behalf of Diabolus 
hismaster, the simple t©wn, believing to be true what 
was said, with one consent did open Ear-gate, the 
chief gate of the corporation, and did let him with 
his crew into the possession of the famous town of 
Mansoul. He further shewed how Diabolus had 
served the lord mayor, and Mr. Recorder ; to wit, 
that he had put them from all place of power and 
trust. Item, He shewed also, that my lord Will- 
be-will was turned a very rebel and runnagate, 
and that so was one Mr. Mind, his clerk ; and that 
they two did range and revel it all the town over, 
and teach the wicked ones their ways. He said 
moreover, that this Will-be-will was put into 
great trust, and particularly that Diabolus had pi:t 
nto Will-be-will's hand all the strong places in 
•Mansoul ; aud that Mr Affection was made my 



34 ■ HOLY WAR. 



The sinner further described. 



lord Will-be- will's deputy, in his most rebellious 
affairs. Yea., said the messenger, this monster, lord 
Will-be-will, has openly disavowed the king 
Shadpai, and hath given his faith and plighted 
troth to Diabolus. 

Also, said the messenger, besides, this the new 
king, or rather rebellious tyrant, over the once 
ramous, but now perishing town of Mansoul, has 
set up a lord mayor and recorder of his own. For 
mayor, he has set up one Mr. Lustings ; and for 
recorder, Mr. Forget-good ; two of the vilest of 
all the town of Mansoul. This faithful messenger 
also proceeded, and told what a sort of a new bur- 
gesses Diabolus had made ; also that he had built 
several strong forts, towers, and strong-holds in 
Mansoul. He told too, the which Iliad almost 
forgot, how Diabolus had put the town of Man- 
soul into arms, the better to capacitate them on his 
behalf, to make resistance against Shaddai their 
king, should lie come to reduce them to their former 
obedience. 

Now the tidings-teller did not deliver his relation 
of things in private, but in open court, the King and 
his Son, high lords, chief captains, and nobles, being 
all there present to hear. But by that they had 
beard the whole of the story, it would have amazed 
one to foave seen, had he been there to beheld it, 
what sorrow and grief, and compunction of spirit, 
there was among all sorts, to think that the famous 
M ans©k l was now takon : only the K ing and liis Son 



HOLY WAR. 



Gno's pity towards fallen men. 



foresaw all this long before, yea, and sufficiently 
provided for the relief of MaksouLj tho' they told 
not every body thereof. Yet, because they too 
would-have a share in condoling the misery of Man- 
soul, therefore they also did, and that at a rate of 
the highest degree, bewail the losing of Mansoul. 
The king said plainly that " it grieved him at the 
" heart,"* and you maybe sure that his Son was not 
a whit behind him. Thus they gave conviction to 
all about them, that they had love and compassion 
for the famous town of Mansoul. Well, when the 
King and his Son were retired into the privy-cham- 
ber, they there again consulted about what they had 
designed before, to wit, That as Mansoul should 
in time be suffered to be lost, so as certainly it 
should be recovered again. Recovered, I say, in such 
a way, as that both the King and his Son would get 
themselves eternal fame and glory thereby. Where- 
fore, after this consultation, the Son of Shaddai (a 
sweet and comely person, and one that had always 
great affection for those that were in affliction, but 
one that had mortal enmity in his heart against Dia- 
bolus, because he was designed for it, and because 
he sought his crown and dignity), this Son of Shad- 
dai, I say, having stricken hands with the Father, 
and promised that he would be his servant to re- 



* And God saw that the wickedness of man was great in the earth, 
Bad that every imagination of the thoughts of his heart was anly 
nvil continually. And it repented the Loan that he had made roan 
an the earth, and it grieved him at his hear*. Gen. vi. 5, 0. 



36 HOLY WAR. 



Gon and Christ determine to save Mansoul. 

coyer Man-soul again, stood by his resolution, nor 
would he repent of the same. The purport of 
which agreement was this, to wit. That at a certain 
time, prefixed by both, the King's Son should take a 
journey into the country of Universe, and there in 
a way of justness and equity, by making amends for 
the follies of Mansoul, he should lay the founda- 
tion of her perfect deliverance from Diaeolus, and 
from his tyranny. 

Moreover, Emanuel resolved to make, at a 
time convenient, a war upon the giant Diabolus, 
even while he was possessed of the town of Man- 
soul ; and that he would fairly^ by strength of hand, 
drive him out of his hold, his nest, and take it to 
himself, to be his habitation. 

This being now resolved upon, order was given 
to the lord chief Secretary, to draw up a fair record 
of what was determined, and to cause that it should 
be published in all the corners of the kingdom of 
Universe. A short breviate of the contents there- 
of you may, if you please, take here as follows : 

' Let all men know, who are concerned, that the 
s Son of Shaddai, the great King, is engaged, by 
< covenant to his Father, to bring his Mansoul 

* to him again ; yea, and to put Mansoul too, 

* through his love, into a far better and more happy 
' condition than it was in before it was taken by 

* DlABOLUS.' 

These papers, therefore, were published in seve- 
ral places, to the no little molestation of the tyrant 



HOLY WAR. 37 



Joy in heaven at man's redemption. 



Diacolus ; for now, thought he, I shall be molest- 
ed, and my habitation will be taken from me. 

But when this matter, I mean this purpose of tire 
King and his Son, did at first take air at court, who 
can tell how the high lords, chief captains, and no- 
ble princes that were there, were taken with the bu- 
siness ! First, They whispered to one another, 
and after that it began to ring throughout the King's 
palace, all wondering at the glorious design that 
between the King and his Son was on foot for the 
miserable town of Mansoul : yea, the courtiers 
could scarcely do any thing, either for the king or 
kindom, but they would mix, with the doing there- 
of, a noise of the love of the King and his Son, that 
they had for the town of Mansoul. 

Nor could these lords, high captains, and princes, 
be content to keep this news at court ; yea, before 
the records thereof were perfected, themselves came 
down and told it in Universe. At last it came to ■ 
the ears, as I said, of Diabolus, to his no little 
discontent ; for you must think it would perplex 
him to hear of such a design against him. Well, 
but after a few casts in his mind, he concluded up- 
on these four things : 

First, That this news, these good tidings (if pos- 
sible) should be kept from the ears of the town of 
Mansoul : for, said he, if they should once come 
to the knowledge, that Shaddai their former King 
and Emanuel his Son, are contriving good for the 
jtown of Mansoul, what can be expected by me 



38 HOLY WAR. 



Satan would prevent the glad tidings of salvation. 

but that Mansoul will revolt from under my hand 
and government and return again to him ? 

Now to accomplish this his design, he renews his 
flatter j with ray lord Will-be-will, and also gives 
him strict charge and command,, that he should keep 
watch by day and night at- all the gates of the town, 
especially Ear-gate and Eye-gate : for I hear of 
a design, quoth he, a design to make us all traitors, 
and that Mansoul must be reduced to its first bon- 
dage again. I hope they are but flying stories, quoth 
he ; however, let no such news by any means be let 
into Mansoul, lest the people be dejected thereat : 
I think, my lord, it can be no welcome news to you, 
I am sure it is none to me : and I think, that at this 
time it should be all our wisdoms and care to nip 
the head of all such rumours as shall tend to trou- 
ble our people ; wherefore I desire, my lord, that 
.you will in this matter do as I say. Let there be 
strong guards daily kept at every gate of the town. 
Stop also and examine from whence such come, 
whom you perceive do come from far hither to trade : 
uor let them, by an means be admitted into Man- 
soul, unless you shall plainly perceive that they are 
favourers of our excellent government. I corn-' 
mand moreover, said Diabolus, that there be spies 
continually walking up and down the town of Man- 
soul ; and let them have power to suppress and 
destroy any they shall see to be plotting against us, 
or that shall prate of what by Shaddai and Ema~> 
nuel is intended. 



HOLY WAR. S9 



The sinner joins Satan to oppose the gaspel. 



This therefore was accordingly done: my lord 
Will-be-will hearkened to his lord and master, 
went willingly after his commandment, and with all 
the diligence he could, kept any that would from 
going out abroad, or that sought to bring these 
tidings to Mansoul, from coming into the town. 

Secondly, This done, in the next place Diabo- 
lus, that he might make Mansoul as sure as he 
could, frames and imposes a new oath and horrible 
covenant upon the town's folk : 

To wit, That they should never desert him, nor 
his government, nor yet betray him, nor seek to alter 
his laws : but that they should own, confess, stand 
by, and acknowledge him for their rightful king, in 
defiance of any that do, or hereafter shall, by any 
pretence, law, or title whatsoever, lay claim to the 
town of Mansoul,* thinking belike that Shaddai 
had not power to absolve them from ibis covenant 
with death, and agreement with hell. Nor did the 
silly Mansoul stick or boggle at all at this most 
monstrous engagement, but as if it had been a sprai 
iu the mouth of a whale; they swallowed it without 
any chewing. Were they troubled at it ? Nay, they 
rather bragged and boasted of their so brave fidelity 
to the tyrant their pretended king; swearing, that 



* Because ye haire said, We have made a covenant ■with dca h and 
with hell are we at agreement ; when the overflowing scourge shall 
pass through, it shall not come unto us : for we have nude lies our 
sefuge, and under falsehood have we hid ourselves, !sa. jcxviii. 15. 



40 HOLY WAR. 



Satan prompts man to sin. 



they would never be changelings, nor forsake their 
old lord for a new. 

Thus did Diabolus tie poor Maksoul- fast; 
but jealousy that never thinks itself strong enough, 
put him in the next place upon another ex- 
ploit, which was, 'yet more, if possible, to debauch 
this town of Man soul : wherefore he caused by the 
hand of one Mr. Filth,, an odious, nasty, lascivious 
piece of beastliness, to be drawn up in writing, and 
set upon the gates : whereby he granted and gave 
license to all his true and trusty sons in Mansouz. 
to do whatsoever their lustful appetites prompted 
them to do, and that no man was to let, hinder, or 
controul them, upon nam of incurring the displea- 
sure of their prince- 

Now this he did for these reasons : 

1. That the town of Mansoul might be yet made 
weaker and weaker, and so more unable, should 
tidings come that their redemption was designed, 
to believe, hope, or consent to the truth thereof; for 
reason says, ' the bigger the sinner, the less ground 
' or hope of mercy.' 

2. The second reason was, If perhaps Emaxuel, 
the Son of Shaddai their king, by seeing the hor- 
rible and profane doings of the town of Mansoul, 
might repent, though entered into a covenant of re- 
deeming them, of pursuing that covenant of their 
redemption ; for he knew that Shaddai was holy ; 
and Ihat his Son Emanuel was holy ; yea, 
he knew it by woeful experience : for, for the 



HOLY WAR. 41 



Satan makes the sinner dread Goo. 



iniquity and sin of Diabolus was be cast from the 
highest orbs. Wherefore, what more rational than 
for him to conclude, that thus for sin it might fare 
With MAnsoul ? But fearing lest also this knot 
should break, he bethinks himself of another, to wit: 

Thirdly, To endeavour to possess all hearts in 
the town of Mansoul, thatSiiADDAi was raising 
an army, to come (o overthrow and utterly to destroy 
the town of Mansoul (and this be did to forestal 
any tidings that might come to their ears of their 
deliverance) ; for, thought he, if I first spread this 
abroad, the tidings that might come after will be 
swallowed up of this; for what else will Mansoul 
say, when they shall hear that they must be de- 
livered, but that the true meaning is, Shaddai in- 
tends to destroy them ? Wherefore be summons the 
whole town into the market-place, and there with de- 
ceitful tongue thus he addresses himself unto them : 

f Gentlemen, and my very good friends, you are 
'■ all, as you know, my legal subjects, and men of the 
' famous town of Mansoul; you know how, from 
' the first day that I have been with you until now, 
f I have behaved myself among you, and what li- 
' berty and great privileges you have enjoyed under 
' my government; I hope to your honour and mine, 
' and also to your content and delight. Now, my 
r famous Mansoul, a noise of trouble there is 
' abroad, of trouble to the town of Mansoul ; sorry 
* I am therefore for your sakes. For I received 
4 but now by the post, from my lord Lucifer (and 
w 



n HOLY WAR. 



Sinners resolve to oppose God. 



* he used to have good intelligence),, that your old 
king Shaddai is raising an army to come against 

* you, to destroy you root and branch : and this, O 
' Mansoul, is now the cause that at this time I have 
' called you together, namely, to advise what in this 
'juncture is best to be done. For my part, I am 

* but one, and can with ease shift for myself, did I 
' list to seek my own ease, and to leave my Man- 
' soul in all danger: but my heart is so firmly 
f united to you, and so loth am I to leave you, that 1 
e am willing to stand and fall with you, to theutmosl 
'hazard that shall befal me. What say you, O 
' Mansoul ! will you now desert your old friend ; 
' or do you think of standing by me ?' 

Then as one man, with one mouth, they cried 
together, ' Let him die the death that will not.' 
Then said Diabo&us again, ' 'Tis in vain for us 

* to hope for quarter, for this King knows not how 
f to shew it. True, perhaps he, at his first sitting 
' down before us, will talk of, and pretend to mer 
' cy, that thereby with the more ease, and less trou- 
1 ble, he may again make himself the master of Man- 
! soul ; whatever therefore he should say, believe 
f not one syllable or tittle of it, for all such lan- 
z guage is but to overcome us ; and to make us, 
' while we wallow in our blood, the trophies of his 
' merciless victory. My mind is, therefore, that we 
' resolve to the last man to resist him, and not to 
1 believe him on any terms; for in at that door 

* voill come our danger. But shall we be flattered 
f out of our lives ? I hope you know more of the 



TIOLY WAR 43 



Sat in persuades God has no 



f rudiments of politics., than to suffer yourselves to 
' be so pitifully served. 

' But suppose he should, if he get us to yield, save 
< som&of our lives, or the lives of some of them that 
' are underlings in Mansoul, what help will that be 
f to you that are the chief of the town, especially you 
' whom I have set up, and whose greatness has been 
f procured by you through your faithful sticking to 
' me ? And suppose again, that he should give qua*r- 
' terto every one of you, be sure he will bring you 
' into that bondage under which you were captivat- 
' ed before, or a worse, andthenwhat good will your 
' livesdo you? Shall you with him live inpleasure, 

• as you do now ? No, no, you mast be bound by 
' laws, that will pinch you, and be made to do that 
' which at present is hateful to you. I am for you, 
* if you are for me ; and it is better to die valiantly, 
' than to live like pitiful slaves, But I say, the life 
' of a slave will be accounted a life too good for 
' MANsouLnow : blood, blood, nothingbut blood, is 

* in every blast of Shaddai's trumpet against poor 
' Mansoul now : pray be concerned, I hear he is 
' coming up, and stand to your arms, that now, while 
' you have leisure, I may teach you some feats of 
( war. Armour for you I have, and by me it is ; 
c yea, and it is sufficient for Mansoul, from top to 
f toe : nor can you be hurt by what his force can do, 
' if you shall keep it well girt and fastened about 
' you : come therefore to my castle and welcome, 
( and harness yourselves for the war. There is hel- 
' met, breast-plate, sword, shield, and what not* 
' that you will fight like men.* 



44 HOLY WAR. 

Satan's armour — A false hope, hard heai 



■ I. My Helmet, otherwise called an head-piece. 
( is hope of doing well at last, what lives soever you 
f live. This is that which they had, who said, that 
" they should have peace tho' they walked in the 
" wickedness of their heart, to add drunkenness to 
Ci thirst:"* c a piece of -approved armour is this ; and 
whoever has it, and can hold it, so long no arrow 
dart, sword, or shield, can hurt him ; this there- 

* fore keep on, and thou wilt ward off many a blow 
' my Mansoul 

' 2. My Breast-plate is a breast-plate of iron,f 1 
' had ii forged in mine own country, and all my sol- 
<r diers are armed therewith ; in plain language, it is 
s an hard heart, an heart as hard as iron, and as 

* much past feeling as a stone ; the which if you get 
•>' and keep, neither mercy shall win you, nor judg- 
■ e ment fright you. This therefore is apiece of ar- 
- mour most necessary for all to put on, that hate 
«' ShaddaIj and that would fight against him under 
f my banner 

c 3. My Sword is a tongue that is set on tire of 
f belli], and that can bend itself to speak evil of 

* And it come to pass, when he heareth the words of this curse. 
that he bless himself in his heart, saying, I shall have peace though 
I walk in the imagination of mine heart, to add drunkenness to 
thirst. Dent. xxix. 19. 

t And they had breastplates, as it were breast-plates of iron ; 
and the sound of their wings was as the sound of chariots of raanv 
horses running to battle. Rev. js. 9. 

£ My soul is among lions ; and i lie even among them that are set 
pn fire, even the sons of men, whose teeth are gpears and arrows, an d 
£heir tongue a sharp sword. Ps.al. Irii. 4. Who whet their tong-.e 
|^ke a sword, and bend their bows to shoot their arrows* cvtn 



HOLY WAT?. 45 



' SiiAi)!) .\ i, his Son, Lis ways, and people; list this, 
is been tried a thousai • times twice Void; 
' whoever hath it, keeps if, and makes use of it as I 
' would have him., can never be conquered by mine 
' enemy. 

'4. My Shield is unbelief, or calling into ques- 

* t\m\ the truth of the word, or all the sayings that 
' speak of the judgment that Shaddai has.appoint- 

* e:l for wicked men : use tins shield : many attempts 
' lie has made upon it. and sometimes, 'tis true, it has 
f been bruised ; but they that have writ of the wars 
' of Emanuel against my servants, have tei 

' that t: he could do no mighty work there because 
<c of their unbelief/'* ( Now, to handle this weapon 
f of mine aright, is, not to believe things because 
' they are true, of what sort, or by whomsoever as- 
1 sorted : if he speaks of judgment, care not for it ; it 
e he speaks of mercy, care not for it ; if he promises, 
' if he swears that he would do for Mansgul, 
r if it turns, to no hurt, but good, regard not what is 

* said, question the truth of all ; for this is to wield 
' the shield of unbelief aright, and as my servants 



titter words ; Ixir, 3~ And the tongue is a fire, a world of iniqui- 
ty : so is the tongue among our members, that it dciileth the whole 
body, and setteth on fire the course of nature ; and it is set oa fne 
of hell. James iii. G. 

* lie runneth upon him, even on his neck, upon thethicl bosses 
of his bucklers; Job xv. 26. There brake he the arrows of the 
bow, the shield, and the sword, and the battle. Soiah. Psal. Ixxvi. 
3. And he could there do no mighty work, save that h 
hands upon a few sick folk, and healed them. And ho marvelled 
because of their unbelief. Mark vi. 5, 0. 



4§ HOLY WAR. 



Satan the king of sinners. 



' ought, and do : and be that does otherwise, loves 
' me not, nor do I count him but an enemy to 
' me 

5. * Another part or piece/ said Diaboltjs, o-f 
mine excellent armour, is ' a dumb and prayerless 
ff spirit/ a spirit that scorns to cry for mercy, let the 
e danger be ever so great ; wherefore be you, ray 
*Mansoul, sure that you make use of this. What! 

* cry for quarter ? Never do that, if you would be 
'mine: I know you stout men; and I am sure 
1 that I have clad you with that which is armour 
€ of proof ; wherefore to cry to Sh addai for mercy, 

* let that be far from you. Besides all this I have a 
' maul, lire-brands, arrows and death, all good hand- 
- weapons, and sucb as will do execution 

After he had thus furnished his men with armour 
and arms, he addressed himself to them in such like 
words as these : ' Remember, quoth he, that I am 
? your rightful king- ; and that you have taken an 

* oath, and entered into covenant, to be true to me 
f and my cause : 1 say, remember this, and shew 

* yourselves stout and valiant men of Mansoul. 

* Remember also the kindness that I have always 
' shewed to you, and that without your petition. I 
' have granted to you external things ; wherefore the 

* privileges, grants, immunities, profits and honours, 

* wherewith I have endowed you, do call forth at your 

* hands returns of loyalty, my lion-like men of Man- 
s soul : and what so fit a time to shew it, as when 
' others shall seek to take my dominion over you in- 
£ to, their own hands ?• One word more, and I hav$ 



HOLY WAR. 4? 



BoANi;:i<;r.s, Cox victiojt, Judgment, and Execl no 



' done : Can we but stand, and overcome this one 
' shock or brunt, I doubt not but in a little time all 
1 the world will be ours ; and when that day comes, 
r ray true hearts, I will make you kings, princes, and 
' captains, and what brave days shall we have then !' 
Di a bolus having thus armed and fore-armed 
his servants and vassals in Mansoul, against their 
good and lawful King Shaddai, in the next place 
he doubleth his guards at the gates of the town, and 
betakes himself to the castle, which was Ins strong 
hold: his vassals also to shew their wills, and sup- 
posed (but ignoble) gallantry, exercise them in their 
arms every day, and teach one another feats of war; 
they also defied their enemies, and sung up the 
|)ra:"ses of their tyrant; they threatened also what 
men they would be, it' ever things should rise so 
high as a war between Shaddai and their king. 

Now all this time the good King, the KingSiiAD- 
dai, was preparing to send an army (o recover the 
town of Mansoul again from under the tyranny of 
their pretended king Diaboltjs: but he thought 
good, at the first, not to send them by the hand and 
conduct of brave Emanuel his Son, but under the 
hand of some of his servants, to see first by them 
the temper of Mansoul, and whether by them they 
Would be won to the obedience of their King. The 
army consisted of above forty thousand, all true 
men ; for they came from the King's own court, 
and were those of his own chusing. 

They came up to Mansoul under the conduct of 
four stout generals, each man being captain o£lz& 



*S HOLY WAR. 



The character of God's captains. 



thousand men ; and these are their names and en- 
signs. The name of the first was captain Boaner- 
ges ; the name of the second was captain Convic- 
tion ; the name of the third., captain Judgment ; 
and the name of the fourth was captain Execution, 
These were the captains that Shaddai sent to re- 
gain MaNsoul. 

These four captains, (as was said) the king 
thought fit in the first place to send to Mansoul to 
make an attempt upon it ; for indeed generally, in 
all his wars, he did use to place these four captains 
in the van, for they were very stout and rough-hewn 
men, men that were fit to break the ice, and to 
break their way by dint of sword, and their men 
were like themselves. 

To each of these captains the king gave a banner,* 
that it might be displayed, because of the goodness 
of his cause, and because of the right he had to 
Mansoul. - 

First, To captain Boanerges, for he was the 
chief, to him, I say, were given ten thousand men s 
his ensign was Mr. Thunder : he bore the black 
colours, and his scutcheon was the three burning 
thunderbolts. f 

The second captain was captain Conviction : 
to him were given ten thousand men : his ensign's 

* Thou hast given a banner to them that fear thee, that it may 
be displayed because of the truth. Selah. Psal. Ix. 4. 

+ And James the sou of Zebedee, and John the brother of James ; 
(and he suruanied thorn Boanerges, which is, The sons of th untie r. ) 
Markiii. If. 



HOLY WAR.' 49 



The army assembled. 



name was Mr. Sorrow : he did bare the pale 
colours/ and his scutcheon was the hook of the law 
wide open, from whence issued a flame of fire.* 

The third captain was captain Judgment; to 
him were given ten thousand men: his ensign's 
name was Mr. Terror: he bare the red colours, 
and his scutcheon was a burning fiery furnace. f 

The fourth captain was captain Execution; to 
him were given ten thousand men: his ensign was 
one Mr. Justice: he also bare the red colours, 
and his scutcheon was a fruitless tree, with an axe 
lying at I he root thereof. J 

These four captains, as I said, had every one of 
them under his command ten thousand men, all of 
good fidelity to the King, and stout at their military 
actions. 

Well, the captains and their forces, their men and 
tinder officers, being had upon a day by Shabd'ai 
into the field, and there called over by their names, 
were then and there put into such harness as be- 
came their degrees, and that service which now 
they were going about for their King. 

* And he said, The lard came from Sinai, and rose up from Scifr 
unto them ; he shined forth from mount Paran, and he came with 
ten thousands of saints ; from his right hand went a (iery law for 
them- Dcut. xxxiii. 2. 

+. The Son of man shall send forth his angels/arid th'cy shall ga- 
ther out of his kingdom all things that offend, and them which do 
iniquity, and shall cast them into a furnace of fire; there shall ba 
wailing and gnashing of teeth. Mat. xiii. 41, 42. 

^ And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: there- 
fore every tree which bringeth not forth good fruit, is hewn down 
and cast into the fire. Mat. iii. 10. 
G 



30 HOLY WAR. 



The commission to offer merej, 



Now, when the King had mustered his forces ( for 
it was he that mustered the host to the battle,) he 
gave unto the captains their several commissions, 
with charges and commandment, in the audience of 
all the soldiers, that they should take heed faith fully 
and courageously to do and execute the same. 
Their commissions were, for the substance of them, 
the same in form, though as to name, title, place, 
and degree of the captains, there might be some, 
hat very small variation : and here let me give you- 
an account of the matter and sum contained in tiieii 
commission. 

A Commission from the great King Shaddai, 
King of Mansoul, to his trusty and noole cap- 
tain, the captain Boanerges, for making war 
upon the town of Mansoul. 

' $T\ T^QU Boanerges, one of my stout and 
' \Jr thundering captains, over one ten thousand 

* of my valiant and faithful servants, go thou in my 
f name, with this thy force, to the miserable town ot 
r b Mansoul ; and when thou comest thither, offer 

* them first conditions of peace ;* and command them, 
s that, casting off the yoke and tyranny of the wicked 

* Diabolus, they return to me, their rightful prince 
' and lord ; command them also, that they cleanse 
' themselves from all that is in the town of Mansoi; l, 

* (and look to t hyself, that thou h ave s;ood sah'sfac- 
* And into whatsoever city or town ye shall enter, inquire who 

in it is worthy ; and there abide till ye go thence. Mat. x. II.. 
And into whatsoever house ye CP.tcr 5 first say, Peace be to thjt 
house, Lul-;e x, a. 



HOLY WAR. 51 



.And punish rebellion. 



c tion, touching' the truth of their obedience. ) Thus 
' when thou hast commanded them (if they in truth 
' submit thereto), then do thou to the uttermost of 
'■ thy power, what in thee lies, to set up for me a 
c garrison in the famous town of Mansoul ; nor do 
' thou hurt the least native thatmoveth or breatheth 

* therein, if they will submit themselves to me, but 
1 treat thou such as if they were thy friends or 
' brethren ; for all such I love, and they shall be 
' dear unto me ; and tell them, that I will take a 

* time to come unto them, and to let them know that 
' I am merciful.* 

' But if they shall, notwithstanding thy summons, 

* and the producing of my authority, resist, stand out 
' against thee, and rebel : then. I do command (bee 
« to make use of all thy cunning, power, might, and 
' force, to bring them under by strength- of hand-. 
' Farewel.' 

Thus you see the sum of their commissions ; for, 
as I said before, for the substance of them, they 
were the same that the rest of the noble captains 
had. 



+ But wc are gende among you, even as a nurse cherisbeth her 
children : so, being affectionately desirous of you, we were willing 
to have imparted unto yon, not the gospel of God only, but also 
our own souls, because ye were dear unto us. For ye remember, 
brethren, our labour and travail ; for labouring night and day, be- 
cause we would not be chargeable unto any of you, we preached 
tin to you the gospel of God. Ycare witnesses, and God also, how 
ho'.iiy, and justly, and uublameable, we behaved ourselves among 
you that believe: as ye know, how we exhorted and comforted, 
and charged every one of you (as a father doth his children), 
l Thcss. ii. 7..H. 



m HOLY WAR. 



"hey approach the sinner. 



Wherefore they having received each commander 
his authority at the hand of their king ; the day be- 
ing appointed, and the place of their rendezvous pre- 
fixed, each commander appearing in such gallantry 
as his cause and calling required ; so after a new 
entertainment from Shabdai, with flying colours 
they set forward to march towards the famous tow;; 
of Maksoul. Captain Boanerges led' the van, 
captain Conviction and captain Judgment made 
up the main body, and captain Execution brought 
up the rear. They then having a great way to £o 
( for the town of Mansoul was far off from the court 
of Shaddai),* marched through the regions and 
countries of many people, not hurting or abusing 
any, but blessing wherever thjev came. They 
also lived upon the King's cost, all the way they 
went. 

Having travelled thus for many days, at last they 
came within sight of Mansoul ; the which when 
■they saw, the captains could not for their hearts rfp 
less than for a while bewail the condition of the 
town; for they quickly saw that it was prostrate to 
the will of Diabolus, and to his ways and de- 
signs. 



* J5iit now, hi Christ Jesus, yc who sometimes were afar of:', are 
made nigh by' the blood of Christ. For he is our peace, who hath 
made both one, and hath broken down the middle wall of the parti, 
tion between us ; having abolished in his flesh the enmity, even the 
law of commandments contained in ordinances ; for to make in him- 
self of twain one new man, to making peace ; and that lie might re- 
concile both unto God in one body by the cross, having slain the 
enmity thereby ; and came and preached peace to you which were 
W'at off, and to them that are nigh. jEph. ii. 13. .ii. 



HOLY WAT?. 53 



Who cannot but ^azc. 



Well, to be short, the captains come up before 
the town, march up to Ear-gate, and sit down 
(here ( for that was the place of hearing). So when 
they had pitched their tents, and intrenched them- 
selves, addressed themselves to make their assault. 

Now thetowsfolk at first, beholding so gallant 
a company, so bravely accoutred, and so excellent- 
ly disciplined, having on their glittering armour, 
and displaying their colours, could not but come out 
of their houses and gaze. But. the cunning fox Di- 
A bolus, fearing that the people, after this sight* 
should, on a sudden summons, open the gates 
to the captains, came down with all haste to X'r.o 
castle, and made them retire into the body of (ho 
to.vn ; who when he had them there, made this iy- 
U12; and dcceivable speech unto them, 

c Gentlemen, quoth he, although you are my 
' trusty and well-beloved friends, yet I cannot but 

* (a little) chide you for your late uncircumspectac- 
' tion* in going out to gaze on that great and mighty 
' force that but yesterday sat down before, and have 
' now intrenched themselves, in order to the main- 
' taining of the siege against the famous town of 
c Mansoul. Do you know who they are ? whence 
' they came ? and what is their purpose in sitting 

* down before the town of Mansoul ? They arc 
' they of whom I have told you loug ago, that they 

* would come to destroy this town, and against whom 

* I have been at the cost to arm you cap-a-pie for 

* your body, besides great fortifications for your 
♦"piind. Wherefore then did you not rather, even 



Si HOLY WAIL 



Satan' fears to lose the sinner. 



c at' the first appearance of them., cry out, Fire the 
' beacons, and give the whole town an alarm con- 

* cerning them, that we might all have been in a 

* posture of defence, and have been ready to have 
' received them with the highest acts of defiance ? 
f then had you shewed yourselves men to my liking, 

* whereas by what you have done, you have marie 

* me half afraid ; I say, half afraid, that when tliey 
' and we shall come to push a pike, I shall find you 

* want courage to stand it out any longer. Wherc- 

* fore have I commanded a watch, and that you 

* should double your guards at the gates ? Wherefore 

* have I endeavoured to make you as hard as iron and 
e your hearts as a piece ofthe nether mi li stone ? Was 

* it think you, that you might shew yourself women ; 
f and that you might go up like a company of inno- 

* cents to gaze on your mortal foe ? Fie, fie,putyour- 

* selves into a posture of defence, beat up the drum, 

* gather together in warlike manner, that our foes 

* may know, that, before they shall conquer this 

* corporation, there are valiant men in Mansoul. 

€ I will leave off now to chide, and will not further 

* rebuke you ; but charge you, that henceforwards 

* you let me see no more of such actions. Let not 
'■ Ifenceforwards a man of you, without orders fiist 
1 obtained from me, so much as shew his head over 
•* [iiewafl of the town of Mansoul : you have now 
c heard me; do as I have commanded, and you shall 
f cause me that I dwell securely with you, and that 
' as I take care for myself, so for your safety and 
'- honour also- Fare we!/ 



HOLY WAR. 56 



The gospel not listened 



Now were the townsfolk strangely altered ; thev 
were as men stricken with a panic fear : they ran to 
and fro in the streets of the town of Mansoul, 
crying out, c< Help ! help ! the men that turn 
<( the world upside down, are come hither also." 
Nor could any of them be quiet after ; but still, as 
men bereft of wit, they cried out, " The destroyers 
" of our peace and people are come." This went 
down with Diabolus : Ah ! quoth he to himself, 
this I like well, now it is as I would have it, now 
you shew your obedience to your prince ; hold you 
but here, and then let them take the town if they 
can. 

Well, before the King's forces had set before 
Mansoul three days, captain Boanerges com- 
manded his trumpeter to go down to Ear-gate : 
and there, in the name of the great Shaddai, to 
summon Mansoul to give audience to the message 
that he in his Master's name was commanded to de- 
liver to them. So the trumpeter, whose name was 
Take-iieed-what-ycu-hear, went up as he was 
commanded to Ear-gate, and there sounded his 
trumpet for a hearing : but there was none that ap- 
peared, that gave answer or ^egard, for so had Di- 
abolus commanded; so the trumpeter returned to 
his captain, and told faim what he had done, and 
also how he had sped ; whereat the captain was 
grieved, but bid the trumpeter go. to his tent. Again 
Boanerges sendeth his tru,mpeter to Ear-gate, to 
sound as before for an hearing ; hut they again 
kept close, came not out, oor would they give him 



5$ HOLY WAR. 



A third offer of tlic gospel. 



aa answer, so observant were they of the u&&- 
niand of Diabolus their king. Then the captains, 
and other field officers called a 'council of war, to 
consider .what further was to be done for gaining the 
town of Mansoul : and after some close and 
thorough debate upon the contents of their coin- 
missions, they concluded yet to give the town by the 
hand of the fore-named trumpeter, another summons 
to hear ; but if that shall be refused, say they, and 
that the town shall stand it out still,* then they de- 
termined, and bid the trumpeter tell them so, that 
they would endeavour by what means they could to 
compel them by force to the obedience of their 

So captain Boanerges commanded his trumpeter 
to go up to Ear-gate again, and, in the name of 
the great Ring Shaddai, to give it a very loud sum- 
mons to come down without delay to Ear-gate, 
there to give audience to the King's most noble cap- 
tains. So the trumpeter went, and did as he was 
commanded : he went up to Ear-gate, and sound- 
ed his trumpet, and gave a third summons to Man- 
soul, f He said moreover, that if this they should 
still refuse to do, the captains of his Prince would 
with might come down upon them, and endeavour 
to reduce them to their obedience by force. 

* And the lord said unto his servant, Go out into the highways 
and hedges, and compel them to come in, that my house may ha 
filled. Luke xiv. 2.'}. 

+ Cry aloud, spare not; lift up thy voice like a trumpet, and 
shew my people their -transgression, and the house of J'acob. thek 
Las. Isa. Iviii, i. 



HOLY WAR. 57 



A confer.' 



Tlien stood up my h-rd Will- be- will, * ho was 
the governor of the town (this Will-be- will was 
the apostate of whom raeni ion was made before), 
and the keeper of the gates of Mansoul. He there- 
fore, with big and ruffling words, demanded of the 
trumpeter, who he was, whence he came, and what 
was the cause of his making so hideous a noise at 
the gate, and speaking such insufferable words 
against the town of Mansoul? 

The trumpeter answered, I am servant to the 
most noble captain, captain Boanerges, general of 
(lie forces of the great KingSHADDAi, against whom 
thyself, and the whole town of Mansoul, have re- 
belled, and lift up the heel; and my master the 
captain hath a special message to this town, and 
to thee as a member thereof: the which if you of 
Mansoul shall peaceably hear, so; if not, take 
what follows 

Then said the lord Will-be will 3 I will carry 
the words to my lord, and will know what he will 
say. 

But the trumpeter replied, saying, Our message is 
not to the giant Diabolus, but to the miserable 
town of Mansoul : nor shall we at all regard what 
answer by him is made, nor yet by any for him ; 
we are sent to this town to recover it from under 
his cruel tyranny, and persuade it to submit, as in 
former times it did, to the most excellent King 
Shaddai. 

Then said the lord Will-be-will I will do your 
errand to the town. 

H 



58 HOLY WAR. 



Report of 'he conference. 



The trumpeter then replied, Sir,, clo not deceive 
us, lest, in so doing', you deceive yourselves much 
mofe. He added moreover, For we are resolved, if 
in peaceable manner you do not submit yourselves, 
then to make war upon you, and bring you under 
by force. And of the truth of what ! say^ this shall 
be a sign unto yon, you shall see the black flag, 
witb its hot burning thunderbolts, set upon the 
mount to-morrow, a token of defiance against your 
prince, and of our resolution to reduce you to our 
Lord and rightful King. 

So the said lord Will-be-will returned from 
off the wall, and the trumpeter came into the camp. 
When the trumpeter was come into the camp, the 
captains and officers of the mighty King Shaddai 
came together to know if he had obtained a hear- 
ing, and what was the effect of his errand. So the 
trumpeter told, saying, When I had sounded my 
trumpet, and called aloud to the town for a hearing, 
my lord Will-be-will-, the governor of the town, 
and that hath charge of the gates, came up, when he 
heard me sound, and, looking over the wall, he 
asked me what I was, whence I came, and what was 
the cause of this noise ? So I told him my errand, 
and by whose authority I brought it. Then said he, 
I will tell it the governor, and to Mansoul : and 
then I returned to my lord. 

Then said the brave Boanerges, Let us yet for 
a while still lie in our trenches, and see what these 
rebels will do. Now when the time drew nigh that 
audience by Mansoul must be given to the brave 



HOLY WAR. 59 



Preparation for war. 



Boanerges and his companions., it was commanded 
that all the men of war throughout the whole camp 
of Shaddai should, as one man, stand to their 
arms, and make themselves ready, if the town of 
Mansoul shall hear, to receive it forthwith to 
mercy; hut if not, to force it to a subjection. So 
the day being come, the trumpeters sounded, and 
that throughout the whole camp, that the men of 
war might be in readiuess for that which then should 
be the work of the day. But when they that were 
in the town of Mansoul heard the sound of the 
trumpet throughout the camp of Shaddai, and 
thinking no other but that it must be in order to 
storming the coporation, they at first were put to 
great consternation of spirit : but after they were a 
little settled again, they made what preparation 
they could for a vrar, if they did storm, else to se- 
cure themselves. 

Well, when the utmost time was come., Boaner- 
ges was resolved to hear their answer; wherefore 
he sent out his trumpeter again to summon Man- 
soul to a hearing of the message that they had 
brought from Shaddai; so he went and sounded, 
and the townsmen came up, but made Ear-gate 
as sure as they could.* Now when they were 
come up to the top of the wall, captain Boanerges 
desired to see the lord mayor; but my lord In- 
credulity was then lord mayor, for he came in 
the room of my lord Lustings: so Inckedulit? 

» But they refused to hearken, and pulled away the .shoulder, 
and stopped their ears, that they should not hear, Zech. Tii, 11. 



60 HOLY WAR. 



Boanerges' proclamation. 



came up and shewed himself over the wail. But 
when the captain Boanerges had set his eyes upon 
him., he cried out aloud, This is not he : where is 
my lord Understanding, the antient lord mayor 
of the town of Man soul ? for to him I would der 
liver my message. 

Then said the giant ( for Diabolus was also come 
down) to the captain, Mr. Captain you have by 
your boldness, given to Mansoul at least four sum- 
monses, to subject herself to your king ' by whose 
authority, I know not ; nor will I dispute that now. 
I ask, therefore what is the reason of all this ado ? 
or what would you be &t, if you knew yourselves ? 

Then captain Boanerges, whose were the black 
colours, and whose escutcheon was three burning 
thunderbolts (taking no notice of the giant, or of 
his speech), thus addressed himself to the town of 
Mansoul : Be it known unto you, O unhappy and 
rebellious Mansoul ! that the most gracious King, 
the great King Shaddai, my master, hath sent me 
unto you, with commission (and so he shewed to 
the town his broad seal) to reduce you to his obe- 
dience. And he hath commanded me, in case you 
yield upon my summons, to carry it to you as if you 
were my friends and brethren ; but he also hath bid, 
that if, after summons to submit, you still stand out 
and rebel, we should endeavour to take you by 
force. 

Then stood forth captain Conviction, and said, 
(his were the pale colours, and for a scutcheon he 
had the book of the law wide open, &c.) ' Hear, O 



HOLY WAR. 61 



Judgment pleads. 



' Mansoul: Thou, O Mansoul wast once fa- 
' mous tor innocency, but now thou art degenerated 
' into lies and deceit.* Thou hast heard what my 
' brother, the captain Boanerges, hatk just now 
f said, and it is your wisdom, and will be your hap- 
' piness to stoop to, and accept of, couditions of 

* peace and mercy, when offered ; especially when 

* offered by one, against whom thou hast rebelled, 
1 and one who is of power to tear thee in pieces, for 
' so is Shaddai our kin*? s '?n, when he is angry, 
' can any thing stand bcl\>*><; ..im. If you say you 
' have not sinned, or acted rebellion against our 
c King, the whole of your doings, since the day 

* As if. is Avritten, There is none righteous, no, not one : there is 
none that understandeth, there is none that seeketh after God. 
They are all gone out of -the way, they are together become un- 
profitable ; there is none that doeth good, no, not one. Their throat 
is an open sepulchre : with their tongues they have used deceit; the 
poison of asps is under their lips : whose mouth is full of cursing 
and bitterness : their feet are swift to shed blood : destruction and 
misery are in their ways; and the way of peacj have they not 
known : there is no fcariof God before their eyes. Now we know 
that what things soever the law saith, it saith to them who are un- 
der the law ; that every mouth may be stopped, and all the world 
may become guilty before God. For all have sinned and come 
short of the glory of God. Rom. iii. t0~19, 23. Now, I be- 
seech you, brethren, mark them which cause divisions and offences, 
contrary to the doctrine which ye have learned ; and avoid them. 
For they that are such serve not our Lord Jesus Christ, but their 
own belly : and by good words and fair speeches deceive the hearts 
of the simple. Horn. xvi. 17, 18. These things hast thou done, 
and I kept silence ; thou thoughtest that 1 was altogether such an 
one as thyself: but I will reprove thee, and set them in order before 
thine eyes. Now consider this, ye that forget God, lest I t$$y you 
si places, and there be none to deliver. Psal. I. 21 s 22. 



HOLY WAR. 



Conviction ursres Massoul *.:• obey. 



- that you cast off' his service (and there was thebe- 
' ginning of your sin), wiii sufficiently testify against 
■ you ; what else means your hearkening to the 
'tyrant, and your receiving him for your king? 
' What means else your rejecting the laws of Shad- 
f dai, and your obeying Diabolus ? Yea, what 
f means this your taking up arms against, and the 
[ shutting your gates upon us, the faithful servants 
' of your King ? Be ruled then, and accept of 
* my brother's invitation, and overstand not the time 
f of mercy, but agree with thine adversary quickly.* 
f Ah Mansoul ! suffer not thyself to be kept from 
f mercy, and to run into a thousand miseries, by 
'the flattering wiles of Diabolus: perhaps that 
'piece of deceit may attempt to make you Relieve, 
'that we seek our own profit in this our service : but 
'know, it is obedience to our King, and love to your 
'happiness, that is the cause of this undertaking of 
'ours.' 

c Again, I say unto thee, O Mansoul, consider 
'if it be not amazing grace, that Shaddai should 
-'so humble himself as he doth. Now he, by us 
'reasons with you, in a way of intreaty and sweet 
'persuasion,f that you would subject yourselves to 

* When thou goest with thine adversary to the magistrate, as 
th:u*artin the way give diligence that thou mayest be delivered 
fr im him ; lest he hale thee to the judge, and the judge deliver thee 
to the officer, and the officer cast thee into prison. I tell thee, thou 
shalt not depart thence, till thou hast paid the very last mite. 
Luke xii. 58,59. 

+ And all things are of God, who hath reconciled us to himself 
by Jesus Christ, and hath given to us the ministry of reconciliation 5 



HOLY WAR. 65 



rs resolve to oppose Go; 



* him. Has he that need of j ou, that we are sure you 
c have of him ? No, no ; but he is merciful, and 
' will not that Mansoul should die, but turn to him 
' and live.' 

Then stood forth captain Judgment, whose 
were the red colours, and for a scutcheon had the 
burning fiery furnace ; and he said, ' O ye inha- 
r bitants of the town of Mansoul, that have lived 

* so long in rebellion and acts of treason against the 
' King Shabdai ; know, that we come not to-day 
' to this place, in this manner, with our message, of 
'our own minds, or to revenge our own quarrel ; 
' it is the King our master that hath sent us to'sre- 
' duce you to your obedience to him ; the which if 
' you refuse in a peaceable way to yield, we have 
' commission to compel you thereto. And never 

* think of yourselves, nor yet suffer the tyrant Dia- 
' bolus to persuade you to think, that our King, 
' by his power, is not able to bring you down, and 
' lay you under his feet : for he is the Former of 
' all things ; and if he touches the mountains, they 
' smoke. Nor will the gate of the King's clemency 
' stand always open : for the day that shall burn like 
c an oven is before him: yea, it hasteth greatly, 



To wit, that God was in Christ, reconciling the world unto himself, 
not imputing their trespasses unto them; and hath committed unto 
us the word of reconciliation. Now then, we are ambassadors for 
Christ, as though God did beseech you by us : we pray you in 
Christ's stead, be ye reconciled to God. For he hath made him to 
be sin for us who knew no siu ; that we might be made the righ- 
teousness of God ia him. 2 Cor. v. is. .21. 



64 HOLY WAR. 



Terrors of the Lokd. 



* and slumbereth not.* O Mansoul, is it little in 

* thine eyes, that our king does offer thee mercy, 
r and that after so many provocations? Yea, he 
e still holdeth out his golden sceptre to thee,, and 
' will not suffer his gate to be shut against thee : 
' will thou provoke him to do it ? Consider of 
I what I say ; to thee it shall be opened no more for 
I ever. "■ If thou sayest thou shalt not see him, 
" yet judgment is before him ; therefore trust thou 
ff in him. Yea, because there is wrath, beware lest 
te he take thee away with his stroke ; then a great 
(c ransom cannot deliver thee. Will he esteem thy 
" riches ? No, not gold, nor all the forces of strength. 
" He hath prepared his throne for judgment; toy 
iC he will come with fire, and with his chariots, like 
" a whirlwind, to render his anger with fury, and ve- 
'/ bukes with flames of fire, "f c Therefore, O Man- 

* For, behold, the day cometh that shal burn as an oven ; and all 
theproud, yea, and all that do wickedly, shall be stubble : and 
the day that cometh shall burn them up, saith the Lord of hosts, 
that it shall leave them neither root nor branch. Mai. iv. 1 . And 
through covetousness shall they with feigned words make mer. 
chandize of you: whose judgment now of a long time lingereth 
not, and their damnation slumbereth not. 2 Pet. ii. 3. 

+ They die in youth, and their life is among the unclean. He 
delivereth the poor in his affliction, and openeth their ears in op- 
pression : even so would he have removed thee out of the strait into 
a broad place, where there is no straitness ; and that which should 
be set on thy table, should be full of fatness. But thou hast fulfilled 
the judgment of the wicked: judgment and justice take hold on 
thee. Because there is wrath, beware lest he take thee away with 
his stroke : then a great ransom cannot deliver thee. Job xxxvi. 
U..1S. But the Lord shall endure for ever: he hath pre- 
pared his throne for judgment. Psal. ix. T. For, behold, the 
Lord will come with fire, and with his chariots like a whirlwind, 



HOLY WAR. 65 



The execution of the law. 



* soul, take heed, lest, after thou hast fulfilled the 
'judgment of the wicked, justice and judgment 
'should take hold of thee.' Now, while captain 
Judgment was making this oration to the town of 
Mansoul, it was observed by some, that Diabolus 
trembled. But he proceeded in his speech, and 
said, c O thou woeful town of Mansoul ! wilt thou 
f nor yet set open the gate to receive us, the deputies 
' of the King, and those that would rejoice to see 
r thee live? " Can thine heart endure, or can 
" thine hands be strong, in the day that he shall 
ee deal in judgment with thee }" c I say, canst thou 
' endure to be forced to drink, as one would drink 

* sweet wine, the sea of wrath that our King has pre- 
' pared for Diabolus and his angels ? Consider^ 
' betimes consider/ 

Then stood forth the fourth captain, the noble 
captain Execution, and said : c O town of Man- 
f soul, once famous, but now like the fruitless 

* bough ; once the delight of the high ones, but now 
s a den fair Diabolus : hearken also to me, 
' and to the words that I shall speak to thee in the 

* name of the great king Shaddai. Behold, " the 

" axe is laid to the foot of the tree, every tree 

" therefore that bringeth not forth good fruit, is 

" hewn down and cast into the fire*" , 

to render his anger with fury, and his rebukes with Hames of fire, 
Isa. lxvi. 15. 

* But when he saw many of the Pharisees and &adducees come 
to his baptism, he said unto them, O Generation of vipers ! who bath 
warned you to flee from the wrath to come ? Bring forth, therefore, 
I 



m HOLY WAR. 



The axe laid at the root. 



' Thou, O town of Mansoul, hast hitherto been 
' this fruitless tree ; thou bearest nought but thorns 
b and briers. Thy evil fruit forespeaks thee not 
i to be a good tree : thy grapes are grapes of gall, 
1 thy clusters are bitter.* Thou hast rebelled against 

* thy King ; and lo we., the power and force of 
s Shad dai, are the axe that is laid to thy roots, 
' What sayest thou ? Wilt thou return ? I say 

* again, Tell me, before the first blow is given, 
' wilt thou turn? Our axe must first be laid to 
' thy root, before it be laid at thy root ; it must 

* first be. laid to thy root in a way of threatening^ 
i before it is laid to thy root by way of execution ; 
f - and between these two is required thy repentance, 
i and this is all the time thou hast. What wilt 
f thou do ? Wilt thou turn, or shall I smite ? If 
' I fetch my blow, Mansoul, down you go : 
i for I have commission to lay my axe at, as well 
3 to, thy root ; nor will any thing, but yielding to 

* our King, prevent doing of execution. What 
' art thou fit for, O Mansoul, if mercy preventeth 
s not, but to be hewn down and cast into the fire 
'■ and burnt ? 

* O Mansoul ! patience and forbearance eta 

fruits meet for repentance: And think not to say within yourselves 
We have Abraham to our father : for I Say unto you, That God is 
able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham. And now 
also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees ; therefore every tree 
which bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into 
4he fire. Matt. iii.T..10. 

* For their vine is of the vine of Sodom, and of the fields of Go. 
aiorrah; their grapes are grapes of gall, their clusters are bitter. 
Beut. xn.&L 38» 



HOLY WAR. - 67 



Max so ex. refuses to hearken. 



k not act, for ever: a year or two or three, they 
' may ; but if thou provoke by a three years rebel - 

* lion (and thou hast already done more than this,) 

* then what follows, " but cut it down ?" nay after 
1 that, <c thou shalt cut it down,"* And dost thou 

* think that these are but threatenings, or that our 
' King has not power to execute his words ? O 
' Mansoul, thou wilt find in the words of our 

* King, when they are by sinners made little or 

* light of, there is not only threatening, but bum* 
' ing coals of fire. 

1 Thou hast been a cumber-ground long already, 

* and wilt thou continue so still ? Thy sin has 

* brought his army to thy wails, and shall it bring 

* in j udgmcnt to do execution to thy town ? 

* Thou hast heard what the captains have said, but 
e as yet thou shuttest thy gates : speak out, Man- 
c soul, wilt thou do so still ; or wilt thou accept of 
' conditions of peace ?' 

These brave speeches of these four noble cap- 
tains the town-of Mansoui refused to hear ; yet 
a sound thereof did beat against Ear-gate, though 
the force thereof could not break it open. la fine, 
the town desired a time to prepare their answer to 
these demands. The captains then told them, 

* that if they would throw out to them one III- 
' pause, r that was in the town, that they might re- 
' ward him according to bis works, then they would 

* give them time to consider : but if they would 

* And if it bear fruit, w :!h aodifasot, then after that tatit 
dewn. Luke zin. 9. 



#8 HOLY WAR; 



Incredulity opposes God's message. 

' not cast h'mrto them over the wall of Mansoul, 

* then they would give them none : for, said they, 
' we know, that so long as Ill-pause draws breath 

* in Mansoul, all good considerations will be con- 
' founded, and nothing but mischief will come 
' thereon'. 

Then Diabolus, who was there present, being 
loth to lose Ill-pause., because he was his orator 
(and yet be sure he had, could the captains have 
laid their fingers on him,) was resolved at this instant 
to give them answer by himself; but then changing 
his mind, he commanded the then lord mayor, the 
lord Incredulity to do it, saying, My lord, do you 
give these renegades an answer, and speak out, that 
Mansoul may hear and understand you. 

So Incredulity, at Diabolus's command, be- 
gan and said, c Gentlemen,, you have here as we do 
' behold, to the disturbance of our prince, and rao- 
e lestation of the town of Mansoul, encamped 

* against it : but from whence you come we will 
f not know ; and what you are we will not believe. 
f Indeed, you tell us in your terrible speech, that 

* you have this authority from Shaddai: but by 

* what right he commands you to do it, of that we 
' shall be ignorant. 

e You have also, by the authority aforesaid, sum- 
' moned this town to desert her lord, and for pro- 
jection to yield up herself to the great Shaddai 
f. your king : flatteringly telling her, that if she will 

* do it, he will pass by, and not charge her with her 
' past offences. 



HOLY WAR. 



God's wrath dcEed. 



' Further, you have also to the terror of the town 

* of -Mansoul, threatened with great and sore des- 
1 truction to punish ibis corporation, if she consents 
'■ not to do as your wills would have her. 

* Now, captains, from whencesoever you come, 

* and though your designs be ever so right, yet 

* know ye, that neither my lord Diabolus, nor I 
-' his servant Incredulity, nor yet our brave 
' Mansoul, doth regard either your persons, mes- 
' sage, or the king that you say hath sent you : his 
' power, his greatness, his vengeance we fear not ; 

* nor will we yield at all to yoar summons. 

f As for the war that you threaten to make upon 

* us, we must therein defend ourselves as well 
f as we can : and know ye, that we are not 
r without wherewithal to bid defiance to you, 

* And in short, (for I will not be tedious) I tell you 
'■ that \vc take you to be some vagabond runagate 
' crew, who, having shaken off all obedience to your 

* king, have gotten together in a tumultuous manner, 
'. and are ranging from place to place, to sec i£ 
' through those flatteries you are skilled to make, 
' on the one side, and threats therewith you think 
' to fright on the other, you can make some silly 
' town, city or country, to desert their place, and 

* leave it to you : but Mansoul is none of theme 

f To conclude: We dread you not, we fear you 
( not, nor will we obey your summons: our gates 
1 we will keep shut against you, our place we will 
f keep you out of; nor will we long (bus suffer you 
s to sit down before us. Our people must live in 



fO HOLY WAR. 

The messengers threatened. 

* quiet : your appearance doth disturb thetn* 

* wherefore, arise with bag and baggage, and begone 

* or we will let fly from the walls against you.' 

This oration made by old Incredulity, was 
seconded by desperate Will-be-will, in words to 
this effect.* 

* Gentlemen, We have heard your demand, and 
e the noise of your threats, and heard the sound of 

* your summons ; but we fear not your force, we 
' regard not your threats, but we will abide as you 
e found us. And we command you, that in three 

* days time you cease to appear in these parts, or you 

* shall know what it is once to dare to offer to rouse 
' the lion Diabolus, when asleep in the tows 
f of Mansoul.' 

The recorder, whose name was Forget-good, 
he also added as followeth : 

4 Gentlemen, my lords, as you see, haYe with 
' mild and gentle words answered your rough and 

* angry speeches ; they have, moreover, in my hear- 
e i u g> given you leave quietly to depart as^yoq 
' came: wherefore take their kindness and be gone, 

* We might have come out with force upon you, 

* and have caused you to feel the dint of our swords ; 

* but as we love ease and quiet ourselves, so we 

* love not to hurt or molest others/ 

Then did the town of Mansoul shout for joy ; 
as if by Diabolus and his crew some great advan- 
tage had been obtained over the captains. They 

* When a strong man armed keepeth his palace, his goorfs srfeiii 
•peace, Luke xi. 21 



HOLY WAK. 



Frkjudice stops men's ears. 



also rang the bells, and made merry, and danced 
upon the walls. 

Diabolus also returned to the castle, and the 
lord mayor and recorder to their places : but the 
lord Will-be-w ill took special care that the gates 
should he secured with double guards, double holts, 
and double locks and bars. And that Ear-gate 
especially might be the better looked to (for that 
was the gate in at which the King's forces sought 
most to enter), the lord Will-be-will made one 
old Mr. Prejudice, an angry and ill-conditioned 
fellow, captain of the ward at that gate; and put 
under his power sixty men, called deaf men ; men 
advantageous for that service, forasmuch as they 
mattered no words of the captains or of the sol- 
diers. 

Now when the captains heard the answer of the 
great ones, and they could not get a hearing from 
the old natives of the town, and that Mansoul was 
resolved to give the King's army battle ; they pre- 
pared themselves to receive them, and to try it out 
by the power of the arm. And, first, they made 
their force more formidable against Ear-gate ; 
for they knew that unless they could penetrate that, 
no good could be done upon the town. This done, 
they put the rest of their men in their places. After 
which they gave out the word, which was, Ye must 
be born again. Then they sounded the trumpet 2 
then they in the town made answer, with shout 
against shout, charge against charge and so the 
battle began. Now they in the towD had planted 



TS IIOLV WAK. 



Satan's artillery. 



upon Mansoue, over Ear-gate, two great guns, 
the one called High- mind, and the other Heady. 
Unto these two guns they trusted much ; they were 
cast in the castle by Diabolus's founder, whose 
name was Mr. Puff-up : and mischievous pieces 
they were. But so vigilant and watchful were the 
captains when they saw them, that though some- 
times their shot would go by their ears with a whiz, 
jet they did them no harm. By these two guns, the 
townsfolk made no question but greatly to annoy 
the camp of Shaddai, and well enough to secure 
the gate ; but they had not much cause to boast of 
what execution they did, as from what follows will 
fee gathered. 

The famous town of ManbouI had also some 
other small pieces in it, of the which they made use 
against the camp of Shaddai. 

They from the camp also did as stoutly, and with 
as much of that as may in truth be called valour, let 
fly as fast at the town, and at Ear-gate : for they 
saw, that unless they could break open Ear-gate, 
it would be but in vain to batter the wall. Now 
the King's captains had brought with them several 
slings, and two or three battering-rams : with their 
slings, therefore, they battered the houses and 
people of the town, and with their rams they sought 
to break Ear-gate open. 

The camp and town had several skir- 
mishes and brisk encounters; while the captains, 
with their engines, made many brave attempts 
to break open and beat down the tower that 



HOLY \V\\R, 73 



The sinner bravc9 it cut. 



was over Ear-gate, and at the said gate to make 
their entrance : but Mansoul stood it out so lus- 
tily, through the rage of Diabolus, the valour of 
the lord Will-be-will> and the conduct of old 
Incredulity the major, and Mr. Fcrget-good 
the recorder, that the charge and expeuce of that 
fu miner's wars (on the King's side) seemed to he al- 
most entirely losf, and the advantage to return to 
Mansoul : but when the captains saw how it was, 
they made a fair retreat, and intrenched themselves 
in their winter quarters. Now in this war, you must 
needs think there was much loss on both sides, of 
which be pleased to take this brief account, following. 
The King's captains, when they marched from 
the court to come against Mansoul to war, as they 
came crossing over the country, they happened to 
light upon three young men that had a mind to go 
for soldiers ; proper men they were, and men of 
courage (and skill) to appearance. Their names 
were Mr. Tradition, Mr. Human-wisdom, and 
Mr. Man's-invention. So they came up to the 
captains, and proffered their service to Shaddai. 
The captains then told them of their design, and bid 
them not to be rash in their offers ; but the young men 
told them that they had considered the thing before, 
and that hearing they were upon their march for 
such a design, came hither on purpose -to meet 
them, that they might be listed under their excel- 
lencies. Then captain Boanerges, for that they 
were men of courage, listed them into his company* 
and so away they went to the war. 



HOLY WAR. 



The recruits enter Satan's service. 



Now when the war was begun, in one of the brisk- 
est skirmishes, so it was, that a company of the 
lord Will-be-will's men sallied out of the sally 
ports, or posters of the town, and fell in upon the 
rear of captain Boanerges 's men where these three 
fellows happened to be, so he took them prisoners, 
and away they carried them into the town ; where 
they had not lain long in durance, but it began to be 
noised about the streets of the town, what three no- 
table prisoners the lord Will-be-will's men had 
taken, and brought in prisoners out of the camp of 
Sh addai. At length tidings thereof were carried to 
Diabolus to the castle, to, wit, what my lord Will- 
be-will's men had done, and whom they had taken 
prisoners. 

Then Diabolus called for Will-be-will, to 
know the certainty of this matter. So he asked him, 
and he told him. Then did the giant send for the 
prisoners, and when they were come, he demanded 
of them who they were, whence they came, and what 
they did in the camp of Sh addai ? and they told 
him. Then he sent them into ward again. Not 
many days after he sent for them to him again, and 
then asked them, if they would be willing to serve 
Iiim 'against their former captains ? they then told 
him, that they did not so much live by religion, as 
by the fates of fortune ; and that since his lordship 
was willing to entertain them, they should be wil- 
ling to serve him. Now while these things were 
thus in hand, there was one captain Any-thing, a 
great doer in the town ©fMANsouL, and to this 



HOLY WAR. 



The effects of the war. 



captain Anv-thing did Diabolus send these 
three men, with a note under his hand to receive 
them into his company ; the contents of which letter 
were these : 

' Any-thing, my darling, the three men that 
* are the bearers of this letter have a desire to serve 
f me in the war : nor know I better to whose con- 
' duct to commit them, than to thine : receive them 
e therefore in my name, and as need shall require > 
' make use of them against Shaddai and his men. 
' Farewel.' So they came, and he received them, 
and he made two of them Serjeants ; but he made 
Mr. Man's-invention his Armour Bearer. But 
thus much for this, and now to return to the camp. 

They of the camp did also some execution upon 
the town ; for they did beat down the roof of the 
new lord mayor's house, and so laid him more open 
than he was before. They had almost ( with a sling y 
slain my lord Will-be-will out-right, but he made 
shift to recover again. But they made a notable 
slaughter among the aldermen, for with only one 
shot they cut off six of them: to wit, Mr. Swear- 
ing, Mr. Whoring, Mr. Fury, Mr. Stand-to- 
lies, Mr, Drunkenness, and Mr. Cheating. 

They also dismounted the two great guns that 
stood upon the tower over Ear-gate, and laid 
them flat in the dirt. I told you before, that the 
King's noble captains had drawn off to their win- 
ter-quarters, and had there intrenched themselves 
and their carriages, so as with the best advantage 
to their King, and the greatest annoyance to the 



tdi HOLY WAft. - 



The sinner in a state of alarm. 



enemy, they might give the seasonable and warm 
alarms to the town of Ma.nsoul. And this design 
©f them did so hit, that I may say they did almost 
what they would to the molestation of the corpo- 
ration. 

For now could not Mansoul sleep securely as 
before, nor could they now go to their debauche- 
ries with that quietness as in times past: for they 
had from the camp of Shadda! such frequent 
warm alarms; yea, alarms upon alarms, first at one 
gate, and then at another, and again at all the gates 
at once ; that they were broken as to former peace : 
yea, they had their alarms so frequently, and that 
when the nights were at the longest, the weather 
coldest, and so consequently the season most un- 
seasonable, and that that winter was to Mansoul 
a winter by itself. Sometimes the trumpets would 
sound, and sometimes the slings would whirl the 
stones into the town. Sometimes ten thousand of 
the King's soldiers would be running round the 
walls of Mansoul at midnight, shouting, and lift- 
ing up their voice for the battle. Sometimes again, 
some of them in the town would be wounded, and 
their cry and lamentable voice would be heard, to 
the great molestation of the now languishing town 
of Mansoul. Yea, so distressed were they with 
those that laid siege against them, that Idare saj 
Diabolus their king had in these days his rest 
much broken. 

In those days, as I was informed, new thoughts, 
sp4 thoughts that began to run counter one to 



holy war. 77 



Divided in hi* thoughts. 



another, by degrees possessed the minds of the 
men of the town of Mansoul. Some would 
say, ' There is no living- thus/ Others would 
then reply, ( This will be. over shortly. Then would 
a third stand up and answer, * Let us turn to king 
f Shad dai, and so put an end to all these trou- 
' bles/ And a fourth would come in with a fair 
speech;, saying-, f I doubt he will not receive us.' 

The old gentleman too', the recorder, that was 
so before Diabolus took Mansoul, he also began 
to talk aloud, and his words were now to the town 
of Mansoul as if they were great claps of thunder. 
No noise now so terrible in Mansoul as was his a 
with the noise of the soldiers, and shoutings of the 
captains. 

Also things began to grow scarce in Mansoul; 
now the things that her soul lusted after departed 
from her.* Upon all her pleasant things there was 
a blast, and burning instead of beauty. Wrinkles 
now, and some shews of the shadow of death, were 
upon the inhabitants of Mansoul. And now, O 
bow glad would Mansoul have been to have en- 
joyed quietness and satisfaction of mind, tho' joined 
with the meanest condition in the world ! 

The captains also, in the deep of winter, did send, 
by the mouth of Boanerges' trumpeter, a sum- 
mons to Mansoul, to yield up herself to the King, 
the great King Shaddai. They sent it once, and 

* And, when he had spent ail, .there arose a mighty famine in 
jSilrtt laud ; auuHie began to be in want. Luke xv. l%* 



78 HOLY WAR. 



Offers of mercy renewed. 



twice, and thrice ; not knowing but that at some 
time there might be in Mansoul some willingness 
to surrender up themselves unto them, might they 
but have the colour of an invitation to doit under. 
Yea, so far as I could gather, the town had been 
surrendered up to them before now, had it not been 
for tfre opposition of old Incredulity, and the 
fickleness of the thoughts of my lord Will-be- 
will. Diabolus also began to rave; wherefore 
Mansoul, as to yielding, was not as yet all of oiie 
mind, therefore they still lay distressed under these 
perplexing fears. 

I told you but now, that they of the King's ar» 
any had this winter *ent three times to Mansoul, to 
submit herself. 

The first time the trumpeter went, he went with 
the words of peace, telling them, that the captains, 
the uoble captains of Shaddai, pitied and bewail^ 
ed the misery of the now perishing town of Man • 
soul, and were troubled to see them stand so much 
in the way of their own deliverance. He said, 
moreover, that the captains bid him tell them, 
that if now poor Mansoul would humble' herself, 
and turn, her former rebellions and most notorious 
treasons should, by their most merciful King, be 
forgiven them, yea, and forgotten too. And hav- 
ing bid them beware that they stood not in their 
own way, that they opposed not themselves, nor 
made themselves their own losers, he returned 
again into the camp. 

The second time the tzumpeter went, he treated 



HOLY WAR. 79 



Threatening*. 



them a little more roughly; for after sound of trum- 
pet he told them, that their continuing in their re- 
bellion did but chafe and heat the spirit of the cap- 
tains, and that they were resolved to make a con- 
quest of Mansoul, or lay their bones before, the 
town walls. 

He went again the third time, and dealt with them 
yet more roughly ; telling them, that now, since they 
had been so horribly profane, he did not know, not 
certainly know whether the captains were inclined 
to mercy or judgment ; only, said he, they com- 
manded me to give you a summons to open the gates 
unto them : so he returned, and went into the camp. 
These three summons, and especially the two last, 
so distressed the town, that they presently call a 
consultation, the result of which was this, that my 
lord Will-be-will should go up to Ear-gate, 
and there, with sound of trumpet, call to the cap- 
tains of the camp for a parley. Well, the lord 
Will-be will sounded upon the wall; so the 
captains came up in their harness, with their tea 
thousands at their feet. The townsmen then told 
the captains that they had heard and considered 
their summons, and would come to an agreement 
with them and with their king Shaddai, upon such 
certain terms, articles and propositions, as, with and 
by the order of their prince, they to them were ap- 
pointed to propound : to wit, they would agree up- 
on these grounds to be one people with them. 

1. * If that those of their own company, as the- 
* now lord mayor, and their Mr. Fo&oet-gooi), 



m flOLY WAK. 



Sinners want f.o retain their lusts. 



* with their brave lord Will-be-will, might, un- 

* der 'Shadd ai, be still the governors of the town, 
s castle and gates of Mansoul. 

2 ' Provided that no man, that now served under 

* the great giant Diaeolus, be by Sfiaddai cast 

* out of house, harbour, or the freedom that he 
' hath hitherto enjoyed in the famous town of 
*' Mansoul. 

. B ( That it shall be granted them, that they of 

* the town of Mansoul enjoy certain of their rights 

* and privileges ; to wit, such as have formerly been 

* granted them, and that they have long lived in 
e the enjoyment of, under the reign of their king 

* Diabolus, that now is, and long has been, their 

* only lord and great defender. 

4l ' That no new law, officer, or executioner of 
f law or office, shall have any power over them, 
c without their own choice and consent. 

c These be our propositions, or conditions of 
'peace: and upon these terms, said tliey, we will 
e submit to your King.' 

Rut when the captains had heard this weak and 
feeble offer of the town of Mansoul, and their 
high and bold demands, they made to them again; 
by their noble captain, the captain Boanerges^ 
this speech following : 

c O ye inhabitants of the town of Mansoul, 

* when I heard your trumpet sound for a parley 

* w itli us, I can truly say, I was glad ; but when 

* you said you were willing to submit yourselves to 
' our Lord and King, then I was yet more glad : 



HOLY WAR. 81 



Sin and salvation -annot be joined. 



" but when by your silly provisos and foolish cavils 
' you laid the stumbling-block of your iniquity be- 
•' fore your faces, then was my gladness turned into 

* sorrow, and my hopeful beginnings of your return 
' into languishing and fainting fears. 

' I count, that old Ill-pause, the ancient enemy 
' of Maxsoul, drew up these proposals that now 
' you present us with, as terms of agreement ; but 
' they deserve not to be admitted to sound in the 
' ear of any man that pretends to have serrice fof 
' Shaddai. We do therefore jointly, and that 
' with the highest disdain, refuse and reject such 
' things, as the greatest of iniquities.* 

( But, O Mansoul, if you will give yourselves 
s into our hands, or rather into the hands of our 

* King, and will trust him to make such terms with 
f you and for you as shall seem good in his eyes 

* (and I dare say they shall be such as you shall 

* find to be most profitable to you ), then we will re- 
c ceive you, and be at peace with you : but if you like 
** not to trust yourselves in the arms of Shaddai 

* our King, then things are but where they were be- 
" fore, an we know also what we have to do.' 

Then cried out old Incredulity, the lord mayor, 
and said, c And who, being out of the hands of their 
r enemies, as we see we are now, will be so foolish as 
c to put the staff out of their own" hands into the 



* Nevertheless rhe foundation of God standeih sure, having this 
seal, The Lord knoweth them that are his. And, Lei every one that 
he uame of Chnsi depart from kiqnltj . 9. Tim. ii, 10- 



HOLY WAR. 



Evil report of God's laws. 



1 bands of they know not who ? I, for my part, will 

* never yield to so unlimited a proposition. Do you 

* know the manner and temper of their King ? 'Tis 
' said by some, that he will be angry with his sub- 
' jects, if but the breadth of an hair they chance to 

* step out of the way : and by the others, that he re- 
; quireth of them much more than they can per- 
■ form. Wherefore it seems, O Mansoul, to be 
c thy wisdom to take good heed what thou dost in 
f this matter; for if you once yield, you give up 
6 yourselves to another, and so you are no more 

* your own : wherefore to give up yourselves to an 
''unlimited power, is the greatest folly in the world ; 
' for now indeed you may repent, but can never 
'justly complain. But do you indeed know, when 

* you are his, which of you he will kill, and which 
' of you he will save alive? or whether he will not 
( cut off every one of us, and send out of his country 
' another new people, and cause them to inhabit 
' this town ?' 

This speech of the lord mayor undid all, and 
threw flat to the ground their hopes of an accord : 
wherefore the captains returned to their trenches, 
to their tents, and to their men, as they were; and 
the mayor to his castle, and to his king. 

Now Diabolus had waited for his return, for he 
ihad heard that they had been at their points. So 
when he was come into the chamber of state, 
Diabolus saluted him with, c Welcome, my lord, 
e how went matters betwixt you to-day ?' Then the 
lord Incredulity (with a low conge) told him the 



HOLY WAR. . 85 



Incredulity Satan's best friend. 

•whole of the matter, saying ; Thus said the captain 
ofSHADDAij and thus and thus said I. The which 
as it-was told to Diabolus, he was very glad to 
hear ; and said, ' My lord-mayor, my faithful 
f Incredulity, I have proved thy fidelity above 
' ten times already, but never found thee false. I 
' do promise thee, if we rub over this brunt, to prefer 
' thee to a place of honour, a place far better than 
' to be lord-mayor of Mansoul : I will make thee 
' my universal deputy ; and thou shalt, next to me, 
•' have ail nation 5 under thy hand ; vca, thou. shalt 
1 lav hands upon them, that they may not resist 
r thee ; nor shall any of our vassals walk more at 
' liberty, but those that shall be content to walk in 
* thy fetters.' 

Now came the lord-mayor out from Diabolus, 
as if he had obtained a favour indeed : wherefore 
to his habitation he goes in great state, and thinks to 
feed himself well enough with hopes, until the time 
came that his greatness should be enlarged. 

But dow, though the lord-mayor and Diabolus 
did thus well agree, yet this repulse to the brave 
captains put Mansoul into a mutiny; for while 
old Incredulity went into the castle, to congratu- 
late with his lord on what had passed, the old lord- 
mayor that was so before Diabolus came to the 
town, to wit, my lord Understanding, and the 
old recorder Mr. Conscience, getting intelligence of 
what had passed at Ear-gate (for you must know 
that they might not be suffered to be at that debate, 
lest they should then have mutinied for the captains ) ; 



HOLY WAR. 



Tumult in the soul at the remonstrance of Conscience. 

but I say, they got intelligence of what had passed 
there, and were much concerned therewith : where- 
fore the j getting some of the town together, began 
to possess them with the reasonableness of the noble 
captains' demands, and with the bad consequences 
that would follow upon the speech of old Incre- 
dulity the lord-major : to wit, how little reverence 
be shewed therein, either to the captains, or their 
King; also how he implicitly charged them 
with unfaithfulness and treachery : for what less, 
quoth he, could be made of his words, when he said 
be would not yield to their proposition ? and ad- 
ded moreover, a supposition that he would destroy 
us, when before he had sent us word, that he would 
shew us mercy ? The multitude, being now pos- 
sessed with the conviction of the evil old Incre- 
dulity had done, began to run together in com- 
panies in all places, and in every corner of the 
streets of Mansoul ; and first they began to mut- 
ter, then to talk openly ; and after that they ran to 
and fro and cried as they ran, O the brave cap- 
tains of Shaddai ! Would we were under the 
government of the captains, and of Shaddai their 
King ! When the lord-mayor had intelligence, that 
Mansoul was in an uproar, down he comes to ap- 
pease the people, and thought to have quashed 
their heat with the bigness and the shew of his 
countenance. But when they saw him, they came 
running upon him, and had doubtless done him 
mischief, bad he not betaken himself to his house. 
However they strongly assaulted the house where 



HOLY W\\l. S5 



The understanding approves God's laws. 

he was, to have pulled it about his ears; but the 
place was too strong, so they failed of that. Then 
he, faking some courage, addressed himself out of 
a window to the people in this manner : 

' Gentlemen, what is the reason that there is 
' such an uproar here to-day?' 

Then answered my lord Understanding, c It 
' is even because thou and thy master have carried 
it not rightly, and as you should, to the captains 
' of Shaddai; for in three things thou art faulty : 
' First, in that you would not let Mr. Conscience 
' and myself be at the hearing of your discourse. 
'Secondly, in that you propounded such terms of 
' peace to the captains, which could by no means 
' he granted, unless they had intended that their 
' Shaddai should have been only a titular prince; 
' and that Mansoul should s!iil have had power, 
' by law, to have lived in all vanity and lewdness 
' before him, and so by consequence Diabolus 
' should still here be king in power, and the other 
' only king in name. Thirdly, for that thou didst. 
' thyself, after the captains had shewed us upon 
' what conditions they would have received to mer- 
' cy, even undo all again with thy unsavory, un- 
1 seasonable, and ungodly speech/' 

When old Incredulity had heard this speech, 
he cried out, ' Treason ! Treason ! To your arms ' 
' O ye, the trusty friends of Diaeolus in Man- 

' SOUL !' 

Under. Sir, you may put upon my words what 
construction you please, but I am sure that the 



S6 HOLY WAR. 



Conscience supports the understanding. 



captains of such an high Lord as theirs is deserved a 
better treatment at your hands. 

Then said old Incredulity, ' This is but little 
w ' better. But, Sir, quoth he, what 1 spake, I spake 

* lor my prince, for his government, and the quiets 
4 ingof the people, whom, by your unlawful actions, 

* you have this day set to mutiny against us.' 

Then replied the old recorder:, whose name was 
Mr. Conscience, and said, ' Sir, you ought not 

* thus to retort upon what my lord Understand- 

* ing hath said: it is evident enough that he hath 
' spoken the truth, and that you are an enemy to 
c Mansoul ; be convinced then of the evil of 
'your saucy and malapert language, and of the 
' grief that you have put the captains to ; yea, and 
f of the damages that you have done to Mansoul 

* thereby. Had you accepted^ of the conditions, the 
f sound of the trumpet and the alarm of war had 
*• now ceased about the town of Mansoul ; but 
e that dreadful sound abides, and your want of 
' wisdom in your speech has beeen the cause of it.' 

Then said old Ix credulity, 'Sir, If Hive, I will 
k do your errand to Diabolus, and there you shall 
' have an answer to your words. Meanwhile we 
•' will seek the good of the town, and not ask coun- 
c gel of you.' , 

Under. Sir, ypu'R prince and you are foreigners 
io Mansoul, and ' not the natives thereof. And 
who can tell but that . whea you have brought us 
into greater straits (when you also shall see that 
yourselves can be safe by no other means than by 



HOLY WAK. Si 



Conscience and Passion disagree. 



flight), you may leave us, and shift for yourselves, 
or set us on tire, and go away in the smoke, or by 
the light of our burning, and so leave us in our 
ruins. 

Incre. "Sir, you forget that you are under a 
governor, and that you ought to demean yourself 
like a subject ; and know ye, when my lord the king 
shall hear of this day's work, he will give you but 
little thanks for your labour. 

Now while these gentlemen were thus in their 
chiding words, down come from the walls and gates 
of the town the lord Will-el-will, Mr. Preju- 
dice, old Ill-pause, and several of the new made 
alderman and burgesses ; and they asked the reason 
of the hubbub and tumult. And with that every man 
began to tell his own tale, so that nothing could be 
heard distinctly.. Then was silence commanded, 
and the old fox, Incredulity - , began to speak ; 

* My lord, quoth he, here are a couple of peevish 
f gentlemen, that have, as a fruit of their bad dis- 
' positions, and, as I fear, through the advice of one 

* Mr. Discontent, tumultuous! v gathered this 

* company against this day ; and also attempted to 
' run the town into acts of rebellion against our 
' prince.' 

Then stood up all the Diaeolonians that were 
present, and affirmed these things to be true. 

Now when they that took the part of my lord 
Understanding, and with Mr. Conscience, 
perceived that they ^were like to come by the 
worst, for that force and power" was on the other 



f* HOLY WAIL 



Violent commotions in (he soul. 



side, they came in for their help and relief ; soa 
great company was on both sides. Then they on 
Incredulity's side would have had the two old 
gentlemen presently away to prison ; but they on 
the other side said they should not. Then they 
began to cry up parties again ; the Diabolonians 
cry up old Incredulity, Forget-good, the new 
aldermen, and their great one Diabolus ; and the 
other party as fast cried up Shaddai, the captains, 
his laws, their mercifulness, and applauded their 
conditions and ways. Thus the bickevment went 
a while, at last they passed from words to blows, 
and now there were knocks on both sides. The 
good old gentleman, Mr. Conscience was knocked 
down twice by one of the Diabolonians, whose 
name was Mr. Benumbing. And my lord Un- 
derstanding had like to have been slain with an 
harquebus, but that he that had shot, failed to take 
his aim aright. Nor did the other side wholly es- 
cape: for there was one Mr. Rash-head, a Di- 
abolian, that had his brains beaten out by one 
Mr. Mind, the lord Will-be-wili/s servant: and it 
made me laugh to see how old Mr. Prejudice was 
kicked and tumbled about in the dirt: for though a 
while since he was made a captainof the Diabolo- 
nians, to the hurt and damage of th.e town, yet now 
they had got him under their feet : and I'll assure, 
you he had, by some of the lord Understand- 
ing's party, his crown cracked to boot. Mr. Any- 
thing also became a brisk man in the broil; but 
both sides were against him, because be was true to- 



HOLY WAK. 89 



Understanding and Conscience corvfiocsi. 



Done. Yet he had for his malapertness one of his 
legs broken ; and he that did it, wished it had been 
his neck. Much harm moTe was done on both 
sides : but this must not be forgotten, it was now a 
wonder to see my lord Will-be-wjll so indifferent 
as he wa3 ; he did not seem to take one side more 
than another, only it was pereeived that he smiled 
to see how ol-d Prejudice was tumbled up and 
down in the dirt ; also when captain Any-thing 
came halting up before him, he seemed to take but 
little notice of him. 

]\ow when the uproar was over, Diabolus sends 
for my lord Understanding and Mr. Con- 
science, and claps them both up in prison, as the 
ringleaders and managers of this most heavy riotous 
rout in Mansoul. So now the town began to be 
quiet again, and the prisoners were used hardly ; 
yea, he thought to have made them away, but 
that the present juncture did not serve for that 
purpose, for that wax was in all their gates. But 
let us return to our story : the captains, when they 
were gone back from the gate, and were come into 
the camp again, called a council of war, to consult 
what was further for them to do. Now some said, 
Let us go presently and fall upon the town : but ths 
greatest part thought, rather better 'twould be to 
give them another summons to yield ; and the rea- 
son why they thought this to be the best, was, be- 
cause that, so far as could be perceived, the town 
of Mansoul now was more inclinable than hereto- 
fore. And if, said they, while some of them are in 
an 



90 HOLY WAR. 



Another invitation to Mansoul 



a way of inclination, we should by ruggedness give 
them distaste, we may set them further from closing 
with our summons, than we would be willing they 
should. 

Wherefore to this advice they agreed, and called 
a trumpeter, put words into his mouth, set him his 
time, and bid him God speed. Well, many hour? 
were not expired, before the trumpeter addressed 
himself to his journey. Wherefore, coming up to 
the wall of the town, he steered his course to Ear- 
gate ; and there sounded, as he was commanded. 
They then that were within, came out to see what 
was the matter, and the trumpeter made them this 
speech following : 

' O hard-hearted and deplorable town of Man- 
f soul ! how long w 7 ilt thou love thy simplicity ; and 
4 ' ye fools, delight in your scorning ? As yet des- 
' pise you the offers of grace and deliverance ? As 
' yet will ye refuse the golden offers of Shaddai, 
' and trust to the lies and falsehood of Diabolus ? 
" Think you, when Shaddai shall have conquered 

* you, that the remembrance of these your carriages 

* towards him will yield you peace and comfort ? 
r or that by ruffling language you can make him 
'afraid as a grasshopper? Doth he intreat you 

* for fear of you ? Do you think that you are 
( stronger than he ? Look to the heavens, and be- 
' hold and consider the stars, how high are they ? 
e Can you stop the sun from running his course, 
' and hinder the moon from giving her light ? Can 
< you count the number of the stars, or 3 top 



HOLY WAR. 91 



Satan opposes a reconciliation. 



* the bottle* of heaven ? Can you call for the 
' waters of the sea, and cause them to cover the 
' face of the ground? Can you behold every one 

* that is proud, and abase him ; and bend their 
e faces in secret ? Yet these are some of the works 
'of our King, in whose name, this day, we come 
f up unto you, that you maybe brought under his 
e authority. In his name, therefore, I summon 
( you again to yield up yourselves to his captains.' 

At this summons the Mansoulians seemed to 
be at a stand, and knew not what answer to make: 
wherefore Diabolus forthwith appeared, and took 
upon him to do it himself; and thus he begins, but 
turns his speech to them of Mansoul. 

' Gentlemen,' quoth he, f and my faithful sub- 
jects, if it is true what this summoner hath said, 

* concerning the greatness of their King ; by his 
' terror, you will always be kept in bondage, and 
r so be made to sneak. Yea, how "can you now, 

* tho' he is at such a distance, endure to think of 
f such a mighty One ? And if not to think of him 
e while at a distance, how can you endure to 

* be in his presence ? I your prince am familiar 

* with you, and you may play with me as you 
' would with a grasshopper. Consider, therefore, 

* what is for your profit, and remember the immuni- 
f ties that I have granted you. 

' Farther, If all be true that this man hath sai<4, 
( how comes it to pass that the subjects of Shaddai 
( are so enslaved in all places where they come . J 



§2 HOLY WAR. 



The soul inclines to Satan. 



'None in the universe so unhappy as they,, none so 
' trampled upon as they. 

* Consider, my Mansoul ; would thou wert as 
' loth to leave me as I am loth to leave thee. But 
'*. consider, I say, the ball is yet at my foot : liberty 
' you have, if you know how to use it: yea. a king 
e you have too, if you can tell how to love and 
' obey him.* 

Upon this speech the town of Mansoul agai-a 
hardened their hearts yet once more against the 
captains of Shadd ai. The thoughts of his holiness 
sunk them in despair, wherefore, after a short con- 
sultation, they (of the Diabolonians' party they 
were) sent back this word by the trumpeter : That, 
for their parts, they were resolved to stick to their 
king, but never to yield to Shaddai ; so it was but 
in vain to give them any further summons, for they 
had rather die upon the place, than to yield. And 
uow things seemed to be gone quite back, and 
Mansoul to be out of reach or call : yet the cap- 
tains, who knew what their Lord could do, would 
not be beat out of heart : they therefore sent them 
another summons, more sharp and severe than the 
last: but the sooner they were sent to reconcile to 
Shaddai, the farther off they were, " As they 
ff called them, so they went from them," Hos. xi. 2. 
yea, though they called them to the Most High. 

So they ceased to deal any more with them in that 
way, and inclined to think of another way. The 
fsptains, therefore, gathered themselves together* tq 



HOLY WAK. S3 



The advice of Con vjction. 



bave Tree conference among themselves, to know 
what was vet to be done to gain the town, and de~ 
liverit from the tyranny of Diabolus. And one 
said after this manner, another after that. Then 
stood up the right noble captain Conviction, and 
said, ' My brethren, my opinion is this : 

' First, That we continually play our slings into 

* the town, and keep them in a continual alarm, 
' molesting them day and night; by thus doing, we 
' shall stop the growth of their rampant spirits: for 
' a lion may be tamed by continual molestation. 

* Secondly, This done, I advise, that in the next 

* place, we, with one consent, draw up a petition 
'to our Lord Shaddai, by which, after we have 

* shewed our King the condition of Mansoul, and 

* of affairs here, and bave begged his pardon for 

* our no better success, we will earnestly implore 
' his Majesty's help ; and that he will please to send 

* us more force and power, and some gallant and 

* well-spoken commander to head them, that so his 
' Majesty may not lose the benefit of these his 
' good beginnings, but may complete his conquest 
' upon the town of Mansoul. 

To this speech of the noble captain Conviction 
tjiey as one man consented, and agreed that a peti- 
tion should forthwith be drawn up, and sent by a 
fit man away to Shaddai with speed. The con- 
tents of the petition were thus : ' Most gracious 
' and glorious King, the Lord of fhe best world, 
f and builder of the town of Mansoul ; we have, 

* dread Sovereign, at thy command, put our lives 



S4 fCOLY WAR. * 



Petition to the Lord for help. 



* in jeopardy, and at thy bidding made war upon 
*, the famous town of Mansoul. When we went 

* up against it, we did according to our commission, 
' first offered conditions of peace unto it, but they, 

* great King, set light by our counsel, and would 

* none of our reproof.* They were for shutting 
e their gates, and so keeping us out of the town ; 

* they also mounted their guns, they sallied out 

* upon us, and have done us what damage they 

* could; but we pursued them with alarm upon 

* alarm, requiting them with such retribution as 

* was meet, and have done some execution upon the 
( town. 

' Biabolus, Incredulity, andWiLL-BE-wiLt, 

* are the great doers against us : now we are in our 

* winter-quarters, but so as that we do yet with an 
e high hand molest and distress the town. 

s Oace, as we think, had we had but one substan-> 
' fcia! friend in the town, such as would have second- 
tf ed the sound of our summons as they ought, the 
r people might have yielded themselves : but there 
'were none but enemies there, nor any to speak in 

* behalf of our JLord to the town : wherefore, tho' 
' we have done as we could, yet Mansoul abides 
e in a state of rebellion against thee. 

* Now, King of kings, let it please thee to par* 



* But they made light of it, and went their ways, one to his 
farm, another to his merchandize. Mat. xxv. 5. But they refused 
to hearken and pulled away the shoulder, and stopped their ears 
that *iey should not hear. Zech. vii. l\. 



HOLY WAR. 95 



Christ preseucs our pe'itions. 



" don the unsuccessfulness of thy servants, who have 

* been no more advantageous in so desirable a work 
' as the conquering of Mansoul is : and send, 
' Lord, as we now desire, more forces to Mansoul, 
' that it may be subdued ; and a man to head 

* them, that the town may both love and fear 

' We do not thus speak because we are willing 
f to relinquish the war (for we are for laying our 

* bones against the place), but that the town of 
' Mansoul may be won for thy Majesty. We also 
r pray thy Majesty, for expedition in this matter, 
' that, after conquest, we may be at liberty to be 
( sent about other thy gracious designs. Amen.' 

The petition, thus drawn up, was sent away with 
haste to the King by the hand of that good man, Mr. 
Love-to-Mansoul. 

When this petition was come to the palace of the 
King, who should it be delivered to but the King's 
Son. So he took it, and read it; and because the 
contents of it pleased him well, he mended it, and 
also in some things added to the petition himself. 
So after he had made such amendments and addi- 
tions as he thought convenient, with his own hands, 
he carried it unto the King : to whom when he had 
with obeisance delivered it, he put on authority, 
and spake to it himself. 

Now the King, at the sight of the petition, was 
glad ; but how much more, think you, when it was 
seconded by his Son ! It pleased him also to hear 
that his servants, who encamped against Mansoul, 
were so heartv in the work, and so stedfast in their 



26 HOLY WAR. 



Christ undertakes to save man. 



Fesolves, and that they had already got some ground 
upon the famous town of Mansoul. 

Wherefore the King called to him Emanuel his 
Son, who said, Here am I ray Father, Then said 
the King, Thouknowest, as I do myself, the condi- 
tion of Mansoul, and what thou hast done to re- 
deem it. Come now therefore, my Son, and prepare 
thyself for the war, for thou shalt go to my camp at 
Mansoul: thou shalt also there prosper and pre- 
vail, and conquer the town of Mansoul. 

Then said the King's Son. ' Thy law is within my 
4 heart : I delight to do thy will.'' This is the day 
that I have longed for, and the work that I have 
waited for all this while. Grant me therefore what 
force thou shalt in thy wisdom think meet ; and I 
will go, and will deliver from Diabolus, and from 
his power, thy perishing town of Mansoul. My 
heart has been often pained within me, for the 
miserable town of Mansoul: but now it is rejoiced, 
but now it is glad; and with that he leaped over 
the mountains for joy, saying, I have not in my heart 
thought any thing too dear for Mansoul; the day 
of vengeance is in mine heart for thee, my Man- 
soul; and glad am I that thou, my Father, hast 
made "me the captain of their salvation.* And I 
will now begin to plague all that have been a plague 
to my town of Mansoul, and I will deliver it from 
their hands. 

* For it became him, for whom are all things, and by whom are 
all things, in bringing many sons unto glory, to make the Captain 
«f their salyauon perfect through sufferings, II eb. ii. 10 e 




//// \Brna offering /<• hi§ Haifa?' ti undertakt 

the //'ww r// ,/ . \4anst "/ . 



Vuhli/i/ct/tisl/h Ic/t/inr/sM CJJm//i//\ A 7 'Ainu, iyi, i, /,„,.,,, ■• \', , 'id. 



HOLY WAR. 97 



Joy at the prospect of man's rcdempti 



When the King's Son had said thus to his Father, 
it presently flew like lightning round about at 
court : yea, it there became the only talk, what 
Emanuel was to go to do for the famous town of 
Mansoul. But you cannot think how the courtiers 
too were taken with this design of the Prince ; yea, 
so affected were they with this work, and with the 
j ustness of the war, that the highest lord and greatest 
peer of the kingdom coveted to have commissions 
under Emanuel, to go and help to recover again 
to Shaddai that miserable town of Mansoul. 

Then was it concluded that some should go and 
carry tidings to the camp, that Emanuel was to 
come to recover Mansoul ; and that he would bring 
along with him so mighty, so impregnable a force, 
that he could not be resisted. But oh I how ready 
were the high ones at court to run like lacquies to 
carry these tidings to the camp that was at Man- 
soul. 

Now when the captains perceived that the King 
would send Emanuel his Son, and that h also de- 
righted the Son to be sent on this errand by the great 
Shaddai his Father; tliey also, to shew how tiiey 
were pleased at the thoughts of his coming, jga\ i a 
shout that made the earth rend at the sound the, - 
of; yea, the mountains answered the echo, ana 
Diaeolus himself tottered and shook. 

Now you must know, that tho' the town of Man- 
Paul itself was not much, if at all concerned with the 
project (for, alas for them! they were woefully 
kesotted, for they chiefly regarded their pleasure an ;£ 



m HOLY WAR, 



: l prepares to take M a n s o.y ] 



lusts) ; yet Diabolus their governor was, for he 
had his spies continually abroad, who brought him 
intelligence of all things ; and they told him what 
was doing at court against him,, and that Emanuel 
would certainly eome shortly with a power to in- 
vade him. Nor was there any man in court, nor 
peer of the kingdom, that Diabolus so feared, as 
he feared this Prince : for, if you remember, I 
shewed you before, that Diabolus had felt the 
weight of his hand already ; so that since it was he 
that was to come, this made him sore afraid. 

Well, you see how I have told you that the 
King's Son was engaged to eome from the court to 
save Mansoul, and that his Father had made him 
captain of the forces : the time therefore of his set- 
ting forth being now expired, he addressed himself 
for the march ; and taking with him, for his power, 
five noble captains and their forces. 

1 . The first was that famous captain, the noble 
captain Credence; his were the red colours, and 
Mr. Promise bare them, and for an escutcheon he 
had the holy Lamb and golden shield :* and he had 
ten thousand men at his feet. 

2. The second was that famous captain, the cap- 
tain Good-hope; his were the blue colours, his 
standard-bearer was Mr. Expectation ; and for 



* Behold the Lamb of God, which taketh away the sins of the 
world. Johni. 19. Above all, taking the shield of faith, where* 
with ye shall he able to quertch all the fiery darts of the wicked. 
Bphi r'u is. 



HOLY WAR. 99 



The captains who atrcncieil hi 



an escutcheon he had Three Goldec Anchors ;* 
and he had ten thousand men at his feet. 

3. The third was that valiant captain, the cap- 
tain Charity :f his standard-bearer was Mr. Piti- 
ful ; his were the green colours, and for his escut- 
cheon he had Three Naked Orphans embraced in 
his bosom ; and he had ten thousand at his feet. 

4. The fourth was that gallant commander, the 
captain Innocent : his standard-bearer was Mr. 
Harmless ;£ his were the white colours; and for 
his escutcheon he had Three Golden Doves. 

5. The fifth was the truly loyal and well-beloved 
captain, the captain Patience : his standard-bearer 
was Mr. Suffer-long : his were the black colours, 
and for an escutcheon he had Three Arrows thro' a 
Golden Heart. 

/These were Emanuel's captains, these their 
standard-bearers, their colours, and escutcheons, 
and these the men under their command. So as was 
said, the brave Prince took his march, to go to the 
town of Mansoul. Captain Credence led the 
van, and captain Patience brought up the rear. 



* Which hope we hare as an anchor of the soul, both sure and 
stedfast, ami which entercth into that within the veil, Heb. vi. 19. 

i Charity suifereth long, and is kind ; charity vaunteth not itself, 
is not puffed up, doth not behave itself unseemly, seeketh not her 
own, is not easily provoked, thinkethno evil ; rejoiceth not in ini- 
quity, but rejoketh in the truth ; beareth all things, believeth all 
things, hopcfli all things, endurcth all things. Charity never fail, 
ttth. I Cor. xiii. 4..S. 

X Behold, 1 send you forth as sheep in the midst of wolves : be 
ye, therefore, wise as serpents, and harmless as doves. Mat. s. 15* 
!LoFC. 



100 HOLY WAR. 



The approach to Man soul. 



So the other three with their men, made up the 
main body. The prince himself rode in his chariot. 
at the head of them. 

But when they set out for their inarch, oh how 
the trumpets sounded, their armour glittered, and 
how the colours waved in the wind ! The Prince';* 
armour was all gold, and it shone like the sun in 
the firmament. The captains' armour was of proof, 
and was in appearance like the glittering stars. 
There were also some from the court that rode rc- 
formades, for the love that they had to the King 
Shaddai, and for the happy deliverance of the 
town of Mansoul. 

Emanuel also, when he had thus set forwards 
to go to recover the town of Mansoul, took 
with him, at the command of his Father, fifty- 
four battering-rams, and twelve slings to whirl 
stones withal. Every one of these was made of 
pure gold ; and these they carried with them in the 
heart and body of their army, all along as they went 
to Mansoul. 

So they marched till they came within less than a 
league of the town ; and there they lay till the first 
four captains came thither, to acquaint them with 
matters. Then they took their journey to go to the 
town of Mansoul, and unto Mansoul they came ; 
but when the old soldiers, that were in the camp, 
saw that they had new forces to join with, they 
again gave such a shout before the walls of Man- 
soul, that it put Diabolus into another fright, 
.So they sat down before the town, and now as the 



HOLY WAil. 101 



The artillery. 



other four captains did, to wit, against the gates of 
Mansoul only, but they invironed it round on 
every side, and beset it behind and before; so that 
now, let Mansoul look which way it would, it saw 
force and power lie in siege against it. Besides, 
there were mounts cast up against it ; the mount 
Gracious was on the one side, and mount Jus- 
tice on the other. Farther, there were several 
small banks and advance grounds, as Plain-truth 
hill, and No-sin banks, where many of the slings 
were placed against the town. Upon mount Gra- 
cious were planted four, and upon mount Justice 
were placed as many : and the rest were conveni- 
ently placed in several parts round about the town. 
Five of the best battering rams, that is, .of the big- 
gest of them, were placed upon mount Hearken, 
a mount cast up hard by Ear-gate, with intent 
to break that open. 

Now when the town of Mansoul saw the multi- 
tude, and the soldiers that were come up against 
the place, and the rams and slings, and the mounts 
on which they were planted ; together with the glit- 
tering of the armour, and the waving of their 
colours ; they were forced to shift and shift, and 
again to shift their thoughts ; but they hardly chang- 
ed for thoughts [more stout, but rather for thoughts 
more faint ; for though before they thought them- 
selves sufficiently guarded, yet now they began to 
think that no man knew what would be their hap 
or lot. 

When the "rood Prince Emanuel had thus be- 



im HOLY WAR. 



The white flag. 



leagured Mansoul, in the first place he hangs out 
the white flag, which he caused to be set up among 
the golden slings that were planted upon mount 
Gracious. And this he did for two reasons: 
1. To give notice to Mansoul, that he could and 
would yet be gracious, if they turned to him. 2. 
And that he might leave them the more without ex- 
cuse, should he destroy them, they continuing in 
their rebellion. 

So the white flag, with the Three Golden Doves 
on it, was hung out for two days together, to give 
them time and space to consider. But they, as was 
hinted before, as if they were unconcerned, made 
no reply to the favourable signal of the Prince. 

Then he commanded, and they set the red flag 
upon that mount called Justice. . It was the red 
flag of captain Judgment, whose escutcheon was 
the Burning Fiery Furnace; also this stood waving 
before them in the wind for several days together. 
But look how they carried it under the white flag, 
when that was hung out, so did they also when the 
red one was : and yet he took no advantage of 
them. 

Then he again commanded that his servants should 
hang out the black flag of defiance against them, 
whose escutcheon was the Three Burning Thunder- 
bolts. But as unconcerned was Mansoul at this, 
as at those that went before. But when the Prince 
saw that neither mercy nor judgment, nor execution 
of judgment, would or could come near the heart of 
Mansoul, he was touched vvith much compunction, 




/ 7/i 1 1 '////< //</,/ hung oid />t/<>/r . Wt/////<///. 



HOLY WAR. 103 



The sinner's excuse 



and said, Surely this strange carriage of the town of 
Mansoul doth rather arise from ignorance of the 
manner and feats of war, than from a secret defi- 
ance of us, and abhorrence of their own lives ; or, 
if they know the manner of the war of their own, jet 
not the rites and ceremonies of the war in which we 
are concerned, when I make wars upon mine enemy 

DlABOLUS. 

Therefore he sent to the town of Mansoul, to 
let them know what he meant by those signs and 
ceremonies of the flag ; and also to know of them 
which of the things they will chuse, whether grace 
and me/cy, or judgment, and the execution of 
judgment. All this while they kept the gates shut 
as fast as they could. Their guards were also 
doubled, and their watch made as strong as they 
could. Diabolus also plucked up what heart 
he could, to encourage the town to make resist- 
ance. 

The townsmen also made answer to the Prince's 
messenger, in substance, according to that which 
follows : 

' Great sir, as to what, by your messenger, you 
' have signified to us, whether we will accept your 
' mercy, or fall by your justice; we are bound', by 

* the law and custom of this place, and can give 
' you no positive answer : for it is against the law, 

* government, and prerogative royal of our king, to 

* make either peace or war without him. But this 

* we will do, we will petition that our prince will 
■ come down to the wall, and there give you such 



104 HOLY WAR. 



The speech of Diabolus. 



c treatment as he shall think fit and profitable for 
' us/ 

When the good Prince Emanuel heard this 
answer, and saw the slavery and bondage of the 
people, and how contented they were to abide in the 
chains of the tyrant Diabolus, it grieved him at 
the heart. And indeed, when at any time he per- 
ceived that any were contended with the slavery of 
the giant, he would be affected w ith it. 

But to return again to our purpose. After the 
town had carried this news to Diabolus, and had 
told him moreover, that the Prince, that lay in the 
leaguer without the wall, waited upon them for an 
answer ; he refused, and huffed as well as he could 
tut in heart he was afraid. 

Then said he, c I will go down to the gates my- 
"self, and give him such an answer as I think fit.* 
So he went down to Mouth-gate, and there ad- 
dressed himself to speak to Emanuel, (but in such 
language as the town understood not), the contents 
whereof were as follows: 

* O thou great Emanuel, Lord of the world, I 
' know thee, that thou art the Son of the ;great 

* Shaddai ! Wherefore art thou come to torment 

* me and to cast me out of my possession ? This 

* town of Mansoul, as thou very well knowest, is 
s mine by right of conquest ; I won it in tne open 

* field : and " shaft the prey be taken from the 
<( mighty, or the lawful captive delivered ?" 2. 

* This town of Mansoul is mine also by their sub- 
ejection. They have opened the gates of their 



HOLY Vv 



Iatan c.Jaiqis \l\c soul as : 



' town unto me, they have sworn fidelity to me, and 
' have openly chosen me to be their king. They 
' have also given their castle into my hands ; yea, 
' they have a! o rut the whole strength of Mansoul 

• under me. 

r Moreover, this town of Mansoul hath dis- 
avowed thee: yea, they have cast thy law, thy 
' name, thy image, and all that is thine, behind 
■ their back ; and have accepted and set up iu their 
' room, my law, my name, my image, and all that 
f ever is mine. Ask also thy captains, and they will 
' tell thee, that Mansoul hath, in answer to all 
' their summons, shewn love and loyalty to me ; 

* but always disdain, despite, contempt, and scorn 
{ to th.ee and thine. Now thou who art the Just 
( One and the Holy ( and shouldest do no iniquity), 
' depart then, I pray thee, from me, and leave me 
1 to my just inheritance peaceably/ 

This oration was made in the language of Dia- 
bolus himself; for altho' he can to every man speak 
in their ov»n language (eise he could not tempt 
them as he does), yet he has a language peculiar to 
himself, and it is a language of the infernal cave, or 
black pit. 

Wherefore the town of Mansoul (poor hearts ! ) 
understood him not : nor did they see how ho 
crouched and cringed while he stood before Ema- 
nuel their Prince. Yea, they ail this while took 
him to be one of that power and force that by no 
meaii9 could be resisted : wherefore while he was 
thus intreatingthat he might have vet his residence 



106 HOLY WAR. 

Emanuel's speech to Satan. 

there, and that Emanuel would not take it from 
him by force, the inhabitants boasted even of his 
valour, saying, Who is able to make war with 
him ? 

Well, when this pretended king had made an 
end of what he would say, Emanuel the golden 
Prince stood up and spake ; the contents of whose 
words follow. 

« Thou deceiving one/ said he, ' I have in my 
f Father's name, in my own name, and on the be- 
' half and for the good of his wretched town ©f 
' Mansoul, somewhat to say unto thee. Thou 

* pretendest a right, a lawful right, to the deplor- 
' able town of Mansoul, when it is most apparent 
f to all my Father's court, that the entrance which 
' thou hast obtained in at the gates of Mansoul 
' was thro' thy lies and falsehood : thou beliedstmy 
' Father, thou beliedst his law, and so deceivedst 
' the people of Mansoul. Thou pretendest that the 
' people have accepted thee for their king, their cap- 
' tain, and right liege lord, but that also was by the 
' exercise of deceit and guile. Nowif lying, wiliness, 

* sinful craft, and all manner of horrible hypocrisy, 

* will go in my Father's court, ( in which court thou 
' must be tried), for equity and right: then will I 

* confess unto thee, that thou hast made a lawful 

* conquest. But alas ! what thief, what tyrant, 
e what devil is there, that may not conquer after 

* this sort ? But I can make it appear, O Diabolus, 
' that thou in all thy pretences to a conquest of 
v Mansoul, hast nothing of truth to say Think- 



HOLY WAR. 107 



Convicts Satan of fraud. 



f est thou this to be right, that thou didst put the 

* lie upon my Father, and madest him (to Man- 
' soul) the greatest deluder in the world ? And 
' what sayest thou to thy perverting, knowingly, the 
' right purport and intent of the law ? Was it 
; good also that thou madest a prey of the innocen- 
' cy and simplicity of the now miserable town of 
' Mansoul ? Yea, thou didst overcome Man- 

* soul, by promising to them happiness in their 

* transgressions against my Father's law, when thou 
' knewest, and couldst not but know, hadst thou 
' consulted nothing but thy own experience, that 
' that was the way to undo them. Thou hast also 
' ( O thou master of enmity ! ) of spite defaced my 
' Father's image in Mansoul, and set up thy own 
\ in its place ; to the great contempt of my Father 
' the heightening of thy sin, and to the intolerable 
f damage of the perishing town of Mansoul. 

' Thou hast moreover ( as if all these were but 
' little things with thee) not only deluded and un- 
' done this place ; but by thy lies, and fraudulent 
' carriage hast set them against their own deliver- 

* ance. How hast thou stirred them up against my 
4 Father's captains, and made them to fight against 
' those that were sent of him to deliver them from 
' their bondage ! All these things, and very many 
' more, thou hast done against thy light, and in con- 
' tempt of my Father, and his law : yea, and with 
' design to bring under his displeasure for ever the 
' miserable town of Mansoul. I am therefore come 
' to revenge the wrong that thou ha9t done to my 



208 HOLY WAR. 



Christ's right to the soul of man. 



* Father, and to deal with thee for the blasphemies 
f wherewith thou hast made poor Mansoul bias- 
' pheme his name ; yea, upon thy head, thou prince 

* of the infernal cave, will I require it. 

* As for myself, O Diabolus, I am come against 
e thee by lawful power ; and to take, by strength of 

* hands, this town of Mansoul out of thy burning 

* fingers; for this town of Mansoul is mine, O 

* Diabolus, and that by undoubted right, as all 
e shall see that will diligently search the mostantient 
" and most authentic records, and I will plead my 

* title to it to the confusion of thy face. 

' First, For the town of Mansoul, my Father 
"built and fashioned it with his hand. The palace 

* also that is in the midst of the town he built foy 

* his own delight. This town of Mansoul, there- 
■'* fore, is my Father's, and that by the best of titles; 

* and he that gainsays the truth of this, must lie 
■' against his soul. 

' Secondly, O thou master of the lie, this town of 

* Mansoul is mine': 

* 1. For that I am my Father's heir, his first-born, 
' and the only delight of his heart.* I am there- 

* fore come up against thee in mine own right, even 
' to recover mine own inheritance out of thine 

* hands. 

' 2. But further, As I have a right and title to 
1 Mansoul by being my father's heir, so I have 

* God hath in these last days spoken unto us by his Son, -whom 
he hatn appointed heir of all things^ by whom also he. made tits 
worlds. Heb. i. 2. 



HOLY WAR. 109 



He purchased it. 



' also by my Father's donation. His it was, and he 
' gave it me;* nor have I at any time offended my 
' Father, that he should take it from me, and give 
' it to thee. Nor have I been forced, by playing 
' the bankrupt, to sell, or set to sale to thee my be- 
' loved town of Mansoul. f Mansoul is my d£- 
' sire, my delight, and the joy of my heart. Bui, 
' 3. Mansoul is mine by right of purchase. I 

* have bought it, O Dia bolus, I have bought it for 

* myself. Now since it was my Father's and mine, 

* as I was his heir, and since also 1 have made it, 
' mine by virtue of a great purchase, it followeth, 
' that by all lawful right the town of Mansoul is 

* mine ; and that thou art an usurper, tyrant, 
' and traitor, in thy holding possession thereof. 
1 Now the cause of my purchasing it was this : 
' Mansoul had trespassed against my Father. 

* Now my Father had said, that in the day that they 
' broke his law, they should die : now it is more 

* possible for heaven and earth to pass away, than 

* for my Father to break his word. % Wherefore 
\ when Mansoul had sinned indeed by hearkening 



* I have manifested thy name unto the men which thou gavestme 
cut of th-e world : thine they were, and thou gavestthem me. John 
xvii. 6. 

+ Thus saith the Lord, where is the bill of your mother's divorce- 
ment, whom I have put away, or which of my creditors to whom I 
bavesold you ? Behold, foryour iniquities have ye sold yourselves, 
and for your transgressions is your mother put away. isa. 1. 1. 

J For verily I say untoyou, Till heaven and earth pass, oncjotor 
one tittle shall in no wise pass from the law, till all be fulfilled. 
Matt. v. is. 



110 HOLY WAR. 



Chhist satisfies the Father's justice. 



' to thy lie, I put in and became a surety to my 
' Father, body for body, and soul for soul, that I 

* would make amends for Mansoul's transgressions 
s and my Father accepted thereof. So when the 
f time appointed was come, I gave body for body, 
f soul for soul, life for life, blood for blood, and so 
f redeemed my beloved Mansoul. 

' 4. Nor did 1 this by halves ; my Father's love 
A and justice, that were both concerned in the 
' threatening upon transgression, are both now 
' satisfied, and very well content that Mansoul 
e should be delivered. 

* 5. Nor am I come out this day against thee, 

* but by commandment from my Father ; 'twas he 

* that said unto me, Go down and deliver Man- 

' SOUL. 

1 Wherefore be it known unto thee, O thou foun- 
' tain of deceit, and be it also known to the foolish 
' town of Mansoul, that I am not come against 
' thee this day without my Father. 

' And now, said the goiaen-neaded Prince, I have 

* a word to the town of Mansoul (but so soon as 
' mention was made, that he had a word to speak to 

* the besotted town of Mansoul, the gates were 
' double guarded, and all men commanded not to 

* give him audience); so he proceeded, and said, 
' O unhappy town of Mansoul, I cannot but be 
' touched with pity and compassion for thee. Tbou 

* hast accepted of Diabolus for thy king, and art 

* become a nurse and minister of Diabglonians 

* against thy sovereign Lord. Thy gates thou hast 



IICLY WAR. Ill 



His compassion to sinners. 



' opened to him, but bast shut them fast against me ; 

* thou hast given him a hearing, but hast stopped thy 
1 ears to my cry : lie brought to thee thy destruc- 
' tion, and thou didst receive both him and it; I 
' am come to the bringing salvation, but thou re- 
' gardest me not. Resides, thou hast with sacrile- 
' gious hands taken thyself, with all that was mine 
' in thee, and hast given all to my foe, and to the 
' greatest enemy my Father has. You have bowed 

■ and subjected yourselves to him, you have vowed 
f and sworn yourselves to be his. Poor Mansoul \ 
' what shall I do unto thee ? Shall I save thee ? 
' Shall I destroy thee ? What shall I do unto 
' thee ? Shall I fall upon thee, and grind thee to 

* powder ; or make thee a monument of the richest 
' grace ? What shall I do unto thee ? Hearken 

* therefore, thou town of Mansoul, hearken to 

■ my word, and thou shalt live. I am merciful, 
' Mansoul, and thou shalt find me so : shut me 

* not out of thy gates.* 

* O Mansoul, neither is my commission or in- 

* clination at all to do thee hurt : why flyest thou 
' so fast from thy friend, and stickest so close to 
' thine enemy ? Indeed I would have thee, as it be- 

* c»mes thee, to be sorry for thy sin : but not to 

* despair of life : this great force is not to hurt 



* I sleep, but my heart waketh : it is the voice of my beloved that 
knockcth, saying, Open tome, my sister, my love, my dove, my un- 
defiled : for my head is filled with dew, and my lock* with the 
drops of the night. Sol. Song v. 2. 



112 HOLY WAR. 



The sinner refuses to hearken. 



e thee, but to deliver thee from thy bondage, and (o 
' reduce thee to thy obedience. 

£ My commission indeed is, to make war upon 
' Diabolus thy king, and upon ail Diabolonians 
'' with him, for he is the strong man armed that 
c keeps the house; but I will have him out; his 
s spoils I must divide, his armour I must take from' 
f him, his hold I must cast him out of, and must 
c make it an habitation for myself. And this, O 
c Mansoul, shall Diabolus know, when he shall 
f be made to follow me in chains, and when Man- 
c soul shall rejoice to see it too. 

c I could, would I now put forth my might, cause 
f that forthwith he should leave you, and depart ; 
c but I have it in my heart so to deal with him* as 
' that the justness of the war, that I shall make upon 
e him, may be seen and acknowledged by all. He 
' hath taken Mansoul by fraud, and keeps it by 
e violence and deceit; and I will make him bare 
' and naked in the eyes of all observers. All my 
e words are true : I am mighty <o save, and will de- 
e liver my Mansoul out of his hand,' 

This speech was intended chiefly for Mansoul, 
but Mansoul would not have the hearing of it. 
They shut up Ear-gate, they barricaded it up, 
they kept it locked and bolted, they set a guard 
thereat, and commanded that no Mansoulian 
should go out to him, nor that any from the camp 
should be admitted into the town ; all this they did, 
so horribly had Diabolus inchanted them to do- 
and to do for him, -against their rightful Lord and 



HOLY WAR. US 



Another oiler <>i mercy. 



Prince ; wherefore no man,, nor voice, nor sound 
of man that belonged to the glorious host, was to 
come into the town. 

bo when Emanuel saw that Mansoul was tbu3 
involved in sin, he called his army together (since 
now all his words were despised), and gave out a 
commandment throughout all his hosts, to be ready 
against the time appointed. Now forasmuch as there 
was no way law fully to take the town of Mansoul, 
but to get in by the gates, and at Ear-gate as the 
chief, therefore he commanded hie captains and 
commanders to bring their rams, their slings, and 
their men, and place them at Eve-gate and Ear- 
gate, in order to4iis taking the town. 

When Emanuel had put all things in readiness 
to bid Diaeolus battle, he sent again to know of 
Mansoul, if in peaceable manner they would, 
yield themselves, or whether they were yet resolved 
to put him to try the utmost extremity ? They then, 
together with Diabolus the king, called a council 
of war, and resolved upon certain propositions that 
should be offered Emanuel, if he will accept there- 
of: so they agreed ; and then the next was who 
should be sent on this errand. Now there was in 
the town of Mansoul an old man, a Diaeolo- 
nian, and his name was Mr. Loth-to-stoop ; a 
stiff man in his way, and a great doer for Diabolus ; 
him therefore they sent, and put into his moutU 
what he should say. So he went, and came to the 
camp to Emanuel; and when he was come, a 
time was appointed to give him audience. So a* 
' s 



114 HOLY WAR. 



Sinners attempt to compromise with God. 

(he time he came; and after a Diabolonian 
ceremony or two, he thus began, and said, ■ Great 
c Sir, that it may be known unto all men, how 
€ good-natured a prince my master is, he hath sent 
f me to tell your lordship, [that he is very wil- 

* ling, rather than go to war, to deliver up into 
' your hands one half of the town of Mansoul.* 
f I am therefore to know if your Mightiness willac- 
' cept ofthis proposition/ 

Then said Emanuel, - The whole is mine by 
' gift and uurchase. wherefore I will never lose one 
! half.' 

Then said Mr. Loth-to-stoop, e Sir, my mas- 

* Jfer hath said that he will be content that you shall 

* be the nominal and titular Lord of all, if he may 
e possess but a part.* 

Then Emanuel answered, f The whole is mine 
■ really, not in name and word ^only; wherefore I 

* will be the sole lord and possessor of all, or of 
e none at all, in Mansoul.' 

Then Mr. Loth-to-stoop said again, * Sir, be- 
< hold the condescension of my master ! He say3, 

* he will be content if he may have assigned to him 
s some place in Mansoue, as a place to live pri- 
e vately in, and you shall be lord of all the rest.' 

Then said the golden Prince, ' c All that the Fa- 
<e ther giveth me shall eomc to me ;" and of all that 



* They profess that they know God;, but in works they der}* 
Mm, being abominable and disobedient and unto every good woeJ& 
reprobate, Tit. i. 16.. 



HOLY WAR. ila 



>in must be totally banisbed. 



' he hath given me I will lose nothing, no not a 
' hoof nor a hair ; I will not therefore grant him, no 
' not the least corner in Mansoul to dwell in, I 
' will have all to myself. 

Then Loth-to-stoop said again, ' But, sir, sup- 1 

* pose that my lord should resign the whole town to 
' you only with this proviso, that he sometimes, 
' when he comes into this country, may, for old ac- 

* quaintance sake, be entertained as a way-faring 
' man for two days, or ten days, or a month, or so ; 

* may not this small matter be granted ?' 

Then said Emanuel, e No. He came as a way- 
' faring man to David, nor did he stay long with 

* him, and yet it had like to have cost David his 
' soul.* I wili not consent that he ever should have 

* any harbour more there.' 

Then said Mr. Loth-to-stoop, ' Sir, you seem 
'to be very hard. Suppose my master should yield 

* to all that your lordship hath said, provided that his 
' friends and kindred in Mansoul may have liberty 
' to trade in the town, and to enjoy their present 
' dwellings, may not that be granted, sir ?' 

Then said Emanuel, 'No; that is contrary to 
'my Father's will.f For al], and all manner of 



* And there came a traveller unto the rich man : and he spared 
to take of his own flock, and of his own herd, to dress for the way- 
faring man that was come unto him ; but took the poor man's 
lamb, and dressed it for the man that was come to him. 2 Sam. 
xii. 4. 

t Neither yield ye your members as instruments of unrighteous- 
nesstmto sin : butyidd yourselves unto God as those that are ftliva 
from the dead, and your members as instruments of righieQustsess 



H(3 HOLY WAR. 



No fellowship allowed wif h sin. 



' Biabolonians that now are, or fhal at any time 

* shall be found in Mansoul, shall not only lose 

* their lands and liberties, but also their lives.' 

Then said Mr. Loth-to-stoop again, ' But, sir, 

* may not my master and great lord, by letters, 
' by passengers, by accidental opportunities, and, 

* the like, maintain, if he shall deliver up all unto 
'■ thee, some kind of old friendship with Man- 

' SOUL.* 

Emanuel answered, f No, by no means; for- 
' asmuch as any fellowship, friendship, intimacy, or 

* acquaintance, in what way, sort, or mode soever 
' maintained, will tend to the corrupting of Man- 
' soul, the alienating of their affections from me, 
■' and the endangering their peace with my Fa- 
' ther.' 

Mr. Loth-to-stoop yet added further^ saying, 
' But, great sir, since my master hath many friends, 
? and those that are dear to him in Mansoul, may 

* he not, if he depart from them, even of his bounty 

* and good nature, bestow upon them, as he sees fit, 
' some token of his love and kindness that he bad 
' for them, to'the end that Mansoul, when he is 
' gone, may look upon such tokens of kindness 

* once received from their old friend, and remember 
f him who was once their king, and the merry times 

unto God. I].om. vi. 13. Mortify, therefore, your members which 
are upon the earth: fornication, uncieanness, inordinate affection, 
pvil concupiscence, and coretousness, which is idolatry. Co], iii. 5. 
And they that are Christ's have crucified the flesh, with theaSee-? 
gjuijs and iu^ts. Gal. t. %4, 



POLY WAR. 117 



Nor remembrance of communion wiih Satan. 

' that the v sometimes enjoyed one with another, 
' while he and they lived in peace together.'* 

Then said Emanuel, ' No ; for if Mansoul 

* come to be mine, I shall not admit of, nor con- 
' sent that there should be the least scrap, shred, or 
'dust of Diaeolus left behind, as tokens or gifts 
' bestowed upon any in Mansoul, thereby to call 
' to remembrance the horrible communion that was 
' betwixt them and him.' 

' Well, sir/ said Mr. Loth-to-stoop, ' I have 
' one thing more to propound, and then I am got 

* to the end of my commission. Suppose that 

* when my master is gone from Mansoul, any 
'that yet shall live in the town, shall have such 
' business of high concerns to do, that if they be 
' neglected, the party shall be uj^lone : and sup- 
' pose, sir, that nobody can help in that case so 
' well as my master and lord ; may not now my 
' master be sent for upon so urgent an occasion 
' as this ? + Or if he may not be admitted into 
' the town, may not he and the person concerned 
' meet in some of the villages near Mansoul, and 
' there lay their heads together, and there consult 
' together ?' 

This was the last of those eusnaring proposition* 
that Mr. Loth-to-stoop had to propound to Ema- 

* Let not sin therefore reign in your mortal body, that ye should 
obfy it in the lusts thereof. Rom. vi. 12. 

+ But the augel of the Lord said unto Elijah -the Tishbite, Arise, 
go up to meet the messengers of five king of Samaria, and say un- 
to them, Is it not because there is not a God iu Israel, that ye go 
to ennuire ef Baalztbuh the god of Ekron, ? 2 Kings i, 3, 



US HOLY WAR. 



AU wisdom given us of God. 



nuel on behalf of his master Diabolus : but 
Emanuel would not grant it ; for he said there can 
be no case, or thing, or matter, fall out in Man- 
soul, when thy master shall be gone, that may not 
be solved by my Father.* Besides, It will be a great 
disparagement to my Father's wisdom and skill, to 
admit any from Mansoul to go out to Diabolus 
for advice, when they are bid before., in every thing, 
hy prayer and supplication, to let their request be 
made known to my Father. Further, this, should it 
be granted, would be to grant that a door should 
be open for Diabolonians in Mansoul, to hatch 
and plot and bring to pass treasonable designs, to 
the grief of my Father and Me, and to the utter de- 
struction of Mansoul. 

When Mr. Loth-to-stoop had heard this an- 
swer, he took his leave of Emanuel, and d parted, 
saying, that he would carry word to his master con- 
cerning this whole affair. So he departed, and 
came to Diabolus in Mansoul, and told him 
the whole of the matter ; and how Emanuel 
would not admit, no not by any means, that he, 
when he was once gone out, should ever have any 

* And Samuel said to Saul, Why hast thou disquieted me to bring 
me up ? And Saul answered, I am sore distressed ; for the Philis- 
tines make war against me, and God is departed from me, and ans- 
wereth meno more, neither by prophets, nor by dreams: there- 
fore I have called thee, that thou mayest make known unto me 
what I shall, do. 1 Sam. xxviii. 15. 

+ And Ahaziah fell down through a lattice in his upper chamber 
thai was in Samaria, and was sick : and he sent messengers, and 
said unto them. Go, inquire of Baalzebub the god o( Ekron, who* 
ther I shati recover of this disease. 2 Kings i. g. 



HOLY WAR. 119 



The sinner defies Christ. 



thing more to do either in, or with any that are of 
the town of Mansoul. When Mansoul and Di- 
abolus had heard this relation of things, they with 
one consent concluded to use their best endeavours 
to keep Emanuel out of Mansoul ; and sent old 
Ill-pause, of whom you have heard before, to 
tell the Prince and his captains so. So the old 
gentleman came up to the top of Ear-gate, and 
called to the camp for a hearing; who when they 
gave audience, he said, ' I have in commandment 
r from my high lord to bid you tell it to your 
' Prince Emanuel, that Mansoul and their king 
* are resolved to stand and fall together, and that it 
? is in vain for yout Prince to think of ever having 
' Mansoul in his hand, unless he can take it 
' by force. 5 So some went and told Emanuel 
what old Ill-pause, aDiABOLONiAN in Mansoul, 
had said. Then said the Prince, I must try 
the power of my sword,* for I will not ( for all the 
rebellions and repulses that Mansoul has made 
against me) raise my siege and depart, but will as- 
suredly take my Mansoul, and deliver it from her 
enemy. And with that he gave out a command- 
ment, that captain Boanerges, captain Convic- 
tion, captain Judgment, and captain Execution, 
should march forthwith up to Ear-gate, with trum- 
pets sounding, colours flying, and with shouting for 
the battle. Also he would that captain Credence' 

* And take the helmet of salvation, and the sword of the Spirit^ 
whieh is the word of God. Eph. vi. 17. 



120 HOL^ WAR. 



A violent attack. 



should join himself in with them ; Emanuel more- 
over gave orders that captain Good-hope and cap- 
tain Charity should draw themselves up before 
Eye-gAte. He bid also that the rest of his cap- 
tains and their men should place themselves to the 
best of their advantage against the enemy, round 
about the town, and all was done as he commanded. 
Then he bid that the word should be given forth,, 
and the word was at that time EMANUEL. Then 
was an alarm sounded, and the battering-rams were 
played, and the slings whirled stones into the town 
amain: and thus the battle began. Now Diabo- 
lus himself managed the townsmen in the war, and 
that at every gate ; wherefore their resistance was 
the more forcible, hellish, and offensive to Ema- 
nuel. Thus was the good Prince engaged and en- 
tertained by Diabolus and Mansoul for several 
days together ; and a sight worth seeing it was, to 
behold how the captains of Shaddai behaved them- 
selves in the war. 

And first for captain Boanerges (not to under-* 
Talue the rest), he made three most fierce assaults 
one after another, upon Ear-gate, to the shaking of 
the posts thereof. Captain Conviction also made 
up as fast with Boanerges as possibly he could ; 
and both discerning that the gate began to yield, 
they commanded that the rams should still be play- 
ed against it. Now captain Conviction going up 
very near to the gate, was with great force driven 
back, and received three wounds in his mouth ; and 



HOLY WAR. 

The efl'ccti of the battit. 

th i,e that rodereformades, went about to encourage 
tiie captains. 

For the valour df the two captains, made mention 
cf before, the Prince sent forthemto his pavilion ; 
and commanded that awhile tbej should rest them- 
selves, and that with somewhat they should be re- 
freshed. Care was also taken for captain Convic- 
tion, that he should be healed of his wounds : the 
Prince also gave them a chain of gold, and bid them 
yet be of good courage. 

>sor did captain Good-hope nor captain Chari- 
ty come behind in this most desperate fight, for they 
too so behaved themselves at Eye-gate, that they 
had almost broken it quite open. These had also a 
reward from their Prince, as also had the rest of the 
captains, because they did valiantly round about 
the town. 

In this engagement, several of the officers of 
Diaeolus were slain, and some of the townsmen 
wounded, for among the officers there was one cap- 
tain Boasting slain. This Boasting thought that 
nobody could have shaken the post of Ear-gate, 
nor have shaken the heart of Diaeolus. Next to 
him there was one captain Secure slain ; this Se- 
cure used to say, that the blind and lame in Man- 
soul were able to keep the gates of the town against 
Emanuel's army.* This captain Secure did 

2 And the king and bis men went to Jerusalem unto the Jebusites^ 
the inhabitants of the land: which spate unto David, saying, Ex- 
cept thou take away the blind and the lame thou shalt not come in 
hither: thinking, l)a\ id cannot come in hither. 2 Sam.- i.a. 



J 22 HOLY AVAR. 



The destruction of some of the sinner's forces. 



captain Conviction cleave down the head with a 
two-handed sword., when he himself received three 
wounds in the mouth. 

Besides, there was one captain Brag man, a 
very desperate fellow, and he was captain ove? 
a band of those that threw firebrands, arrows, and 
death : he also received by the hand of captain 
Good-hope at Eye-gate a mortal wound in the 
breast. 

There was ^also one Mr. Feeling, but he was ho 
captain, but a great stickler to encourage Mansoul 
to rebellion ; he received a wound in the eye by the 
hand of one of Boanerges's soldiers, and had by 
the captain himself been slain, but that he made a 
sudden retreat. 

But I never saw Will-be-will so daunted in 
all my life; he was not able to do as he was wont; 
and some say, he also received a wound in the leg, 
and that some of the men in the Prince's army had 
certainly seen him limp as he afterwards walked on 
the wall. 

I shall not give you a particular account of the 
names of the soldiers that were maimed, wounded, 
and slain : for when they saw the posts of Ear- 
gate shook, and Eve-gate was well nigh broken 
quite open ; and also their captains were slain ; 
this took away the hearts of many of the Diabolo- 
nians, so that they fell also by the force of the shot 
that were sent by the golden slings into the midst of 
the town of Mansoul. 
Of the townsmen, there was one Love-no- 



HOLY Wk.ll. 123 



Satan's gulc. 



good ; he was a townsman but a Diabolonian ; 
he also received his mortal wound in Mansoul; 
but he died not very soon. 

Mr. Ill-pause also, who came along with Dia- 
bolus when at first he attempted the taking of 
Mansoul, received a grievous wound in the head ; 
some say that his brain-pan was cracked : this I have 
taken notice of, that he was never after this able to 
do that mischief to Mansoul as he had done in 
times past. Also old Prejudice and Mr. Any- 
thing fled. 

Now when the battle was over, the Prince com- 
manded that yet once more the white flag should be 
get upon mount Gracious, in sight of the town of 
Mansoul; to shew that yet Emanuel had grace 
for the wretched town of Mansoul. 

When Diabolus saw the white flag hung out 
again, and knowing that it was not for him, but 
Mansoul ; he cast in his mind to play another 
prank, to wit, to see if Emanuel would raise his 
siege and be gone, upon promise of reformation? 
So he went down to the gate one evening, a good 
while after the sun was gone down, and called to 
speak with Emanuel ; who presently came down 
to the gate, and Diabolus saith unto him : 

' Forasmuch as thou makest it appear by the 
' white flag, that thou art wholly given to peace 
' and quiet ; I thought meet to acquaint thee, that 
' we are ready to accept thereof upon terms which 
* thou mayest admit.' 

'. I know that thou art given to devotion, and 



sU HOLY WAR. 



Satan can transform himself into an angel of lieht. 

* that holiness pleases thee ; yea, that thy great end 
' in making a war upon Mansoul, is, that it may 
' be an holy habitation. Well, draw off thy forces 
'■ from the town, and I will bend Mansoul to. thy 
r bow. 

* First, I will lay down all acUof hostility against 

* thee, and will be willing to become thy deputy ; 
' and will, as I have formerly been against thee, now 

* serve thee in the town of Mansoul. And more 
3 particularly.' 

'I.I will persuade Mansoul to receive thee 
f for their lord ; and I know that thev will do it 

* sooner, when they shall understand that I am thy 

* deputy. 

' 2. I will shew them wherein they have erred, 

* and that transgression stands m the way to life. 

* 3. I will shew them the holy law unto whicli 

* they must conform, even that which they have 

* broken. 

* 4. I will press upon them the necessity of a re- 
' formation, according to law. 

' 5. And moreover, that none of these things may 

* fail, I myself, at my own proper cost and charge, 

* will set up and maintain a sufficient ministry, be-. 

* sides lectures in Mansoul. 

' 6. Thou shalt receive, as a token of our sub- 
' jection to thee, continually year by year, what thou 
'■ shalt think fit to lay and levy upon us in token of 
^ such subjection.' 

Then said Emanuel to him, f O full of deceit, 
', how moveable are thv ways ! How often hast 



HOLY WAR. 125 



Is detected t>r Emaxtt .*.. 



r tli ou changed' and re-changed, if so be thou 
r mightcst still keep possession of my Mansoul ! 
' though, as has been plainly declared before, I am 
' the right heir thereof. Often bast thou made thy 

* proposals already, nor is this last a whit better than 
c they. And failing to deceive when thou shewedst 
' thyself in thy black, thou hast now transformed 
' thvself into an angel of light,* and wouldst, to 
' deceive, be now as a minister of righteousness. 

* But know thou, O Diabolus, that nothing 
' must be regarded that thou canst propound, for 
'nothing ia done by thee but to deceive; thou nei- 

* ther hast conscience to God, nor love to the town 
' of Mansoul; whence then should these thy say- 
' ings arise, but from sinful craft and deceit ? Hs 
' that can list and will propound what he pleases, and 
e that therewith he may destroy them that believe 
1 him, is to be abandoned with all that he shall say. 
' But if righteousness be such abeauty-spot inthine 
r eyes now, how is it that wickedness was so closely 
' stuck to by thee before ? But this by the by. 

' Thou talkest now of a reformation in Man- 
' soul, and that thou thyself, if I please, will be at 
' tbe head of that reformation ; all the while know- 
' ing, that the greatest proficiency man can make 
' in the law, and the righteousness thereof, will 
' amount to no more, for the taking away the curse 
' from Mansoul, than just nothing at all ; for a 



* And no marvel : for Satan himself was transformed into aji 
i«jgcl of light, 2 Cor. xi. 14, 



1SS HOLY WAR. 



No union between Christ and Satan. , 

* law Being broken by Mansoul, that had before, 
' upon a supposition of the breach thereof, a curse 
c pronounced against him for it of God, can never, 
f by his obeying the law, deliver himself therefrom. 
e ( To say nothing of what a reformation is like to be 
'set up in Mansoul, when the devil is become the 

* corrector of vice). Thou knowest that all that 
' thou hast now said in this matter is nothing but 
' guile and deceit ; and as it was the first, so is it the 
I last card thou hast to play. Many there be that 
' discern thee, when thou shevvest them thy cloven 

* foot; but in thy white, in thy light, and in thy 
' transformation, thou art seen but of a few. But 
' <hou shalt not do thus with my Mansoul, O Di- 
c abolus, for I do still love my Mansoul. 

/Besides, I am not come to put Mansoul upon 
' works, to live thereby ; should I do so I should be 
*' like unto thee ; but I am come, that by me, and by 
' what I have and shall do for Mansoul, they may 
' be reconciled to my Father, though "by their sm 
c they have provoked him to anger, and though by 
' the law they cannot obtain mercy. 

f Thou talkest of subjecting this town to good when 
' none desireth it at thy hands. I am sent by my 
' Father to possess it myself, and to guide it, by the 
' skilfulness of my hands, into such a conformity to 

* him as shall be pleasing in his sight. I will there- 
*< fore possess it myself: I will dispossess and cast 
1 thee out: I will set up mine own standard in the 
e midst of them ; I will also govern them by new 
s laws, new officers, new motives, and new ways : 



BOLY WAR, 117 



New preparations for war. 



f yea, I will pull down this town, and build it again, 
*> and it shall be as though it had not been, and it 
' shall be the glory of the whole universe.' 

When Diabolus heard this, and perceived that 
he was discovered in all his deceits, he was con- 
founded, and utterly put to a non-plus ; but having 
in himself the fountain of iniquity, rage, and malic* 
against both Shaddai and his Son, and the beloved 
town of Mansuul, what doth he but strengthen 
himself what he could to give fresh battle to the 
noble prince Emanuel. So then, now he must 
have another fight before the town of Man sou I is 
taken. Come up then to the mountains, you that 
love to see military actions, and behold by both 
sides how the fatal blow is given ; while one seeks 
to hold, and the other seeks to make himself master 
of, the famous town of Mansoul. 

Diabolus therefore withdrew himself from the 
walls to his fort that was in the heart of the town of 
Mansoul; Emanuel also returned to the camp; 
and both of them, after their divers ways, put them- 
selves into a posture fit to give battle one to another. 
Diabolus, as filled with despair of retaining in his 
hand the famous town of Mansoul, resolved to do 
what mischief he could (if indeed he could do any) 
to the army of the Prince, and to the famous town 
of Mansoul, for alas ! it was not the happiness of 
the silly town of Mansoul that was designed by 
Diabolus, but the utter ruin and overthrow thereof, 
as nOw is enough in view. Wherefore he commands 
iiis officers that they should then, when they saw 



128 HOLY WAR. 



Ear-g ate broken open. 



that they could hold the town no longer, do it what 
hann and mischief they 'could, rending and tearing 
men, women, and children ; for, said he, we had 
better quite demolish the place, and leave it a ruin- 
ous heap, than that it should be an habitation for 
Emanuel. 

Emanuel again, knowing that the next battle 
would issue in his being made master of the place, 
gave out a royal commandment to all his officers, 
high captains, and men of war, to be sure to shew 
themselves men of war against Diabolus, and all 
Diabolo'nians ; but favourable, merciful and 
meek to the old inhabitants of Mansoul. Bend 
therefore, said the noble Prince, the hottest front of 
the battle against Diabolus and his men. 

So the day being come, the command was given, 
and the Prince's men stood bravely to their arms; 
nor did, as before, bend their forces against Ear- 
gate and Eve-gate. The word was then, Man- 
soul is won : so they made their assault upon the 
town. Diabolus also, as fast as he could, with the 
main of his power, made resistance from within, 
and his high lords and chief captains for a time 
fought very cruelly against the Prince's army; 

But after three or four notable charges by the 
Prince and his noble captains, Ear-gate was broke 
open, and the bars and bolts, wherewith it used to 
be fast shut up against the prince, were broken into 
a thousand pieces. Then did the Prince's trumpets 
sound, the captains shout, the town shake, and -Di- 
abolus retreat to his hold. Well, when the Prince's 



HOLY WAR. 129 



The town taken. 



forces had broke open the gate, himself came up, 
and did set up his throne in it; also he set his 
standard near it, upo.i a mount that his men hacf 
before cast up to place the mighty slings thereon. 
The mount was called mount Hear-well ; there 
therefore the Prince abode, to wit, hard by the 
going in at the gate. He commanded also that the 
golden slings should yet be played upon the town,, 
especially against the castle, because for shelter 
thither was Diabolus retreated. Now from Ear- 
gate the street was straight, even to the house of 
him who was the recorder before Diabolus took th* 
town ; and hard by his house stood the castle, 
which Diabolus for a long time had made his irk- 
some den. The captains therefore quickly cleared 
the street by the use of their slings, so that way was 
made up to the heart of the town. Then the Prince 
commanded that captain Boanerges, captain Con- 
viction, and captain Judgment, should forthwith 
march up the town to the old gentleman's gate. 
Then did the captains in most warlike manner enter 
into the town oPMansoul, and marching in with 
flying colours, they came up to the recorder's house 
(and that was almost as strong as the castle). Bat- 
tering rams they took also with them, to plant 
against the castle-gates. When they were come t» 
the house of Mr. Conscience, they knocked, and 
demanded entrance. Now the old gentleman, not 
knowing as yet fully their design, kept his gates shut 
all the time of this fight. Wherefore Boanerges 
demanded entrance at his gates ; and no man ra»k« 

R 



130 HOLY WAR. 



Conscience a-wakenert 



ing answer, he gave it one stroke with the head of 
a rara, and this made the old gentleman shake, and 
his house tremble and totter. Then came Mr. Re- 
corder down to the gate, and as well as he could, 
with quivering lips, he asked who was there ? Boa- 
nerges answered, We are the captains and com- 
manders of the great Shaddai, and of the blessed 
Emanuel his son, and we demand possession of 
your house for the use of our noble prince. And 
with that the battering ram gave the gate another 
shake : this made the old gentleman tremble the 
more, yet durst he not but open the gate : then the 
King's forces marched in, namely, the three brave 
captains mentioned before. Now the recorder*! 
house was a place of much convenience for Ema- 
nuel, not only because it was near and fronted the 
castle,, the den where now Diabolus was ; for he 
was now afraid to come out of bis hold. As for 
Mr. Recorder, the captains carried it very reserv- 
edly to him : as yet he knew nothing of the great 
designs of Emanuel ; so that he did not know what 
judgment to make, nor what would be the end of 
such thundering beginnings. It was noised in the 
town, how the recorder's house was possessed, his 
rooms taken up, and his palace made the seat of 
war ; and no sooner was it noised abroad but they 
took the alarm as warmly and gave ii out to others 
of his friends ; and as you know a snow-ball loses 
nothing by rolling, so in a little time the whole town 
was possessed that they must expect nothing from the 
fffiece but destruction ; and the ground of the busi- 



1IOLY WAIL 131 



Writes bitter things against tbe sinner. 

ness was this, the recorder trembled, and the cap- 
tains carried it strangely to him : so many came to 
sec ; but when they with their own eyes beheld the 
captains in the palace and their battering-rams ever 
played at the castle-gates to beat them down, they 
were riveted in their fears, and it made them as in 
amaze. And, as I said, the man of the house would 
increase all this ; for whoever came to hira, or dis- 
coursed with him, nothing would he talk of, tell 
them, or hear, but that death and destruction now 
attended Man soul. 

* For ( quoth the old gentleman) yon are all of 
' you sensible that we have all been traitors to that 
c once despised, but now famously victorious and 
c glorious Prince Emanuel ; for he now, as you 
' see, doth not only lie inclose siege about us, but 
e hath forced his entrance in at our gates ; moreover 

* Diabolus flies before hira ; and he hatn, as you 

* behold, made of my house a garrison againit the 
' castle, where he is. I for my part have trans- 

* gresscd greatly ; and he that is clean, it is well 
' for him. But I say, I have transgressed greatly, 
f in keeping silence, when I should have spoken ° 

* and in perverting justice, when I should have ex- 
' ccutcd the same. True, I have suffered some- 
' thing at the hands of Diabolus, for taking part 

* with the laws of king Shaddai ; but that, alas ! 

* what will that do ! Will that make compensation 
f for the rebellions and treasons that 1 have done, 
f and have suffered, without gainsaying, to be com- 



182 HOLY WAR, 



Execution begins his work. 



e mitted in the town of Mansoul ? O I tremble 
s to think what will be the end of this so dreadful 
f and so ireful a beginning !' 

4 Now while these brave captains were thus busy 
in the house of the old recorder, captain Execu- 
tion was as busy in other parts of the town, in se- 
curing the back-streets and the walls. He also 
hunted the lord Will-be-will sorelj-, and suffered 
him not to rest in any corner. He pursued so hard 
that he drove his men from him, and made him glad 
to thrust his head into a hole. Also this mighty 
warrior cut three of lord Will-be-will's officers 
down to the ground ; one was o]d Mr. Prejudice 
he that had his crown cracked in the mutiny ; this 
man was made, by. my lord Will-be-will, keeper 
of Ear-gate, and fell by the hand of captain Ex- 
ecution. There was also one Mr. Backward-to- 
all-but-naught, and he also was one of the lord 
Will-be-will's officers, and was the captain of 
the two guns that once were mounted on the top 
of Ear-gate ; he also was cut down to the ground 
by the hands of captain Execution. Besides these 
£wo, there was another, a third, and his name wag 
captain Treacherous, a vile man this was, but one 
that W ib* se-wi^l put a'great deal of confidence 
in ; but him also did this captain Execution cut 
down to the ground with the rest. He also made $ 
very great slaughter among my lord Will-be- 
will's soldiers, killing many that were stout and 
I'turdy, and wounding many^lhat for Diabolus 



HOLY WAR. , 133 



Many s'n.s destroyed 



were nimble and active. But all these were Diabo- 
2.0NJANS ; there was not a man, a native of Man- 
boul, hurt. 

Other feats of war were likewise performed by 
other of the captains, as at Eye-gate, where cap- 
tain Good-hope and captain Charity had a 
charge, was great execution done ; for captain 
Good-hope, with his own hands, slew one captain 
Blind-fold, the keeper of this gate .' this Blind- 
fold was captain of a thousand men, and they were 
they that fought with mauls ; he also pursued his 
men, slew many, and wounded many more, and 
made the rest hide their heads in corners. 

There was also at that gate Mr. Ill-pause, of 
whom you have heard before ; he was an old man, 
and had a beard that reached down to his girdle : 
the same was he that was orator to Diabolus : he 
did much mischief in the town of Mansoul, and 
fell by the hands of captain Good-hope. 

What shall I say ? The Diabolians in these 
4ay3 lay dead in every corner, though too many yet 
were alive in Mansoul. 

Now the old recorder, and my lord Under- 
standing with some others of the chief of the 
town, to wit, such as knew they must stand or fall 
with the famous town of Mansoul, came together 
upon a day, and, after consultation had, jointly 
agreed to draw up a petition and send it to Ema- 
nuel, now while he sat in the gate of Mansoul. 
So they drew up their petition to Emanuel, the 
contents whereof were these : ' That, they the old 



HI HOLY WAR. 



Satan's strong hold beaten down. 



* inhabitants of the deplorable town of Mansoul, 

* confessed their sin, and were sorry that they had 

* offended his princely majesty, and prayed that 

* he would spare their lives. 

Unto this petition he gave no answer at all, and 
that troubled them yet so much the more. Now 
all this while the captains that were in the recorder's 
house were playing with the battering- rams at the 
gates of the castle, to beat them down. So after 
some time, labour, arid travail, the gate of the castle 
which was called Impregnable was beaten oper- 
and broken into several splinters, and so away was 
made to go into the hold in which Diaeolus had 
hid himself* Then were tidings sent down to Mar- 
gate, for Emanuel still abode there, to let him 
know that a way was made in at the gates of the 
castle of Mansovl. But O how the trumpets 
at the tidings sounded throughout the Prince's 
camp, for that now the war was so near an end, and 
Mansoul itself "of being set free !- 

Then the Prince arose from the place where he 
was, and took with him such of his men of war as 
were fittest for the expedition, and marched up the 
streets of Mansoul to the old recorder's house. 

Now the Prince himself was clad all in armour 
of gold, and so he marched up the town with his 
standard borne before him ; but he kept his -coun- 
tenance much reserved all the way as he went, so 
that the people could not tell how to gather to them- 
selves love or hatred by his looks. Now as he march- 
ed up the street, the townsfolk came out at eveTy door 



HOLY WAR. 135 



The fears of the soul. 



to see, and could not but betaken with his person, 
and the glory thereof, but wondered at the reserved- 
ness of his countenance ; for as yet he spake more 
to them by his actions and works than he did by 
words and smiles. But also poor Mansoul (as in 
such cases all are apt to do) interpreted the carriage 
of Emanuel to them, as did Joseph's brethren his 
to them, even all the quite contrary way : for, thought 
they, if Emanuel loved us, he would shew it to us 
by word or carriage ; but none of these he does, 
therefore Emanuel hates us. Now if Emasdel 
hates us, Mansoul shall be slain, then Mansoul 
shall become a dunghill. They knew that they had 
transgressed his law, and that against him they had 
been in league with Diabolus his enemy. They 
also knew that Prince Emanuel knew all this ; for 
they were convinced that he was an angel of God, 
to know al! things that are done in the earth. And 
this made them think that their condition was mise- 
rable, and that the good Prince would make them 
desolate. 

And, thought they, what time so fit to do it in as 
now, when he hath the bridle of Mansoul in his 
hand ? And this I took special notice of, that the 
inhabitants, notwithstanding all this, could not, no, 
they could not, when they saw him march through 
the town, but cringe, bow, bend, and were ready 
to lick the dust off his feet : they also wished a thou- 
sand times over, that he would become their prince 
and captain, and would become their protector. 
They would also talk one to aaothcr of the comeii- 



126 HOLY WAR. 



Satan clings fast to the soul. 



jiess of his person, and how much for glory and va- 
lour he outstrip! the great ones of the world. But 
poor hearts ! as to themselves, their thoughts would 
change and go upon all manner of extremes. Yea, 
through the working of them backward and forward, 
Mansoul became as a ball tossed, and as a rolling 
thing before a whirlwind. 

Now when he was come to the castle-gates, he 
commanded Djabolus to appear, and to surrender 
himself into his hands. But O how loth was the 
beast to appear ! How he stuck to it ! how he 
shrunk ! how he cringed ! Yet now he came to the 
Prince. Then Emanuel commanded, and they 
took Diabolus, and bound him fast, in chains, 
the better to reserve him to the judgment that he 
had appointed for him. But Diabolus stood up 
to entreat for himself, that Emanuel would not 
send him into the deep, but suffer him to depart out 
of Mansoul in peace. 

When Emanuel had taken him and bound him 
in chains, he led him into the market-place, and 
there before Mansoul stript him of his armour, 
which he boasted so much of before. This now 
was one of the acts of triumph of Emanuel over 
his enemy : and all the while the giant was strip- 
ping, the trumpets of the golden Prince sounded 
amain ; the captains also shouted, and the soldiers 
san^for joy. Then was Mansoul called upon to 
behold Emanuel's triumph over him in whom they 
had so much trusted, and of whom they had su 
much boasted in the days when he flattered them. 



HOLY WAR. 131 



Joy at fhe sinner's return. 



Thus having made Diabolus naked in the eyes 
of Mansoul, and before the commanders of the 
Priuce, in the next plate he commands that Dia- 
bolus should be bound with chains to his chariot- 
wheels. Then leaving some of his forces, to wit, 
captain Boanerges and captain Conviction, a 
guard for the castle-gates, that resistance might be 
made on his behalf (if any that heretofore foUowed 
Diabolus should make an attempt to possess it) he 
rode in triumph over him quite through the town of 
Mansoul, and ?c out at and before the gate called 
Eye-gate., to the plain where his camp lay. 

13ut you cannot think, unless you had been there 
(as I was) what a shout there was in Emanuel's 
camp, when they saw the tyrant bound by the hand 
of their noble Prince, and tied to his chariot-wheels, 
and they say,, he hath led captivity captive, and hath 
spoiled principalities and powers : Diabolus is 
iubjected to the power of the sword, and made thai 
object of all derision. 

Those also that ro<!e reformades, and that came 
down to see the battle, shouted with that greatness 
of voice, and sung with such melodious note?, that 
they caused them that dwelt in the highest orbs to 
open their windows, put out their heads, and look: 
down to see the cause of that glory.* 



* I say unto you, that likewise joy shall be in heaven over one 
^nner that repenteth, more than over ninety and nine just per- 
sons, which need no repentance. Likewise, 1 say unto you,' 
tiit'it- is. joy in the presence of the angels of God over on** %*riM9t 
that repenteth. Luke xv. 7, 10. 

s 



*5S . HOLY WAR. 



Satan cast out. 



The townsmen also, so many of them as beheld 
this sight, were as it were astonished, while they 
looked betwixt the earth and the heavens. True, 
they could not tell what would be the issue of things 
38 to them, all things being done in such excellent 
methods ; and I cannot tell how, but the things in 
the management of them seemed to cast a senile to- 
wards the town ; so that their eyes, their heads, 
their hearts, and their minds, and all that they had, 
were taken and held while they observed Emanuel's 
order. 

So when the brave Prince had finished this part 
of his triumph over Diabolus his foe, he turned 
him up in the midst of his contempt and shame, 
having given him a charge never more to be a pos- 
sessor of Mansoul. Then went he from Emanu- 
el, and out of the midst of his camp, to inherit the 
parched places in a salt land, seeking rest, but 
finding none.* 

Now captain Boanerges and captain Convic- 
tion were both of them men of very great majesty ; 
their faces were like the faces of lions, and their 
words like the roaring of the seas ; and they still 
quartered in Mr. Conscience's house, of whom 
mention was made before. When therefore the 
high and mighty Prince had thus far finished his 
triumph over Diaeolus, the townsmen had more 
leisure to view and behold the actions of the noble 



* When the unclean spirit is gone out of a maa, he wal.lt eth 
through dry places, seeking rest andfcndetu none. Mat, xii. 43. 



HOLY WAR. 139 



The fcat-s of the soul under conviction of »jn. 



captains. But the captains carried it with that ter- 
ror and dread in all they did (and you may be sure 
they had private instructions so to do), that they 
kept the town under continual heart-aching-, and 
caused in their apprehension, the well-being- f 
Mansoul for the future to stand in doubt before 
them, so that for some considerable time they nei- 
ther knew what rest or ease or peace or hope meant. 
Nor did the Prince himself as yet abide in the 
town of Mansoul, but in his royal pavilion in the 
camp, and in the midst of his Father's forces. S 
at a time convenient he sent special orders to cap • 
tain Boanerges, to summons Mansoul, the whole 
of the townsmen, into the castle -yard, and then and 
there before their faces, to take my lord Under- 
standing, Mr. Conscience, and that notable one 
the lord Will-be-will, and put them all three in 
ward, and that they should set a strong guard upon 
them there, until his pleasure concerning them was 
further known. Which orders, when the captains 
had put them in execution, made no small addition 
to the fears of the town of Mansoul ; for now, to 
their thinking-, were their former fears of the 
ruin of Mansoul confirmed. Now what deaf!* 
they should die, and how long they should be in 
dying, was that which most perplexed their head? 
and hearts : yea, they were afraid that Emanuei 
would command them all into the deep, the place 
that the prince Diaeolus was afraid of ; for they 
had deserved it. Also to die by the sword in the 
face of the town, and in the open way of disgrace. 



140 HOLY WAR. 



The sinner begins to pray. 



from the hand of so good and holy a prince, that, 
too, troubled them sore ; the town was also greatly 
troubled for the men committed to ward, for that 
they were their stay and their guide ; and for that 
they believed, that if those men were cut off, their 
execution would be but the beginning of the ruin 
of the town of Mansoul. Wherefore what do they, 
ljut, together wiih the men in prison, draw up a 
petition to the Prince, and sent it to Emanuel by 
the hand of Mr. Would-live. So he went and 
came to the Prince's quarters, and presented the 
petition ; the sum of which was this : 

e Great and wonderful potentate, victor ovef 
' Diarolus, and conqueror of the town of Man- 
' soul: we, the miserable inhabitants of that most 
c woeful corporation, humbly beg that we may find 
e favour in thy sight, and remember not against us 
e our former transgressions, nor yet the sins of the 
' chief of our town, but spare us according to the 
y greatness of thy mercy, and let us not die but live 

* in thy sight ; so shall we be willing to be t'hv 

* servants, and if thou shalt think fit, to gather our 
s meat under thy table. Amen.' 

So the petitioner went, as was said, with his peti- 
tion to the prince, and the Prince took it at his 
hand, but sent him away with silence. This still 
alllicted the town of Mansoul ; but yet consider- 
ing that now they must cither petition or die ( for now 
they could not do any thing else), therefore they 
consulted again, and sent another petition, which 
was much after the form and method of the former* 



HOLY WAIt. U\ 



Is in c-.irncs' lor mere v. 



When the petition was drawn up, bv whom should 
they Fend if, was the next question : for they would 
not send it by him by whom thev sent the first ( for 
they thought that the Princehad taken some offence 
at the 'maimer of his deportment before them), so 
thev attempted to make captain Conviction their 
messenger with it; but. he said, that he neither 
durst nor would petition Emanuel for traitors, nor 
be to the Prince an advocate for rebels : yet withal, 
said he, our Prince is good, and you may adventure 
to send it by the hand of one of your town ; pro- 
vided he went with a rope about his head, and 
pleaded nothing but mercy. 

Well, they made, through fear, their delays as 
long as they could, and longer than delays were 
good ; but fearing at last the danger of them, thev 
thought, but with many a fainting in their minds, to 
send their petition by Mr. Desires-awake ; so they 
sent for Mr. Desires-aware. Now lie dwelt in 
a very mean cottage in Mansoul ; and he came at 
his neighbours' request. So they told him what they 
had done, and what they would do concerning peti- 
tioning, and that they desired of him that he would 
go therewith to the Prince. Then said Mr. Desires- 
awake, Why should I not do the best I can to 
save so famous a town as Mansoul from destruc- 
tion ? They therefore delivered the petition to him, 
and told him how he must address himself to the 
Prince, awd wished him ten thousand good speeds. 
So he came to the Prince's pavilion, as the first, aud 
asked to speak with his Majesty : so word was car- 



142 'HOLY- WAR. 



Christ's Majesty overwhelms the awakened sinner, 



lied ioJSMANUEL, and the Prince came out to the 
man, When Mr. Desires-awake saw the Prince, 
lie fell flat with his face to the ground, and cried out, 
O that Mansoul might live before thee ! and with 
that he presented the petition. The which- when 
the prince had read, he turned away for a while and 
wept ; but refraining himself, he turned again to the 
man (who all this while lav crying at his feet as at 
first), and said to him, Go thy way to thy place, 
and I will consider of thy requests. 

Now you may think that they, of Mansoul that 
had sent him, what with guilt, and what with fear, 
lest their petition should be rejected, could not but 
look with many a" longing look, and that too with 
strange workings of heart, tospe what would become 
<>f their petition. At last they saw their messenger 
coming hack ; so when he was come they asked 
him how he fared ? What Emanuel said ? And 
what was become of the petition ?. But he told 
them, that he would be silent till he came to the 
prison to my lord mayor, my lord Will-be- will, 
and Mr. Recorder. So he went forwards towards 
the prison-house, where the men of Mansoul lay 
bound. But O ! what a multitude flocked after to 
hear what the messenger said. So when he was 
come, and had shewed himself at the gate of the 
prison, my lord mayor himself looked as white as a 
rlout, the recorder also quaked; but they asked 
and said, Come, good sir, what did the great Prince 
<ay to you ? Then said Mr. Desires-awake, 
When I came to my Lord's pavilion, I called, and 



HOLY WAR: 143 



Fears and doubts. 



he came forth ; so I fell prostrate at his feet, asd 
delivered to him my petition (for the greatness of 
his person and the glory of his countenance, would 
net suffer me to stand upon my legs). Now as he 
received the petition, I cried, O that Mansoul 
might live before thee ! So when for a while he 
had looked thereon, he turned about, and said to his 
servant, Go thy way to thy place again, and I will 
consider of thy requests. The messenger added 
moreover, and said, The Prince to whom you ttut 
me, is such a one for beauty and glory, that whoso 
sees him, must love and fear him : I for my part can 
do no less ; hut I know not what will be the end of 
these things. At this answer they were all at a 
stand, both they in prison, and they that followed 
the messenger to hear the news ; nor knew they 
what, or what manner of interpretation to put cu 
what the Prince had said. Now when the prison 
was cleared of the throng, the prisoners begati to 
comment among themselves upon Emanuel's words. 
My lord mayor said, that the answer did not io^k 
with a rugged face ; but WiLL-BE-wiLLsaid it be* 
tokened evil ; and the recorder, that it was a mes- 
senger of death. Now they that were left, and that 
stood behind, and so could not so well hear what 
the prisoners said, some of them catched hold of 
one piece of a sentence, and some on a bit of ano- 
ther ; some took hold of what the messenger said, 
and some of the prisoner's judgment thereon, so 
none had a right understanding of things ; but you 



m HOLY WAft:" 

The distressing state of an awakened soul. 



cannot imagine what work these people made, and 
what confusion there was in Mansoul now. 

For presently they that had heard what was said; 
flew about the town, one crying one thing and ano- 
ther quite the contrary, and both were sure enough 
they told true, for they heard, they said, with their 
cars what was said, and therefore could not.be de- 
ceived. One would say, * We must all be killed ; f 
another would say, ' We must all be saved ;' and a 
third would say, c That the Prince would not be 

* concerned with Mansoul ;' and a fourth, ' That 

* the prisoners must be suddenly put to death :' and 
as I said, every one stood to it, that he told his tale 
the rightcst, and that all others but he were out. 
Wherefore now Mansoul had molestation upon 
molestation, nor could any man know on what to 
rest the sole of his foot ; for one would go by now, 
and, as he went, if he heard his neighbour tell his 
tale, to be sure he would tell the quite contrary, and 
both would stand in it that he told the truth. Nay 
some of them had got this story by the end, ' That 
c the Prince intended to put Mansoul to the 
*s\vord.' And now it began to be dark ; wherefore 
poor Mansoul was in sad perplexity all that nighty 
until the next morning. 

But, so far as I could gather by the beat infor- 
mation I could get, all this hubbub came through the 
words that the recorder bad said, when he told theni; 
that h his judgment the Prince's answer was a mes- 
senger of death. 'Twas this that fired the tow*; 



HOLY WAR. 145 



Renewed petitions. 



and that began the fright in Mansoul ; for Man- 
soul in former times used to count that Mr. Re- 
corder was a seer, that his sentence was equal to (he 
best of oracles ; and thus was Mansoul a terror to 
itself. 

And now they began to feel the effects of stubborn 
rebellion- and unlawful resistance against their 
Prince. I say, they now began to feel the ef- 
fects thereof by guilt and fear, that now had swal- 
lowed them up ; and who more involved in the 
one, but they that were most in the other, to wit> 
the chief of the town of Mansoul ? 

To be brief, when the fame of the fright was out 
of the town, and the prisoners had a little recovered 
themselvea, they take tothemse-lves some heart, and 
think to petition the Prince again for life. So they 
drew up a third petition, the contents whereof were 
these : 

' Prince Emanuel, the great Lord of all worlds, 
e and master of mercy, we thy poor, wretched, 
' miserable, dying town of Mansoul, do confess 
s unto thy great and glorious Majesty, that we have 
' sinned against thy Father and Thee ; and are no 
e more worthy to be called thy Mansoul, but 
c rather to be cast into the pit. If thou wilt slay us 
' we have deserved it. If thou wilt condemn us to 

* the deep, we cannot but say thou art righteous. 

* We cannot complain, whatever thou dost, or 

* however thou earnest it towards us. But oh ! 
' let mercy reign, and let it be extended to us ! 

* O let mercy take hold upon us, and free us from 

T 



145 frOLY WAR; 



Good deeds not to be depended upon. 



' our transgressions, and we will sing of thy mercy 
' and of thy judgments ! Araen.' 

This petition, when drawn up, was designed to bs 
sent to the Prince as the first ; but who should 
carry it, that was the question. Some said, let him 
do it that went with the first ; but others thought 
good not to do that, and that because he sped no 
better. Now there was an old man in the town, 
and his name was Mr. Good-deed ; a man that 
bare only the name, but had nothing of the nature 
of the thing. Some were for sending him ; but the- 
recorder was by no means for that : for, said he, we 
now stand in need of, and are pleading for mercy, 
wherefore to send our petition by a man of his 
name, will seem to cross the petition itself, should 
we make Mr. Good-deed our messenger, when 
our petition cries for mercy. 

Besides, quoth the old gentleman, should the 
Prince now, as he receives the petition, ask him, and 
say, What is thy name ? (and nobody knows but 
he will) and he should say Old Good-deed ; what 
think you would Emanuel say but this, Ay, is old 
Good-deed yet alive in Mansoul r" then let old 
Good-deed save you from your distresses. And u 
he says so, I am sure we are lost, nor can a thousand 
©fold Good-deeds save Mansoul. 

After the recorder had given in his reasons, why 
old Good-deed should not go with his petition to 
Emanuel, the rest of the prisoners and chiefs of 
Mansoul opposed it also ; and so old Good-de&d 
fcas laid aside, and they agreed to send Mr. Bk- 



HOLY WAT?. M7 



Our prayers should b£ offered with tears and desires. 

sires-aware again. Accordingly they sent for him, 
and desired that he would a second time go with 
their petition to the Prince ; and he readily told 
them he would ; but they bid him, that in any wise 
he should take heed that in no word or carriage he 
gave offence to the Prince ; for by doing so., for 
aught we can tell, said they, you may bring Man- 
ecul into utter destruction. 

Now Mr. Desires-awake, when he saw that he 
must go on this errand, besought that they would 
grant that Mr. Wet-eyes mightgo with him. Now 
this Wet-eves was a near neighbour of Mr. De- 
sires, a poor man of broken spirit, yet one that 
could speak well to a petition. So they granted 
that he should go with him. Wherefore they ad- 
dressed themselves to their business : Mr. Desires 
put a rope upon his head, and Mr. Wet-eyes 
went with his hands wringing together. Thus thfjr 
went to the Prince's pavilion. 

Now when they went to petition this third time, 
they were not without thoughts that by often com- 
ing they might be a burden to the Prince. Where- 
fore when they were come to the door of his pavilion, 
they first made their apology for themselves, and 
for their coming to trouble Emanuel so often ; 
and they said, that they came not hither to-day for 
that they delighted to hear themselves talk, but for 
that necessity caused them to come to his Majesty ; 
they could, they said, have no rest day nor night, 
because of their transgressions against Shad da* 



148 HOLY WAR. 



Unworthiaess acknowledged. 



and Emanuel his Sod. They also thought that 
some misbehaviour of Mr, Desires- awake, the last 
time, might give some disgust to his highness, and: 
so cause that he returned from so merciful a Prince 
empty, and without countenance. So when they 
had made this apology, Mr. Desires-awake, cast 
himself prostrate upon the ground, as at the first, 
at the feet of the mighty Prince, saying, Oh that 
Mansoul might live before thee ! so he delivered 
his petition, The Prince, when he had read the 
petition, turned aside awhile as before ; and coming 
again to the place where the petitioner lay on the 
ground, he demanded what his name was, and of 
what esteem in the account of Mansoul, for that 
he, above all the multitude in Mansoul, should be 
sent to him on such an errand ? Then said the 
man to the Prince, O let not my Lord be angry : 
and why inquirest thou after such a dead dog as I 
am ? Pass by, I pray thee, and take no notice of 
whom I am, because there is, as thou very well 
knowest, so great a disproportion between me and 
thee. Why the townsmen chose to send me on this 
errand to my Lord, is best known to themselves ; 
but it could not be for that they had thought I had 
favour with my Lord. For my part, I am out of 
charity with myself : who then should be in love 
with me ? Yet live I would, and so would I that 
m) v townsmen should ; and because rioth they and 
myself are guilty of great transgressions, therefore 
|hey have sent me, and I am come in their names to 



HOLY Vf All. 149 



All n;<>rit rejeoted. 



"beg of my Lord for mercy. Let it please thee 
therefore to incline to mercy : but ask not what 
thy servants are. 

Then said the Prince, And what is he that is be- 
come thy companion in this so weighty a matter ? 
So Mr. Desires told Emanuel, that he was a 
poor neighbour of his, and one of his most intimate 
associates ; and his name, said he, may it please 
your most excellent Majesty, is Wet-eyes, of the 
town of Mansoul. I know that there are many 
of that name that are naught ; but I hope it will be 
no offence to my Lord, that I have brought my 
poor neighbour with me. 

Then Mr. Wet-eyes fell on his face to the 
ground, and made his apology for coming with 
bis neighbour to his Lord : 

• O my Lord (quoth he) what I am I know not 
' myself, nor whether my name be feigned or true. 
f especially when I begin to think what some have 

* said, namely, that this name was given me, be- 
rf cause Mr. Repentance was my father. Good 
' men have bad children, and the sincere do often- 
f times beget hypocrites. My mother also called 
' me by this name from my cradle ; whether because 
e of the moistness of my brain, or the softness of 

* my heart, I cannot tell. I see dirt in mine own 

* tears, and filthiness in the bottom of my prayers. 

* But I pray thee (and all this while the gentleman 

* wept), that thou wouldst not remember against us 
' our transgressions, nor take offence at the un- 

* qualifiedness of thy servants, but mercifully pass 



150 HOLY WAR. 



The a<ra;ravated nature of s-in. 



* by the sin of Man soul, and refrain from the 

* glorifying of thy grace no longer. ' 

So at his bidding, they arose, and both stood 
trembling before him, and he spake to them to this 
purpose : 

' The town of Mansoul hath grievously rcnclled 

* against my Father, in that they ha?e rejected him 
\ from being their king, and chose for themselves, 
' for their captain, a liar, a murderer and a run- 
e nagate slave. For this Diabolus, yourpretend- 
' ed prince, though once so highly accounted of by 
' you, made rebellion against my Father and Me, 
e even in our palace and highest court there, think- 
c ing to become a prince and a king. But being 
e timely discovered and apprehended, and for his 
' wickedness bound in chains, and separated to 
e the pit with those that were his companions, he of- 
' fered himself to you, and you have received 
' him.* 

e Now this is, and for a long time hath been, an 
' high affront to my Father ; wherefore my Father 
' sent to you a powerful army, to reduce you to 
' your obedience. Rut you know how these ni£n> 

* their captains, and their counsels, were esteemed 
' of you, and wiiat they received at your hand. 
' You rebelled against them, you shut your gates 
' upon them, you bid them battle ; you fought them, 
' and fought for Diabolus against them. So they 
' went to my Father for more power • I, with ray 
f men, am come to subdue you. But as you treated 

* the servants, so vou treated their Lord : you stood 



HOLY AVAR. ,151 



Sins onljr subdued by the poier of God. 



* up in hostile manner against me, you shut up your 
c gates against me, you turned a deaf ear to me, 
' and resisted as long as you could ; but now I 

* have made a conquest of yon. Did you cry to 
c me for mercy so long as you had hopes that you 
*' might prevail against me ? J»ut now I have taken 

* the town, you cry, but why did you not cry be- 
' fore, when the white flag of my mercy, the red 
' flag of justice, and the black flag that threatened 
f execution, were set up to cite you to it ? Now I 
c haye conquered your Diabolus, you come to me 
f for favour ; but why did you not help me against 
e the mighty ? Yet I will consider your petition, 

* and will answer it so as will be for my.glory.' 

f Go, bid captain Boanerges and captain Con ■• 
c viction brisg the prisoners out to me into the 
- camp to-morrow ; and say you to ca plain Judg- 
' ment and captain Execution, Stxiy in the castle, 
' and take good heed to yourselves that you keep 

* all quiet in Mansoul, until you shall hear further 
1 from me.' And with that he turned himself from 
them and went into his royal pavilion. 

So the petitioners, having received this answer 
from the Prince, returned as at the first, to go to 
their companions again. But they had not gone far 
but thoughts began to work in their minds, that no 
mercy as yet was intended by the Prince to Man- 
soul : so they went to the place where the prison- 
ers lay bound; but these workings of mind, about 
what would become of Mansoul, had such a strong 
power over them, that by that they were come imto 



15.2 HOLY W Ail. 



Sin delays returns to prayer. 



them that sent them., they were scarce able to de- 
liver their message. 

But they came at length to the gates of the tows 
(now the townsmen were waiting with eagerness 
for their return ), where many met them, to know 
what answer was given to the petition. Then they 
cried out to those that were sent, What news from 
the Prince ? And what hath Emanuel said ? 
But they said, that they must ( as afore ) go up to the 
prison, and there deliver their message. So away 
they went to the prison, with a multitude at theip 
heek. Now when they were come to the gates of 
the prison, they told the first part of Emanuel's 
speech to the prisoners, to wit, how he reflected 
upon their disloyalty to his Father and himself : and 
how they had chosen and closed with Diabolus> 
and fought for him, hearkened to him, and been ruled 
by him ; but had despised him and his men. This 
made the prisoners look pale ; but the messengers 
proceeded, and said, He the Prince said moreover, 
that yet he would consider your petition, and give 
such answer thereto as will stand with his glory* 
And as these words were spoken, Mr. Wet-eyes 
gave a sigh. At this they were all of them struck 
into their dumps, and could not tell what to say : 
fear also possessed them in marvellous manner, and 
death seemed to sit upon some of their eye-brows. 
Now there was in the company a notable sharp- 
witted fellow, a mean man of estate, and his name 
was old Inquisitive ; this man asked the peti- 
tioners if they had told out every whit of what Em a- 



HOLY WAR.. 153 



The terror of God's judgments. 



NUELsaid. And they answered. Verily no. Then 
said Inquisitive, I thought so indeed. Pray 
what was it more that he said unto you ? Then 
they paused awhile, but at last they brought out 
all, saying, The Prince ordered us to bid captain 
Boanerges and captain Conviction bring the pri- 
soners down to him to-morrow ; and that captain 
Judgment and captain Execution should take 
charge of trie castle and town till they should hear 
further from him. They said also, that wheu the 
Prince had commanded them so to do, he im- 
mediately turned his back upon them, and wentiutd 
li'u royal pavilion. 

But oh ! how this return, and especially this last 
clause of it, that the prisoners must go out to the 
Prince into the camp, brake all their loins in pieces ! 
Wherefore with one voice they set up a cry that 
reached up to the heavens. This done, each of 
the three prepared himself to die (and the recorder 
said unto them, This was the thing that I feared), 
for they concluded, that to-morrow, by that the sum 
went down, they should be tumbled out of the world. 
The whole town also counted of no other, but that 
in their time and order they must all drink of the 
same cup. Wherefore the town of Manscul spent 
that night in mourning, and sackcloth, and ashes. 
The prisoners also when the time was come to go 
down before the Prince, dressed themselves in 
mourning attire, with ropes upon their heads. The 
whole town of Mansoul also shewed themselves 
upon th« wall, and clad in mourning weeds, if per- 
v 



154= HOLY WAR. 



The prisoners conducted to the Prince's camp. 

haps the Prince, with the sight thereof, might be 
moved with compassion. But oh how the busy- 
bodies, that were in the town of Mansoul, now 
concerned themselves ! The.y ran . here and there 
through the streets of the town by companies, crying 
out as they ran in tumultuous wise, one after one 
manner, and another the quite contrary, to the al- 
most utter distraction of Mansqul. 

Well, the time is come that the prisoners must go 
down to the camp, and appear before the Prince. 
And thus was the manner of their going down: 
captain Boanerges went with a guard before them, 
and captain Conviction came behind, and the 
prisoners went bound in chains in the midst ; so I 
say, the prisoners went in the midst, and the guard 
went with flying colours behind and before, but the 
prisoners went with drooping spirits. Or more par- 
ticularly, thus : The prisoners went down all in 
mourning, they put ropes upon themselves, they 
went on smiting themselves on their breasts, but 
durst not lift up their eyes .to heaven. Thus they 
went out at the gate of Mansqul, till they came 
into the midst of the Prince's army, the sight and 
glory of which greatly heightened their affliction. 
Nor could they now longer forbear but cry out 
aloud, O unhappy men ! O wretched Mansoul ! 
Their chains still mixing their dolorous notes with 
the cries of the prisoners, made the noise more 
lamentable. 

So when they were come to the door of the 
Prince's pavilion, they cast themselves prostrate 



HOLY WAR. lob 



Confession of guiit. 



upon the place : then one went in and told the 
Lord that the prisoners were come down. The 
Prince then ascended a throne of state., and sent for 
the prisoners in ; who, when they came, trembled 
before Trim : also they covered their faces with 
shame. Now as they drew near the place where he 
sat, they threw themselves down before him. Then 
said the Prince to the captain Boanerges, Bid the 
prisoners stand upon their feet. Then they stood 
trembling before him ; and he said, Are you the 
men that heretofore were the servants of Shabdai ? 
And they said,, Yes, Lord, yes. Then said the 
Prince again, Are you the men that suffered your- 
selves to be corrupted and defiled by that abomi- 
nable one Diabolus ? And they said, We did 
more than suffer it, Lord ; for we chose it of our 
mind. The Priuce asked further, saying, Could 
you have been content that your slavery should 
have continued under his tyranny as long as you 
had lived ? Then said the prisoners, Yes, Lord, 
yes ; for his ways were pleasing to our flesh, and we 
were grown aliens to a better state. And did you, 
said he, when I came against this town of Mansoul, 
heartily wish that I might not have the victory over 
you ? Yes, Lord, yes, said they. Then said the 
Prince, And what punishment is it, think you, that 
you deserve at my hands, for these and other your 
high and mighty sins ? And they said, Both death 
and the deep, Lord, for we have deserved no less. 
He asked again, If they had aught to say for them- 



?5d iHOLT WAR. 



The victory of Christ over the sinner. 

selves, why the sentence, which they confessed they 
had deserved, should not be passed upon them ? 
And they said, We can say nothing, Lord, thou art 
just, for we have sinned. Then said the Prince, 
And foe what are these ropes on your heads ? The 
prisoners answered, The ropes are to lead us withal 
to the pi ce of execution, if mercy be not pleasing 
in thy sight.* So he further asked, if all the men 
in the town of Mansoul were in this confession as 
they? And they answered, All the natives, Lord: 
but for the Di aboloni an s, they came into our 
town when the tyrant got possession of us, we can 
say nothing for them. 

Then the Prince -commanded that an herald 
should be called ; and that he should in the 
midst and throughout the camp of Emanuel 
proclaim, and that with sound of trumpet, that 
the Prince, the Son of Shaddai, had, in his 
Father's name, and for his Father'^ glory, got- 
ten a perfect conquest and victory over Man- 
soul ; and that the prisoners should follow him, 
and say Amen. So this was done as he had com- 
manded. 

And presently the music that was in the upper 
region sounded melodiously. The captains that 
were in the camp shouted, and the soldiers sung 
songs of triumph to the Prince, the colours waved 



* Ills own iniquities shall take the wicked himself, and he shall 
l»e holden with the cords of his sins. Pro. v. 22. 



HOLY WAR. f37 



The pardon proclaimed. 



in the wind, and great, joy was every where, only it 
wa« wanting as yet in the hearts of the men of 
Mansoul. 

Then the Prince called to the prisoners to come 
and stand again before him ; and they came and 
stood trembling. And he said unto them, The 
sfins, trespasses, and iniquities, that you, with the 
whole town of Mansoul, have from time to 
lime committed against my Father and Me, I have 
power and commandment from my Father to for- 
give to the town of Mansoul, and do forgive you 
accordingly. And having so said, he gave then* 
written :n parchment, and sealed with seven seals, 
a large and general pardon, commanding rav lord* 
mayor, lord Will-be-will, and Mr. Recorder, 
to proclaim, and cause it to be proclaimed to-mor- 
row, by that the sun is up, throughout the whole 
town of Mansoul. 

Moreover the Prince stripped the prisoners of 
their mourning weeds, and gave them beauty for 
ashes, the oil of joy for mourning, and the garment 
of praise for the spirit of heaviness.* 

Then he gave to each of the three, jewels of gold 
and precious stor.es ; and took away their ropes, 
lit chains of gold about their necks, and ear- 
rings in their ears. Now the prisoners, when they 



* To appoint unto thera that mourn in Zion, to give unto them 
beauty for ashes, the oil of joy for mourning-, tb* garment of praise 
for the spirit of heaviness; that they might be called trees' of 
Righteousness, the planting of the Lord, that he might bo glo- 
rified. Isa. lxi. 3. 



158 HOLY WAR. 



Tbe joy of pardon unspeakable. 



had heard the gracious words of Prince Emanuel, 
and had beheld all that was done unto them, fainted 
almost quite away ; for the grace, the benefit, the 
pardon, was sudden, glorious, and so big, that they 
were not able without staggering to stand up un- 
der it. Yea, my lord Will-be-will swooned 
outright | but the Prince stept up to him, put his 
everlasting arms under him, embraced him, kissed 
him, and bid him be of good cheer, for all should be 
performed according to his word. He also kissed, 
embraced, and smiled upon the other two that were 
Will-be-wili/s companions, saying, Take these aa 
further tokens of my love, favour, and compassion 
to you ; and I charge you, that you Mr. Recorder 
tell the town of Mansoul what you have heard and 
seen. 

Then were their fetters broken to pieces before 
their faces, and cast into the air, and their steps 
were enlarged under them. Then they fell at the 
feet of the Prince, kissed them, and wettedfthem 
with tears ; they also cried out with a mighty strong 
voice, saying, f Blessed be the glory of the Lord 
< from this place !' So they were bid rise up, and 
go to the town and tell Mansoul what the Prince 
had done. He commanded also, that one with 
pipe and tabor should go and play before them 
all the way into the town of Mansoul. Then was 
fulfilled what they never looked for, and ihey were 
made io possess what they never dreamt of. The 
Prince also called for the noble captain Credence, 
and commanded that -he and some of his officers 



HOLY AVAR , Vz9 



After pardon Judgment and Execution 



should march before the noblemen of Mansoul, 
with flying colours into the town. He gave also 
unto captain Credence a charge, that about the 
time that the recorder read the general pardon in 
the town of Man soul, that at that very time he 
should with flying colours march in at Eye-gate, 
with his ten thousand at his feat ; and that he 
should so go until he came by the high street of the 
town, up to the castle-gates ; and that himself should 
take possession thereof, against his Lord came 
thither. He commanded, moreover, that he should 
bid captain Judgment and captain Execution 
leave the strong hold to him, and withdraw from 
Mansoul, and return into the camp with speed un- 
to the Prince. 

And now was the town of Mansoul also de- 
livered from the terror of the first four captains and 
their men. 

Well, I told you before bow the prisoners were 
entertained by the noble Prince Emanuel, and 
how they behaved themselves before him, and how 
he sent them away to their home with pipe and ta- 
bor going before them. And now you must think 
that those ofthe town, that had all this, while waited 
to hear of their death, could not but be exercised 
with sadness of mind, and with thoughts that pricked 
like thorns. Nor could their thoughts be kept to 
any one point ; the wind blew them all this while at 
great uncertainties, yea, their hearts were like a ba- 
lance that had been disquieted by a shaking hand. 
But at last/as they, with many a longing look, locked 



$30 :ilOLY V/All. 



ie diiiereoce of the iou'i under conviction anfl under pardon. 



over the wall of Mansoul, they thought they saw 
' some return to the town ; and thought again, who 
should they be too, who should they be ? At last 
they discerned that they were the prisoners ; but 
can you imagine how their hearts were surprised 
with wonder, especially when they perceived also 
in what equipage, and with what honour they were 
, sent home ! They went down to the camp in black, 
but they came back to the town in white ; they 
vent down to the camp in ropes, they came back 
in chains of gold ; they went down to the camp 
with feet in fetters, but came back with their steps 
enlarged under them ; they went to the camp look- 
ing for death, but came back from thence with as- 
surance of life ; they went down to the camp with 
heavy hearts, but came back again with pipe and 
4 abor playing before them* As soon as they came to 
Eye-gate, the poor and tottering town of Maw- 
soul adventured to give a shout; and they gave 
such a shout as made the captains in the Prince's 
army leap at the sound thereof. Alas for them, 
poor hearts ! who could blame them ? since their 
dead friends were come to life again ; for it was to 
them as life from the dead, to see the antients of 
the town of Mansoul shine in such splendor. 
They looked for nothing but the axe and the block ; 
but behold joy and gladness, comfort and consola- 
tion, and such melodious notes attending them, that 
"\yere sufficient to make a sick man well.* So when 

* And the inhabitant shall not say I am sick : the people that 



HOLY WAR. m 



Joy at deliverance and pardon. 



thev came up, they saluted each other : Welcome, 
welcome, and blessed be hethat spared you ! They 
added also, We see it is well with you ; but how must 
it go with the town of Mansoul ? And will it go 
well with the town of Mansoul ? said they. Then 
answered them the recorder and the lord mayor : 
Oh ! Tidings ! glad tidings ! good tidings of good, 
and of great joy to poor Mansoul! Then thev 
gave anotber shout that made the earth ring again. 
After this, they inquired yet more particularly how 
things went in the camp, and what message they 
had from Emanuel to the town. So they told them 
all passages that had happened to them in the camp, 
and every thing that the Prince did to them. This 
made Mansoul wonder at the wisdom and grace 
of the Prince Emanuel : then they told them what 
they had received at his hands for the whole town 
of Mansoul, and the recorder delivered it in these 
words ; ' Pardon, pardon for Mansoul ; and this 
' shall Mansoul know to-morrow/ Then he com- 
manded and they went and summoned Mansoul 
to meet together in the market-place to-morrow 
there to hear their general pardon read. 

But who can think what a turn, what a change, 
what an alteration this hint of things made in the 
countenance of the town of Mansoul! No man 
of Mansoul could sleep that night for joy ; in 
every house there was joy and music, singing and 
making merry : telling and hearing of Emanuel's 
happiness, was all that Mansoul had to do : and 
this was the burden of all their song, f Oh more of 



162 HOLY WAR. 



Praises to the Prince of Life. 



' this at the rising of the sun ! more of this to-mor- 
' row f Who thought yesterday, one would say, 
"" that this day would have been such a day to us ! 

* And who thought, that saw our prisoners go 

* down in irons, that they should ha\e returned in 

* chains of gold ! . Yea they that judged them- 

* selves as they went to be judged of their Judge, 

* were by his mouth acquitted ; not for that they 

* were innocent, but of the Prince's mercy, and 

* sent home with pipe and tabor. But is this the 

* common custom of princes ? Do they use to 

* shew such kind of favour to traitors ? No ! this 
f is only peculiar to Shaddai, and unto Emanuel 
' his Son/ 

Now morning drew on apace ; wherefore the 
lord mayor, the lord Will-be-will, and Mr. Re- 
corder, came down to the market-place at the time 
that the Prince had appointed, where the townsfolk 
were waiting for them : and when they came, they 
came in that attire and in that glory which the 
Prince had put them into the day before, and the 
street was lightened with their glory : so the mayor, 
recorder, and my lord Will-be-will, drew down 
to Mouth-gate, which was at the lower end of 
the market-place, because that of old time was the 
place where they used to read public matters ; 
thither therefore they came in their robes and their 
tabor went before them. Now the eagerness of the 
people to know the full matter was great. 

Then the recorder stood up upon his feet, and 
first beckoning with his hand for silence he read out 



HOLY WAR. 163 



Joy at tht- salvation of man. 



ame 



with a loud voice the pardon. But when he cj 
to these words, " The Lord, the Lord God is mer- 
"ciful and gracious, pardoning- iniquity, trans- 
" gressions, and sins :" and to them, " all manner 
" of sin and blasphemy shall be forgiven/' &c. 
(Exod. xxxiv. 6, Mark iii. 28.) they could not 
forbear leaping for joy : for this jou must know, 
that there was conjoined therewith every man'* 
name in Mansoul,' also the seals of the pardon 
made a brave shew. 

When the recorder had made an end of reading 
the pardon, the townsmen ran upon the walls of the 
town, leaped thereon for joy, and bowing themselves 
seven times with their faces towards Emanuel's 
pavilion, shouted aloud for joy, and said, c Let 
' Emanuel live forever.' 

Then order was given to the young men in Man- 
soul, that they should ring the bells for joy ; so 
the bells rung, the people sung, and the music 
played in every house in Mansoul. 

When the Prince had sent borne the three pri- 
soners of Mansoul with joy and pipe and tabor, 
he commanded his captains, with all the field officers 
and soldiers throughout his army, to be ready in the 
morning that the recorder should read the pardon 
in Mansoul, to do his further pleasure. So the 
morning, as I have shewed, being come, just as the 
recorder had made an end of reading the pardon, 
Emanuel commanded that all the trumpets in the 
camp should sound, that the colours should be dis- 
played, half of them upon mount Gracious, and 
half of them upon mount Justice. He com- 



164 HOLY WAR. 



TUe ability of Christ's soldiers. 



nianded also, thnt all the captains should shew 
themselves in their complete harness, and that the 
soldiers should shout for joy. Nor was captain 
Credence, though in the castle, silent on such a 
day, but he from the top of the hold shewed him- 
self with the sound of trumpet to Mansoul, and to 
the Prince's camp. 

Thus have I shewn you the manner and way 
that Emanuel took to recover the town of Man- 
soul from under the hand and power of the tyrant 
Djabolus. 

Now when the Prince had completed these out- 
ward ceremonies of his joy, he again commanded 
that his captains and soldiers should shew unto 
Mansoul some feats of w ar. So they presently ad- 
dressed themselves to this work. But oh ! with 
what agility, nimbleness, dexterity, and bravery, 
did these military men discover their skill in feats of 
warto the now gazing town of Mansoul. 

They marched, they countermarched, they open- 
ed to the right and left, they divided and subdivided, 
they closed, they wheeled, made good their front 
and rear with their right and left wings, and twen- 
ty things more, with that aptness, and then were aH 
as they were again, that they took, yea ravished 
the hearts that were in Mansoul to behold it. But 
add to this, the handling of their arms, the manag- 
ing of their weapons of war, were marvellous taking 
to Mansoul and me. 

When this acticm was over, the whole town of 
Mansoul came out as one man to the Prince in the 
camp, to praise him, and thank him for his abun« 



HOLY WAR. 165 



Holy souls would be a habitatioafor Christ. 



dant favour, and to beg that it would please his 
grace to come unto Mansoul with his men, and 
there to take up his quarters for ever. And this 
they did in the most humble manner, bowing them- 
selves seven times to the ground before him. Then 
said he, " All peace be to you :" So the town came 
nigh, and touched with the hand the top of his gol- 
den sceptre ; and they said, Oh ! that the Prince 
Emanuel, with his captains and men of war would 
dwell in Mansoul for ever ; and that his battering 
rams and slings might be lodged in her, for the use 
and service of the Prince, and the help and strength 
of Mansoul ! for, said they, we have room for 
thee, we have room for thy men, we have also room 
for thy weapons of war, and a place to make a ma- 
gazine for thy carriages. Do it Emanuel, and 
thou shalt be king and captain in Mansoul for 
ever : yea, govern thou also according to all the 
desire of thy soul, and make thou governors and 
princes under thee of thy captains and men of war, 
and we will become thy servants, and thy laws 
shall be our direction. 

They added moreover, and prayed his majesty to 
consider thereof : for, said they, if now, after all 
this grace bestowed upon us, thy miserable town of 
Mansoul, thou shouldest withdraw, thou and thy 
captains from us, the town of Mansoul will die. 
Yea, said they, our blessed Emanuel, if thou 
shouldest depart from us now, after thou hast done 
so much good for us, and shewed so much mercy 
junto uti what will follow, but thai; our joy will be as 



» HOLY WAR. 



Christians fear their own lusts. 



if it had not been, and our enemies will a second 
time come upon us with more rage than at the first ? 
Wherefore, we beseech thee, O thou the desire of 
our eyes, and the strength and life of our poor 
town, accept of this motion that now we have made 
unto our Lord, and come, come and dwell in the 
midst of us, and let us be thy people. Besides., 
Lord, we do not know, but that to this day many 
Diabolonians may yet be lurking in the town of 
Mansoul ; and they will betray us when thou 
shalt leave us, into the hands of Diabolus again ; 
and who knows what designs, plots, and contri- 
vances, have passed betwixt them about these things 
already ? Loth we are to fall again into his hor- 
rible hands. Wherefore let it please thee to accept 
of our palace for thy place of residence, and of the 
house of the best men of our town for the recep- 
tion of thy soldiers and their furniture. 

Then said the Prince, If I come to your town* 
will you suffer me further to prosecute that which 
is in mine heart against mine enemies and yours f 
Yea, will you help me in such undertakings ? 

They answered, We know not what we shall do; 
we did not think once that we should have been such 
traitors to Shaddai as we have proved to be. 
What then shall we say to our Lord ? Let him put 
no trust in his saints : let the Prince dwell in our 
castle, and make of our town a garrison ; let him 
set his noble captains and his warlike soldiers over 
us ; yea, let him conquer us with his love, and over- 
come us, aid help us, as he was and did that mom* 



WAR. 167 



They desire Christ to dwell in them. 



ingour pardon was read unto us, we shall comply 
with this our Lord and with his ways, and fall in 
with his word against the mighty. 

One word more, and thy servants have, done, and 
in this will trouble our Lord no more. We know 
not the depth of the wisdom of thee our Prince. 
Who could have thought that had been ruled by 
his reason, that so much sweet as we now enjoy 
should have come out of those bitter trials where- 
with we were tried at the first ! But, Lord, let 
light go before, and let love come after : yea, take 
us by the hand, and lead us by thy. counsels ; and 
let this always abide upon us, that all things shall 
be for the best for thy servants, and come to our 
Mansoih, do as it pleaseth thee. Or, Lord, come 
to our Mansoul and do w r hat thou wilt, so thou 
kerpest us from sinning, and makest us serviceable 
to thy Majesty, 

Then said the Prince to the town of Mansoul 
again, Go, return to your houses in peace. I will 
willingly in this comply with your desires : I will 
remove my royal pavilion ; I will draw up my 
forces before Eye-gate to-morrow, and so will 
march forwards in(o the town of Mansoul ; I will 
possess myself of your castle of Mansoul, and 
will set my soldiers over you ; yea, I will yet do 
things in Mansoul that cannot be paralleled in 
any nation, country, or kingdom under heaven. 

Then did the men of Mansoul give a shout, and 
return into their houses in peace ; they also told to 
their kindred and friends the good that Emaki/el 



168 HOLY WAR. 



Chiust -velcoine to the renewed soul. 



had promised to Mansoul. And to-morrow, said 
they, he will march into our town, and take up his 
dwelling, he and his men in Mansoul. 

Then went out the inhabitants of the town of 
Mansoul with haste to the green trees, and to the 
meadows, to gather boughs and flowers, therewith 
to strew the streets against their Prince the Son or 
Shaddai should come ; they also made garlands 
and other fine works, to betoken how joyful they 
were and should be to receive their Emanuel 
in Mansoul ; yea, they strewed the street quite 
from Eye-gate to the castle -gate, the place where 
the prince should be. They also prepared for his 
coming what music the town of Mansoul could 
afford, that they might play before him to the place 
of his habitation. 

So at the time appointed he makes his approach 
to Mansoul, and the gates were set open for him ; 
there also the antients and elders of the town of 
Mansoul met him, to salute him with a thousand 
welcomes. Then he arose and entered Mansoul, 
he and all his servants. The elders of Mansoul 
also went dancing before him, till he came to the 
castle-gates. And this was the manner of his going 
up thither : he was clad in his golden armour, he 
rode in his royal chariot, the trumpets sounded 
about him, the colours were displayed, his ten 
thousands went up at his feet, and the elders of 
Mansoul danced before him. And now were the 
walls of the famous town of Mansoul filled with 
the tramplingsof the inhabitants thereof; who went 




jEmarmels triumhhal entry into > V//>//< '///. 



fi,mi,„/as// / ;-..l.-/.//tr,-7.s-/n /:///■/.//,/_/ - 



HOLY WAR. 169 



Christ poisesses the heart. 



up thither to view the approach of the blessed 
Prince and his royal army. Also the casements, 
windows, balconies, and topsof the houses,, wereall 
now filled with persons f .11 sorts, to uclio.J. how 
their town was to be filled with good. 

Now when he was come so far into the town as 
to the recorder's house, he commanded that one 
should go to captain Credence, to know whether 
the castle of Mansoul was prepared to entertain his 
royal presence ( for the preparation of that was left 
to that captain ) and word was brought that it was.* 
Then was captain Credence commanded also to 
come forth with his power to meet the Prince; which 
was done as he had commanded, and he conduct- 
ed him into the castle. f This done, the Prince 
that night lodged in the castle with his mighty 
captains and men of war, to the joy of the town of 
Mansoul. 

Now the next care of the townsfolk was, how the 
captains and soldiers of the Prince's army should be 
quartered among them ; and the care was, not how 
they should shift their hands of them, but how they 
should fill their houses with them : for every man in 
Mansoul now had that esteem of Emanuel and 
his men. that nothing grieved them more, than be- 
cause they were not enlarged enough, every one of 
them, to receive the whole army of the Pi i nee ; yea, 

* And put no difference between us and them, purifying their 
hearts by faith. Acts xv. Q. 

•f Wherefore be ye not unwise, but understanding vyhai the will 
of the Lord is. Eph. iii, 17. 

Y 



HOLV WAR. 



The distribution of the forces of the Prince. 



they counted il their glory to be waiting upon them, 
and would in those days run at their bidding like 
lacqueys. At last they came to this result : 

1. That captain Innocency should quarter at 
Mr. Reason's. 

2. That captain Patience should quarter at 
Mr. Mind's. This Mr. Mind was formerly the 
lord Will-be-will's clerk in the time of the re- 
bellion. 

3. It was ordered that captain Charity should 
quarter in Mr. Affection's house. 

4. That captain Good-hope should quarter at 
.my lord mayor's. Now for the house of the recor- 
der, himself desired, because his house was next to 
the castle, and because from him it was ordered by 
the Prince, that if need be, the alarm should be 
given to Mansoul : h was, I say, desired by him, 
'that captain Boanerges and captain Conviction 
should take up their quarters with him, even they 
and all their men. 

5. As for captain Judgment and captain Exe- 
cution, my lord Will-be-will took them and 
their men to him, because he was to rule under the 
Prince for the good of the town of Mansoul now, 
as he had done before under the tyrant Diabolus 
for the hurt and damage thereof.* 

6. And throughout the rest of the town were 

* I speak after the manner of men, because of the infirmity of 
your ilesh : for us ye have yielded your members servants to un. 
Cleanness, and to iniquity unto iniquity; even so now yield your 
members servants to righteousness unto holiness. Rom. vi. 10* 



HOLY WAR. 171 



The love of Curist shed abroad in the heart. 

; T ' " ■ == ** 

quartered the rest of Emanuel's forces ; but cap- 
tain Credence, with his men, abode still in the 
castle. So the Prince, his captains and his soldiers, 
were lodged in the town of Mansoul. 

Now theantients and elders of the town of Man- 
soul thought that they never should have enough of 
the Prince Emanuel ; his person, his actions, his 
words and behaviour, were so pleasing, so taking, 
so desirable to them. Wherefore they prayed him, 
that though the castle of Mansoul was his place of 
residence ( and they desired that he might dwell 
there for ever,) yet that he would often visit tha 
streets, houses, and people of Mansoul ; for 5 said 
they, dread sovereign, thy presence, thy looks, thy 
smiles, thy words, are the life, strength, and sinews 
of the town of Mansoul. 

Besides this, they craved that they might have, 
without difficulty or interruption, continual access 
unto him ; so for that very purpose he commanded 
that the gates should stand open, that they might 
there see the manner of his doings, the fortifications 
of the place, and the royal mansion-house of the 
Prince. 

When he spake, they all stopped their mouths, 
and gave audience ; and when he walked it was 
their delight to imitate him in his goings. 

Now upon a time Emanuel made a feast for 
the town of Mansoul ; and upon the fe» sting -day, 
the townsfolk were come to the castle lo partake of 
the banquet. And he feasted them with all manner 



172 HOLF WAR. 



The enjoyment of Christ's presence. 

of outlandish food ; food that grew not in the fields 
of Mansgul, nor in all the whole kingdom of 
Universe, It was food that came from his Fa- 
ther's court, and so there was dish after dish set be- 
fore them, and they were commanded freely to eat. 
But still, when a fresh dish was set before them, 
they would whisperingly say to each other f What 
is if ?' for they wist not what to call it.* They 
drank also of the water that was made wine ; and 
were very merry with him. There was music also 
all the while at the table, and men did eat angel's 
food, and had honey given them out of the rock ; 
so Mansoul did eat the food that was peculiar to 
the court, yea, they had now thereof to the full.f 

I must not forget to tell you, that as at this table 
there were musicians, so they were not those of the 
country, nor yet of the town of Mansoul; but they 
were £he masters of the songs that were sung at 
the court of Shaddai. 

Now after the feast was over, Emanuel was for 
entertaining the town with some curious riddles of 
secrets drawn up by his Father's secretary, by the 
wisdom and skill of Shaddai ; the like to these 
there are not in any kingdom. 

* And when the children of Israel saw it, they said one to ano=» 
iher, It is manna ; for they wist not what it was. And Moses said 
unto them, This is the bread which the Lord hath given you to 
eat. Exod. xvi. 15. 

t And he rained down manna upon them to eat, and had given 
thmi of the corn of heaven. Man did eat angel's food, he seat 
them corn to the full. Psal. Ixxviii. 24, 25. 



HOLY WAR. 173 



Prophecies explained. 



The riddles were made upon king Shaddai him- 
self, and upon Emanuel his Son,, and upon his 
wars and doings with Mansoul. 

Emanuel also expounded unto them some of 
these riddles himself ; but oh how they were light- 
ened ! They saw what they never saw before ; they 
could not have thought that such rarities could 
have been couched in so few and such ordinary 
words. I told you before, whom these riddles did 
concern ; and as they were opened the people evi- 
dently saw it was so. Yea, they gathered that the 
things themselves were a kind of portraiture, and 
that of Emanuel himself ; for when they read in 
the scheme where the riddles were writ, and looked 
in the face of the Prince, things looked so like one 
to the other, that Mansoul could not forbear, but 
say, This is the Lamb, this is the Sacrifice, this is 
the Rock, this is the Red Cow, this is the Door, 
and this is the Way ; and with a great many other 
things more. 

And thus he dismissed the town of Mansoul. 
But can you imagine how the people of this cor- 
poration were taken with his entertainment ? Oh 
they were transported with joy, they were drowned 
with wonder, while they saw and understood and 
considered what their Emanuel entertained them 
withal, and what mysteries he opened to them ; and 
when they were at home in their houses, and in 
their most retired places, they could not but sing of 
Jiim and of his actions. Yea. so taken were the 



174 ffOLY WAR, 



The soul new modelled. 



townsmen now with the Prince, that they would 
sing of him in their sleep. 

Now it was in the heart of the prince Emanu- 
el to new-model the town of Mansoul, and io put 
it into such a condition as might be most pleasing 
to him, and that might best stand with the profit 
and security of the now flourishing town of Man- 
soul. He provided also against insurrections at 
home, and invasions abroad : such love had he for 
the famous town of Mansoul. 

Wherefore he first of all commanded that the 
great slings that were brought from his Father's 
court when he came to the {own of Mansoul., 
should be mounted, some upon the battlements of 
the castle, some upon the towers; fur there were 
towers in the town of Mansoul, -towers new built 
by Emanuel since he came thither. There was 
also an instrument invented by Emanuel, that was 
to throw stones from the castle of Mansoul, out at 
Mouth-gate ; an instrument that could not be 
resisted, nor that could miss of execution ; where- 
fore for the wonderful exploits that it did when 
used, it went without a name ; and it was committed 
to the care of, and managed by, that brave captain, 
the captain Credence, in case of war. This done, 
Emanuel called the lord Will-be-will to him, 
and gave him in commandment to take care of the 
gates, the wall, and towers in Mansoul : also the 
Prince gave him the militia into his hand, and a 
special charge to withstand all insurrections and 



HOLY V>'AR. m 



Satan's image cast out. 



tumults that night be made in Mansoul against 
the peace of our Lord the King, and the peace and 
tranquillity of the town of Mansoul. He also 
gave him in commission, that if he found any of 
the Diabolonians lurking in an) 7 corner of the 
famous town of Mansoul, he should forthwith 
apprehend them and slay them, or commit them to 
safe custody, that they may be proceeded against 
according to law. 

Then he called unto him the lord Understand- 
ing, who was the old lord-mayor, he that was put 
out of place when Diabolus took the tow r n, and 
put him in his former office again, and it became 
his place for his life-time. He bid him also build 
it in fashion like a tower for a defence. . He bid 
him also read in the revelations of mysteries all 
the days of his life, that he might know how to 
perform his office aright. 

He also made Mr. Knowledge the recorder, 
not of contempt to old Mr. Conscience, who had 
been recorder before ; but for that it was in his 
princely mind to confer upon Mr. Conscience 
another employ ; of which he told the old gentle- 
man he should know more hereafter. 

Then he commanded that the image of Diabolus 
should be taken down from the place where it was 
set up ; and that they should utterly destroy it, 
heating, it into powder, and casting it into the wind, 
without the town-wall ; and that the image cfSiiAD- 
pai his father sliould be set up again, withhisown, 
upon the castie-gates ; and that it sliould be more 



176 HOLY WAR. 



No rest for lusts in a renewed mind. 



fairly drawn than ever, forasmuch as both his 
Father and himself were come to Mansoul in more 
grace and mercy than heretofore. He would also 
that his name should be done on the best of gold, 
for the honour of Mansoul.* 

After this was done, Emanuel gave out a com- 
mandment, which w r as, that those three greatest 
Diabolonians should be apprehended, namely, 
the two late lord-mayors, to wit, Mr. Increduli- 
ty and Mr. Lustings, and Mr. Forget-good the 
recorder. Besides these, there were some of them 
that Diabolus made burgesses and aldermen in 
Mansoul, that were committed to ward by the 
hand of the now valiant and right noble, the brave 

lord WlLL-BE-WILL. 

And these were their names : Alderman Atheism, 
alderman Hard-heart, and alderman False- 
peace. The burgesses were, Mr. No- truth, Mr 
Pitiless, Mr. Haughty, with the like. These 
were committed to close custody : and the gaoler's 
name was Mr. Trueman : this Trueman was one 
of those that Emanuel brought with him from his 
Father's court, when at first he made a war upon 
Diabolus in the town of Mansoul. 

After this, the Prince gave a charge that the 
three strong holds, which at the command of Dia- 
bolus the Diabolonians built in Mansoul, 
should be demolished and utterly pulled down ; o{ 



* And they shall see his face ; and his name shall be in their 
foreheads. Rev. xxii. 4. 



HOLY WAR. 177 



Preparations for trial. 



which holds, and their names, with their captains 
and governors, you read a little before. But this 
was long in doing, because of the largeness of the 
places, and because the stones, the timber, the iron, 
and all the rubbish, were to be carried without 
the town. 

When this was done, the Prince g^ve order that 
the lord-mayor and aldermen of Mansoul should 
call a con it of judicature, for the trial and execu- 
tion of the DiA&OLONiANsin the corporation, now 
under the care of Mr. Trueman the gaoler. 

Now when the time was come, and the court set, 
commandment was sent to Mr. Trueman the 
gaoler, to bring the prisoners down to the bar. Then 
were the prisoners brought down, pinioned and 
chained together, as the custom of the town of 
Mansoul was. So when they were presented be- 
fore the lord-mayor, the recorder, and the rest of 
the honourable bench, first the jury was impannel- 
ed, and then the witnesses sworn. The names of the 
jury were these : Mr Belief, Mr. True-heart, 
Mr. Upright, Mr. Hate-bad, Mr. Love- good, 
Mr. Seek-truth, Mr. Heavenly- mind, Mr. Mo- 
derate, Mr. Thankful, Mr. Good-work, Mr, 
Zeal-for-God, and Mr. Humble. The names of 
the witnesses were Mr. Know-all, Mr. Tell- 
true, Mr. Hate-lies, with my lord Will-be- 
will and his man, if need were. 

So the prisoners were set to the bar. Then said 
Mr. Do-right (for he was the town clerk), Set 
Atheism to the bar, gaoler. So he'was set to the 



178 HOLY WAR. 



Atheism tried. 



bar. Then said the clerk, Atheism hold up thy 
hand, Thou art here indicted by the name of 
Atheism (an intruder upon the town of Mansoul), 
for that thou hast perniciously and doubtishly 
taught and maintained, that there is no God, and so 
no heed to be taken to religion. This thou hast 
done against the being, honour, and glory of the 
King, and against the peace and safety of the town 
of Mansoul. What sayest thou ? art thou guilty 
of this indictment or not ? 

Atheism. Not guilty. 

Cryer. Call Mr. Know-all, Mr. Tell-true, 
and Mr. Hate-lies into the court. 

So they were called, and they appeared. 

Then said the clerk, You the witnesses for the 
"King, look upon the prisoner at the bar ; do you 
know him ? 

Then said Mr. Know-all, Yes, my lord, we 
know him ; his name is Atheism, he has been a 
very pestilent fellow for many years in the misera- 
ble town of Mansoul. 

Clerk. You are sure you know him ? 

Know-all. Know him ! Yes, my lord, I have 
heretofore too often been in his company, to be at 
this time ignorant of him. He is a Diabolonian, 
the sou of a Diabolonian ; I knew his grand- 
father and his father. 

Clk. Well said : he standeth here indicted by 
the name of Atheism, &c. and is charged that he 
hath maintained aud taught that there is no God, 
and so no heed to be taken' to any religion. What 



HOLY WAR. 179 



The witnesses examined. 



say you the King's witnesses to this ? Is he guilty, 
or not ? 

Kn. My lord, I and he were once in Villain's- 
lane together, and he at that time talked briskly 
of divers opinions ; and then and there I heard 
him say, that for his part he believed there was no 
God : but, said he, I can profess one, and be religi- 
ous too, if the company I am in, and the circum- 
stances of other things shall put me upon it. 

Clk. You are sure you have heard him say 
thus? 

Kn. Upon mine oath, I heard him say thus. 
Then said the clerk, Mr. Tell-true, what say 
you to the King's judges, touching the prisoner at 
the bar. 

Tell-true. My lord, I formerly was a great 
companion of his ( for the which I now repent me), 
and I have often heard him say, and that with very 
great stomach-fulness, that he believed there was 
neither God, angel, or spirit. 

Clk. Where did you hear him say so ? 
Tel. In Black-mouth-lane, and in Blas- 
phemer's- row, and in many other places besides. 
Clk. Have you much knowledge of him ? 
Tel. I know him to be a Diaboloian, the son 
•>f a Diabolonian, and an horrible man to deny a 
^eity ; his father's name was Never-b*>g°>od, and 
^ had more children than this Atheism. I have 
n more to say. 

^lk. Mr. Hatc-lies, look upon the priso»er 
fct'ie bar : do you know him ? 



\ 



ISO HOLY WAR- 



Lustings indicted. 



Hate-lies. My lord, this Atheism is one of the 
vilest wretches that ever 1 came near, or had to do 
with in my life ; I have heard him say there is no 
God : I have heard him say there is no world to 
come, no sin, nor punishment hereafter : and morev 
ovei •, I have heard him say that it was as good to 
go to a whore-house, as to hear a sermon. 

Clk Where did you hear him say these things ? 

Hate. In Drunkard's-row, just at Rascai/s- 
iane end, at the house in which Mr. Imfiett 
lived. 

Clk. Set him by, gaoler, andset Mr. Lustings 
to the bar. 

Mr. Lustings, thou art here indicted by the 
name of Listings (an intruder upon the town of 
Mansoul), for that thou hast devilishly and trai- 
torously taught, by practice and filthy words, that 
it is lawful and profitable to man to give way to his 
carnal desires ; and that thou, for thy part, hast not, 
nor ever wilt, deny thyself of any sinful delight as 
long as thy name is Lustings. ' How sayest thou ? 
are thou guilty of this indictment, or not ? 

Then said Mr. Lustings, My lord, I am a maq 
of high birth, and have been used to pleasures anr 
pastimes and greatness. I have not been used f> 
be snub'd for my doings, but have been left to ft- 
low my will as if it were law. And it seel 
strange to me that I should this day be called Mo 
question for what not only I, but almost all ?en, 
do either secretly or openly countenance., Ipyej&nd 
approve of. 



HOLY WAR. 181 



The evidence. 



Clk.. Sir, we concern not ourselves with your 
greatness (though the higher the better you should 
have been), but we are concerned, and so are you, 
about an indictment preferred against you. How 
say you ? are you guilty of it, or not ? 

Lustinos. Not guilty. 

Clk Cryer, call upon the witnesses to stand 
forth and give their evidence. 

Cr. Gentlemen, you the witnesses for the King, 
come and give in your evidence for our Lord the 
King, against the prisoner at the bar. 

Clk. Come Mr. Know-all, look upon the 
prisoner at the bar. Do you know him ? 

Kn. Yes, my lord, I know him. 

Clk. What is his name ? 

Kn. His name is Lustings : he is the son of one 
Beastly ; his mother bare him in Flesh-street : 
she was one Evil-concupisences' daughter. I 
knew all the generation of them. 

Clk. Well said You have heard his indict- 
ment : What say you to it ? is he guilty of the 
things charged against him, or not ? 

Kn. My lord, he has, as he saith, been a great 
man indeed; and a greater in wickedness than by 
pedigree, more than a thousand-fold. 

Clk. But what do you know of his particular 
actions and especially with reference to his in- 
dictment. 

Kn. I know him to be a swearer, a liar, a sab- 
bath breaker ; I know him to be a fornicator and an 
unclean person ; I know him to be guilty of abun- 



J 82 HOLY WAR. 



Incredulity indicted. 



dance of evils. He has been to my knowledge a 
very filthy man. 

Clr. But where did he use to commit his wick- 
ednesses ? in some private corners, or more openly 
and shamelessly ? 

Kn. All the town over, my lord. 

Clr. Come, Mr. Tell-true, what have you 
to say for our Lord the King, against the prisoner 
at the bar ? 

Tel. My lord, all that the first witness ha« 
said, I know to be true, and a great deal more be- 
sides. 

Clr. Mr. Lustings, do you hear what these 
gentlemen say ? 

Lus. I was ever of opinion, that the happiest life 
that a man could live upon earth, was to keep him- 
self from nothing that he desired in the world ; nor 
have I been false at any time to this opinion of mine, 
but have lived in the love of my notions all my 
days : nor was I ever so churlish, having found 
such sweetness in them myself, as to keep the com- 
mendation of them from others. 

Then said the court, There hath proceeded 
enough from his own mouth to lay him open to con- 
demnation ; wherefore set him by, gaoler, and set 
Mr. Incredulity to the bar. 

Clk Mr. Incredulity, thou art here indicted 
by the name of Incredulity (an intruder upon 
the town of Mansoul) for that thou hast feloniously 
and wickedly, and that when thou wert an officer in 
the town ef Mansoul, made head against the cap- 



HOLY WAR. IS3 



His conviction. 



tains of Shaddai, when they came and demanded 
possession of Mansoul ; yea thou didst bid de- 
fiance to the name, forces, and cause of the King, 
and didst also, as did Diabolus thy captain, stir up 
and encourage the town of Mansoul to make 
bead against and resist the said force of the King. 
What sayest thou to this indictment ? art thou 
guilty, or not ? 

Then said Incredulity, I know not Shaddai ; 
I loved my old prince ; I thought it my duty to be 
true to my trust, and to do what I could to possess 
the minds of the men of Mansoul to do their ut- 
most to resist strangers and foreigners, and with 
might to fight against them. Nor have I, nor shall 
I, change my opinion for fear of trouble, though 
you at present are possessed of place and power. 

Then said the court, The man, as you see, is in- 
corrigible ; he is for maintaining his >illanies by- 
stoutness of words, and his rebellion with impudent 
confidence. And therefore set him by, gaoler ; and 
set Mr. Forget-good to the bar. 

Clk. Mr. Forget-good, thou art here indicted 
bv the name of Forget-good (an intruder upon the 
town of Mansoul), for that thou, when the whole 
affairs of the town of Mansoul were in thy hand, 
didst utterly forget to serve them in what was good, 
and didst fall in with the tyrant Diabolus against 
Shaddai the king, against his captains and against 
all his host, to the dishonour of Shaddai, the breach 
of his law, and the endangering of the destruction 
of the famous towu of Mansoul, What sayest 



284 /HOLY WAR. 



Forget-good indicted. 



thou to this indictment? art thou guilty or not 
guilty ? 

Then said Forget-good, Gentlemen, and at this 
time my judges, as to the indictment by which I 
stand accused of several crimes before you, p ray at- 
tribute my forgetfulncss to my age, and not to mj 
"wilfulness ; to the craziness of my brain, and not 
the carelessness of my mind ; and then I hope I 
m*y by your charity he excused from great punish- 
ment, though I be guilty. 

Then said the court, Forget-good, Forget- 
good, thy forgetfulness of good was not simply of 
frailty, but of purpose, and for that thou didst 
loathe to keep virtuous things in thy mind. What 
was bad, thou couldst retain ; but what was good 
thou couldst not abide to think of : thy age, there- 
fore, and tby pretended craziness, thou makest use of 
to blind the court withal^ and as a cloak to cover thy 
knavery. But let us hear what the witnesses have 
to say for the King, against the prisoner at the bar. 
Is he guilty of this indictment, or not ? 

Hate. My lord, I have heard this Forget- 
good say, that he could never abide to think of 
goodness, no not for a quarter of an hour. 

Clk.. Where didst thou hear him say so ? 

Hate. In All-base-lane, at a house next 
door to the sign of the Conscience-seared-with- 
a-hot-iron. 

Clk. Mr. Know-all, what can you say for 
our Lord the King, against the prisoner at the 
bar? 



HOLY WAR. 183 



Mr. Hard-heart indicted. 



K.n. My lord," I know the man well ; he is a 
Diaboloman, the son of a Diabolonian, his 
father's name was Love-naught ; and fur him, I 
have of(en heard him say, that he counted the 
very thoughts of goodness the most burthensome 
thing in the world. 

Clk. Where have you heard him say these 
words. 

Kn. In Flesh-lane, right opposite to the 
church. 

Then said the clerk, Come, Mr. Tell-true, 
give in your evidence concerning the prisoner at 
the bar, about that for which he stands here, as 
you see, indicted before this honourable court, 

Tel. My lord, I have heard him often say, he 
had rather think of the vilest thing, than of what 
is contained in the holy scriptures. 

Clk. Where did you hear him say such grievoui 
words ? 

Tel. Where? In a great many places ,* particu* 
larly in Nauseous-street, in the house of one 
Shameless ; and in Filth-lane, at the sign of 
the Reprobate, next door to the Descent-into* 
tre-pit. 

Court. Gentlemen, you have heard the indict- 
ment, his plea, and the testimony of the witnesses. 

Gaoler, set Mr. Hard-heart to the bar. 

lie is set to the bar. 

Clu. Mr. Hard-heart, thou art here indicted 
by the name of Hard-heart ( an intruder upon the 
town of Mansoul) for that thou didst most despe- 
% A 



186 HOLY WAR. 



False-peace tried. 



lately and wickedly possess the town of Mansoul 
with impenitency and obdurateness ; and didst keep 
them from remorse and sorrow for their evils all 
the time of their apostacy from, and rebellion 
against *he blessed king Siiaddai. What sayest thou 
to this indictment ? art thou guilty or not guilty ? 

Hard. My lord, I never knew what remorse or 
sorrow meant, in all my life : I am impenetrable, I 
care for no man ; nor can I be pierced with man's 
grief, their groans will not enter into my heart ; 
whomsoever I mischief, whomsoever I wrong, to 
me it is music, when to others mourning. 

Court. You see the man is a right Diabolo- 
njan, and has convicted himself. Set him by, 
gaoler, and set Mr. False- peace to the bar. 

Mr. Fa-lse^pe ace, thou art here indicted by the 
name of False-peace (an intruder upon the town 
of Mansoul, ), for that thou didst most wickedly 
and satanically bring, hold, and keep the town of 
Mansoul, both in her apostacy, and in her hellish 
rebellion, in a false, groundless, and dangerous 
peace, and damnable security, to the dishonour of 
the King, the transgression of his law, and the great 
damage of the town of Mansoul. What sayest 
thou? art thou guilty of this indictment, or not ? 

Then said Mr. False-peace, Gentlemen, and 
you appointed to be my judges, I acknowledge that 
my name is Mr. Peace ; but that my name is 
False-peace, I utterly deny. If your honours 
should please to send for any that intimately know 
me, or for the midwife that laid my mother of 



HOLY WAR 187 



His confession. 



me, or for the gossips that were at my christening, 
they will any or all of them prove, thatmy name is 
not False-peace but Peace. Wherefore lean- 
not plead to this indictment, forasmuch as my name 
is not inserted therein ; and as is my true name, so 
also are my conditions. I was always a man that 
loved to live at quiet ; and what I loved myself, 
that I thought others might love also. Wherefore 
when I saw that any of my neighbours laboured 
under a disquiet mind, I endeavoured to help them 
what I could ; and I could give many instances of 
this good temper of mine : As, 

1. When at the beginning our town of Mansoul 
declined the ways of Shaddai, some of (hem after- 
wards began to have disquieting reflections on 
themselves for what they had done : but I, as one 
troubled to see them disquieted, presently sought 
out means to get them quiet again. 

2. When the ways of theold world, and of So- 
dom, were in fashion ; if any thing happened to 
molest those that were for the customs of the 
present times, I laboured to make them quiet 
again, and to cause them to act without molesta- 
tion. 

3. To come nearer home : When the wars broke 
out between Shaddai and Diabolus, if at any 
time I saw any of the town of Mansoul afraid of 
destruction, I often used, by some way, device, 
invention or other, to labour to bring them to 
peace again. Wherefore, since I have been al- 
ways the man of so virtuous a temper, as some saj 



188 HOLY WAR. 



The evidence conies forward. 



a peace-maker is, and if a peace-maker be so de 
serving a man as some have been bold to attest he 
is : then let me, gentlemen, be accounted by you, 
who have made a great name for justice and equity 
in Mansoul, for a man that deserveth not this in- 
human way of treatment, but liberty, and also a 
licence to seek damage of those that have been my 
Accusers. 

Then said the clerk, Cryer, make proclamation. 

Crier. ' O yes ! Forasmuch as the prisoner at 
* at the bar hath denied his name to be that which 
f is mentioned in the indictment; the court requireth, 
' that if there be any in this place, who can give in- 
' formation to the court, of the original and right 
' name of the prisoner, they would come forth and 
' gi\t in their evidence : for the prisoner stands 
' upon his own innocence. 

Then came two into the court, and desired that 
they might have leave to speak what they knew 
concerning the prisoner at the bar ! the name of the 
one was Search-truth, and the name of the other 
Voucii-TRtTH : so the court demanded of these 
men, if they knew the prisoner, and what they 
could say concerning him ? for he stands, said they, 
upon his own vindication. 

Then said Mr. Search-truth, My lord— 

Clk. Hold ; give him his oath. Then they 
swore him : so he proceeded. 

Search-truth. My lord, I know, and have 
known this man from achild, and can attest thathis 
name is False-peace. I knew his father ; his 



HOLY WAR. 183 



The witness cf Sea rcii-truth. 



name was Mr Flatterer ; and his mother, be- 
fore she was married, was called by the name of 
Mrs. Sootii-up : and these two, when they came 
together, lived not long without this son : and when 
he was born, they called his name False-peace. 
I was his playfellow, only I was somewhat older 
thau he ; and when his mother used to call him 
Lome from his play, she would say to him, False- 
peace, False-peace, come home quick, or I will 
fetch you. Yea, I knew him when he sucked; 
and though I was then but little, yet I can remem- 
ber, that when his mother used to sit at the door 
with him, or played with him in her arms she, 
would call him twenty times together ' my little 
* False-peace, my pretty False-peace,' and, 'O 
c my sweet rogue False-peace,' and again, c O my 
'little bird, False-peace,' and ' How do I love my 
'child !' The gossips also know it is thus, 
though he has had the face to deny it in open 
court. 

Then Mr. Vouch-truth was called upon to 
speak what he knew of him. So they sware him. 

Then said Mr. Vouch-truth, My lord, all that 
the former witness hath said, is true : his name 
is False-peace, the son of Mr. Flatterer and 
Mrs. Sooth-up his mother. And I have in former 
times seen him angry with those that called hira 
any thing else but False-peace, for he would say 
that all such mocked and nicknamed him ; but this 
was at the time when Mr False-peace was a 



190 HOLY WAR. 



The Court's atidres 



great man, and when the Diabolonians were the 
brave raeu in Mansoul. 

Court. Gentlemen, you have heard what these 
two men have sworn against the prisoner at the bar. 
And now, Mr. False-peace, to yon : you have 
denied your name to be False-peace ; yet you see 
that these honest men have sworn that this is your 
name. As to your plea, in that you are quite be- 
sides the matter of your indictment, you are not by 
it charged for evil doing, because you are a man of 
peace, or a peace-maker among your neighbours; 
but that you did wickedly and satanically bring, 
keep, and hold the town ofMANsouL, both under 
its apostacy from, and in its rebellion against its 
King, in a false, lying, and damnable peace, con- 
trary to the law of Shaodai, and to the hazard of 
the destruction of the then miserable town of Man- 
soul. All that you have pleaded for yourself, is, 
that you have denied your name, &c. but here you 
see, we have witness to prove that you are the 
man. 

For the peace that you boast so much of making 
among your neighbours, know, That the peace that 
is not a companion of truth and holiness, but is 
■without this foundation, is grounded upon a lie, and 
is both deceitful and damnable, as also the great 
Shaddai hath said : thy plea therefore hath not 
delivered thee from what by thy indictment thou 
art charged with, but rather it doth fasten all upon 
thee. 



HOLY WAIL 191 



The evidence. 



But thou shalt have very fair play: let us call 
the witnesses that are to testify as to matters of 
fact, and see what they have to say for our Lord the 
King, against the prisoner at the bar ? 

Clk. Mr. Know-all, what say you for our 
Lord the king against the prisoner at the bar. 

Kn. My lord, this man hath for a longtime 
made it, to my knowledge, his business to keep the 
town of Man soul in a sinful quietness, in the midst 
of all her lewdness, filthiness, and turmoils ; and 
bath said, and that in my hearing, Come, come, let 
us fly from all trouble, on what ground soever it 
comes, and let us be for a quiet and peaceable life, 
though it wauteth a good foundation. 

Clk. Come Mr. Hate-lies, what have you to 
say ? 

Hate. My lord, I have heard him say, that 
peace, though in a way of unrighteousness, is better 
than trouble with truth. 

Clk. Where did you hear him say this ? 

Hate. I heard him say it in Folly-yard, at 
the house of one Mr. Simple, next door to the sign 
of the Self-deceiver. Yea, he hath said this to 
my knowledge, twenty times in that place. 

Court. We may spare further witness ; this 
evidence is plain and full. Set him by, gaoler, and 
set Mr. No-truth to the bar. Mr. No- 
truth, thou art here indicted by the name of 
No-truth (an intruder upon the town of Man- 
soul), for that thou hast always to the dishonour 
of Shaddai, and to the endangering of the utter 



m HOLY WAR. 



No-truth indicted. 



ruin of the famous town of Mansoul, set thyself 
to deface, and utterly to spoil all the remainders of 
the law and image of Shaddai, that have been 
found in Mansoul, after her deep apostacy from 
her King, to Diabolus, that envious tyrant. What 
sayestthou ? Art thou guilty of this indictment, 
or not > 

No-truth. Not guilty, my lord. 

Then the witnesses were called ; and Mr. Know- 
all first gave in Ins evidence against him. 

Kn. My lord, this man was at the pulling down 
of the image of Shaddai ; yea^ this is he that did 
it with his own hands. I myself stood by and saw 
him do it, and he did it at the commandment of 
Diabolus. Yea, this Mr. No-truth did more 
than this, he did also set up the horned images of 
the beast Diabolus, in the same place. This is 
also he that, at the bidding of Diabolus, rent and 
tore, and caused to be consumed, all that he could 
of the remainders of the law of the King, even 
whatever he could lay his hands on in Mansoul. 

Clk. Who saw him do this besides yourself? 

Hate. I did, my lord, and so did many others 
beside : for this was not done by stealth, or in a 
corner, but in the open view of all ; yea, he chose 
himself to do it publicly, for he delighted in doing 
it. 

Clk. Mr. No-truth, how could you have the 
face to plead not guilty, when you were so mani- 
festly the doer of all this wickedness ? 

No. Sir, I thought I must say something ; and as 



HOLY WAR* 103 



Pitiless ioilicted. 



my name is, so I speak : I have been advantaged 
thereby before now, and did not know but, by speak- 
ing no-truth, I might have reaped the same benefit 
now. 

Clk. Set him by, gaoler, and set Mr. Pitiles3 
to the bar. Mr. Pitiless, thou art here indict- 
ed by the name of Pitiless (an intruder upon the 
town of Mansoul) for that thou didst most treach- 
erously and wickedly shut up all bowels of compas- 
sion, and wouldst not suffer poor Mansoul to 
condole her own misery, when she had apostatized 
from her rightful king ; but didst evade, and at all 
times turn her mind away from those thoughts that 
had in them a tendency to lead her to repentance. 
What sayestthou to this indictment ? Guilty, or not 
guilty ? 

Pitiless. Not guilty of pitilessness ; all I did 
was to cheer up, according to my name ; for my 
name is not Pitiless, but Cheak-up ; and I 
could not abide to see Mansoul inclined to me- 
lancholy. 

Clk. How ! do you deny your name, and say it 
is not Pitiless, but Chear-u? ? Call for witness: 
what say you the witness to this plea ? 

Kn. My lord, his name is Pitiless ; so he bath 
wrote himself in all papers of concern wherein he 
has had to do. But these Diabolonians love to 
counterfeit their names : Mr. Covetousnlss co- 
vers himself with the name of Good-huseandrv, 
orthelike: Mr. Pkide, can, when need is, call 
b b 



194 HOLY WAR. 



Haughty set to the bar. 



himself Mr. Neat, Mr. Handsome, or the like, and 
so all the rest of them. 

Clk. Mr. Tell-true, what say you ? 

Tel. His name is Pitiless, my lord : I hare 
known him from a child ; and he hath done all that 
wickedness wherewith he stands charged in the in- 
dictment ; but there is a company of them that are 
Hot acquainted with the danger of damning, there- 
fore they call all those melancholy, who have se- 
rious thoughts how that state should be shunned 
by them. 

Clk. Set Mr. Haughty to the bar, gaoler. 

Mr. Haughty, thou art here indicted by the name 
of Haughty (an intruder upon the town of Man- 
soul,) for that thou didst most traiterously and 
devilishly teach the town of Mansoul to carry it 
loftily and stoutly against the summons that were 
given them by the captains of the King Shaddai. 
Thou didst also teach the town of Mansoul to speak 
contemptuously and vilifying of their great King 
Shaddai : and didst moreover encourage, both by 
words and example, Mansoul to take up arms both 
against the King, and his son Emanuel. How say- 
est thou ? art thou guilty of this indictment or not ? 

Hauchty. Gentlemen, I have always been a 
man of courage and valour, and have not used, when 
under the greatest clouds, to sneak and hang down 
the head like a bulrush ; nor did it at all at any time 
please me to see men veil their bonnets to those that 
have opposed, them. Yea, though their adversa- 



HOLY WAR. 195 



Address to the jury. 



ries seemed to have ten times the advantage of them. 
I did not use to consider who was my foe, nor 
what the cause was in which I was engaged ; it was 
enough for me, if I carried it bravely, fought like 
a man, and came off a victor. 

Court. Mr. Haughty, you are not here in- 
dicted for that you have been a valiant man, nor 
for your stoutness and courage in times of distress ; 
but for that you have made use of this your pre- 
tended valour to draw the town of Mansoul into 
acts of rebellion both against the great King and 
Emanuel his Son. This is the crime, and the 
thing wherewith thou art charged in and by the in- 
dictment. But he made no answer to that. 

Now when the court had thus far proceeded 
against the prisoners at the bar, then they put 
them over to the verdict of their jury, to whom 
they addressed themselves after this manner : 

Court. Gentlemen of the jury, you who have 
been here, and have seen these men : you who have 
heard their indictments, their pleas, and what the 
witnesses have testified against them : now what re- 
mains is, that you forthwith withdraw yourselves 
to someplace, where without confusion you may 
consider of what verdict in a way of truth and 
righteousness, you ought to bring in for the King 
against them, and bring it in accordingly. 

Then the jury, to wit, Mr. Belief, Mr. True- 
heart, Mr. Upright, Mr. Hate-bad, Mr. Love- 
good, Mr. See-truth, Mr. Heavenly -mind, 
Mr. Moderate, Mr. Thankful Mr. Humble, 



196 HOLY WAR, 



The jury consult together. 



Mr. Good-work, and Mr. Zeal-for-god with- 
withdrew themselves, in order to their work. Now 
when they were shut up by themselves, they fell to 
discourse among themselves, in order to the drawing 
up of their verdict. 

And thus Mr. Belief (for he was the foreman) 
began : c Gentlemen, (quoth he) for the men, the 
' prisoners at the bar ; for my part I believe that 
'they all deserve death/ e Very right,' said Mr. 
True-heart, ' I am wholly of your opinion.' 
' And so am 1/ said Mr. Upright. e O what a 
' mercy it is/ said Mr. Hate-bad, that such vil- 

* lains as these are apprehended !' ' Ay, ay/ said 
Mr. Love-good, f this is one of the joyfullest days 
' that ever I saw in my life/ Then said Mr. See- 
truth, ' I know that if we judge them to death, 
'our verdict .-shall stand before Shaddai himself.* 

* Nor do I at all question it/ said Mr. Heavenly- 
mind ; be said, moreover, 1 when all such beasts 
' as these are cast out of Mansoul, what a goodly 
'town wiil it be then !' Then said Mr. Mode- 
rate, ' It is not in my manner to pass my judg- 

* racnt with rashness : but for these, their crimes 
' are so notorious, and the witness so palpable, that 
'that man must be wilfully blind who says the 
' prisoners ought not to die/ 'Blessed be God,* 
said Mr. Thankful, ' the traitors are safe in cus- 
'tody.' 'And I join with you in this upon my 
'bare knees/ said Mr. Humble. ' I am also 
' glad/ said Mr. Good-work. Then said the 
warm man, and true-hearted Mr. Zeal-for-God 



HOLY WAIL 197 



Sentence of death. 



'Cut them off; they have been the plague, and 
' sought the destruction of Mansoul.' 

Thus therefore being all agreed in their verdict, 
they came instantly into the court. 

Clk. Gentlemen of the jury, answer all to your 
names. Mr. Belief, one : Mr. True-heart, 
two : Mr. Upright, three : Mr. Hate-bad, four : 
Mr. Love-good, five : Mr. See-truth, six : Mr. 
Heavenly-mind, seven : Mr. Moderate, eight : 
Mr. Thankful, nine : Mr. Humble ten : Mr. 
Good-work, eleven : and Mr. Zeal-for-God, 
twelve : Good men and true, stand together in 
your verdict ; are you all agreed ? 

Juuy. Yes, my Ijrd. 

Clk. Who shall speak for you ? 

Ju. Our foreman. 

Clk. You, the gentlemen of the jury being im- 
pannelled for our Lord the King, to serve here in a 
matter of life and death, have heard the trials of 
each of these men, the prisoners at the bar : what 
say you ? are they guilty of that, and those crimes, 
for which they stand here indicted, or are they not 
guilty ? 

Foreman. Guilty, my lord. 

Clk. Look to your prisoners, gaoler. 

This was done in the morning, and in the after- 
noon they received sentence of death according to 
law. 

The gaoler, therefore, having received 'such a 
charge, put them all in the inward prison, to pre- 



198 HOLY WAR. 



Incredulity escapes. 



serve them there till the day of execution, which 
was to be the next morning. 

But now to see how it happened, one of the pri- 
soners, Incredulity by name, in the interim be- 
twixt the sentence and time of execution broke pri- 
son and made his escape, and got him quite out ot 
the town of Mansoul, and lay lurking in such 
places and holes as he might, until he should again 
have opportunity to do the town of Mansoul a 
mischief for their thus handling of him as they did. 

Now when Mr. Trueman the gaoler perceived 
that he had lost his prisoner, he was in a heavy 
taking, because he (that prisoner we speak of) was 
the very worst of all the gang ; wherefore, first he 
goes and acquaints my lord-mayor, Mr. Recorder, 
and my lord Will-ce-will, with the matter, and 
to get of them an order to make search for him 
throughoutthe town of Mansoul. So an order he 
got, and search was made, but no such man could 
now be found in all the to we of Mansoul. 

All that could foe gathered, was, that he had lur- 
ked awhile about the outside of the town, and that 
here and there one or other had a glimpse of him as 
he made his escape out of Mansoul ; one or two 
also affirmed that they saw him without the town, 
going apace quite over the plain. Now when he 
was quite gone, it was affirmed by one Mr. Did- 
see, that he ranged all over dry places, till he met 
with Diabolus his friend; and where should they 
meet one another but upon Hell-gate-hill. 



HOLY WAK, 



NCRr.nuuTY describes the state of Mansoul. 



But Oh ! what a lamentable story did the old 
gentleman tell to Diabolus concerning what sad 
alteration Emanuel had made in Mansoul. 

As, first, how Mansoul had, after some delays, 
received a general pardon at the hands of Emanu- 
el; and that they had invited him into the town, 
and had given him the castle for his possession. 
He said moreover, that they had called his soldiers 
into the town, coveted who should quarter the most 
of them ; they also entertained him with the timbrel, 
song, and dance. But that, said Incredulity, 
that is the sorest vexation to me, that he hath pulled 
down, O father, thy image, and set up his own ; 
pulled down thy officers, and set up his own. Yea. 
and Will-be-will, that rebel, who, one would 
have thought, should never have turned from us, is 
now in as great favour with Emanuel as ever he 
was with thee. But, besides all this, this Will-be- 
will has received a special commission from his 
Master, to search for, to apprehend, and to put to 
death, all and all manner of Diabolonians that he 
shall find in Mansoul : yea, and this Will-be- 
wiLLhas committed to prison already eight of my 
lord's most trusty friends in Mansoul ; nay further 
my lord, (with grief I speak it, ) they have been all 
arraigned, condemned, aud I doubt before this, ex- 
ecuted in Mansoul. I told my lord of eight ; and 
myself was the ninth, who should assuredly have 
drunk of the same cup, but that through craft I 
have made mine escape from them. 

AY hen Diabolus had heard this lamentable story, 



200 HOLY WAR. 



The soul must crucify its own lusts. 

he yelled, and snuffed up the wind like a dragon, 
and made the sky look dark with his roaring : he 
also swore that he would try to be revenged ot 
Mansoul for this. So they concluded to enter in- 
to great consultation, how they might get the town 
of Mansoul again. 

Now before this time the day was come, in the 
which the prisoners in Mansoul were to be ex- 
cuted.* So they were brought to the Cross, and 
that by Mansoul, in most solemn manner : for the 
Prince said, that this should be done by the hand of 
the town of Mansoul : that I may see, said he, 
the forwardness of my new redeemed Mansoul to 
keep my word, and to do my commandments ; and 
that I may bless Mansoul in doing this deed.f 
Proof of sincerity pleases me well, let Mansoul 
therefore first lay their hands upon these Diabolo- 
nians to destroy them. 

So the town of Mansoul slew them, according 
to the word of their Prince : but when the prison- 
ers were brought to the Cross to die, you can hard- 
ly believe what troublesome work Mansoul had of 



* For if ye live after the flesh ye shall die. Rom. viii. 13.... 
Let not sin, therefore, reign in your mortal body, that ye .should 
obey it in the lusts thereof : neither yield ye your membprs as in- 
struments of unrighteousness unto sin : but yield yourselves unto 
God, as those that are alive from the dead, and your members as 
instruments of righteousness unto God. For sin shall not hare 
dominion over you : for ye are not under the law but under 
grace. Rom. vi. 12, 13, 14. 

tAud they tnat are Christ's have crucified the flesh, with tk' 
affections and lusts. Gal. v. 24. 



HOLY WAR. 201 



e executions of the lusts of the soul. 



it lo put the Diabolonians to death ; for the men 
knowing that the v must die, and all of them haying 
implacable enmity in their heart to Mansou l, what 
did they do but take courage at the Cross, and there 
resist the men of the town of Mansou l ? Where- 
fore the men of Man soul were forced to cry out for 
help to the captains and men of war. Now the great 
Shaddai had a secretary in the town, and he was a 
great lover of the men of Mansou l, and he was at 
the place of execution also : so he hearing the men 
of Mansoul cry out against the smugglings and un- 
ruliuess of the prisoners, rose up from his place, and 
came and put his hand upon the hands of the men 
of Mansoul. So they crucified the Diabolo- 
nians that had heen a plague^ a grief, and an of- 
fence to the town of Mansoul. 

Now when this good work was done, the PriccC 
came down to see, to visit, to speak comfortably to 
the men of Mansoul, and to strengthen their 
hands in such work. And he said to them, that by 
this work of theirs he had proved them, and found 
them to be lovers of his person, observers of his 
laws, and such as had also respect to his honour. 
He said moreover (to shew them that they by this 
should not be losers,, nor the town of Mansou l 
weakened by the loss of them, ) that he would make 
them: another captain, and that of one of themselves ; 
and that this captain should be the ruler of a thou- 
sand, for the good and benefit of the now flourishing 
town of Man sou l. 

So he called one to him whose naros was Wait- 
c c 



202 HOLY WAR. 



Experience exalted. 



ing, and said to him, Go quickly up to the castle- 
gate, and inquire there for one Mr. Experience, 
that waiteth upon that noble captain, the captain 
Credence, and bid him come hither to me. So 
the messenger that waited upon the good Prince 
Emanuel went, and said as he was commanded. 
Now the young gentleman was waiting to see thg 
captain train and muster his men in the castle-yard. 
Then said Mr. Waiting to him, Sir, the Prince 
would that you should come down to his highness 
forthwith. So he brought him down to Emanuel, 
and he came and made obeisance before him. Now 
the men of the town knew Mr. Experience well, 
for he was born and bred in Mansoul ; they also 
knew him to be a man of conduct, of valour, and a 
person prudent in matters ; he was also a comely 
person, well spoken, and very successful in his un- 
dertakings, 

Wherefore the hearts of the townsmen were 
transported with joy, when they saw that the Prince 
himself Was so taken with Mr. Experience, that 
he would needs make him a captain. 

So with one consent they bowed the knee before 
Emanuel, and with a shout said, Let Emanuel 
live forever ! Then said the Prince to the young 
gentleman, whose name was Mr. Experience, I 
have thought good to confer upon thee a place of ti ust 
aud honour, in this my town of Mansoul (then the 
young man bowed his head and worshipped : ) it is, 
said Emanuel, that thou shouldesfc be a captain, a 
captain over a thousand men in my beloved town of 



HOLY "WAR. 20* 



Hi* commissi* 



Mansoul. Then said the captain. Let the King 
live ! So the Prince gave out orders forthwith to 
the King's secretary, that lie should draw up for 
Mr. Experience a commission to make him a 
captain over a thousand men ; and let it be brought 
to me, said he, that I may set to my seal. So it was 
done as commanded. The commission was drawn 
up, brought to Emanuel, and he set his seal there- 
to. Then by the hand of Mr. Waiting, he sent it 
away to the captain. 

Now so soon as the captain had received his com- 
mission, he sounded his trumpet for volunteers, and 
young men came to him apace ; yea, the greatest 
and chief men in the town sent their sons to be listed 
under his command. Thus captain Experience 
came under command to Emanuel, for the good 
of the town of Mansoul. He had for his lieu - 
tenant one Mr. Skilful, and for his cornet one "Mr. 
Memory. His under officers I need not name, 
His colours were the white colours for the town of 
Mansoul ; and his scutcheon was the dead lion 
and the dead bear. So the Prince returned to his 
royal palace again. 

Now when he was returned thither, the elders of 
the town of Mansoul, to wit, my lord-mayor, the 
recorder, and the lord Will-be-will, Went to con- 
gratulate him, and in special way to thank him for 
his love, care, and the tender compassion which he 
shewed, to his ever-obliged town of Mansoul. So 
after a while, and some sweet communion between 



m HOLY WAR. 



The charter renewed. 



them, the townsmen having solemnly ended their 
ceremony, returned to their place again. 

Emanuel also appointed them a day wherein he 
w auld renew their charter, yea, wherein he would 
renew and enlarge it, mending several faults therein, 
that Mansoul's yoke might be yet more easy. 
And this he did without any desire of theirs, even 
of his own frankness and nohle mind. So when he" 
had sent for and seen their old one, he laid it by, 
and said, " Now that which decayeth and waxeth 
'•'old, is ready to vanish aw r ay."* He said, moreover, 
The town of Mansoul shall have another, another 
and abetter. An epitome of which take as fol- 
lows : 

' I Emanuel, Prince of peace and a great 
f lover of the town of Mansoul, do, in the na'iie 
' of my Father, and of my own clemency, give, 
'grant, and bequeath to mybelo\cd townofMAN- 
4 soul : 

* First, Free and full forgiveness of all wrongs, 
* injuries, and offences, done by them against my 
s Father, me, their neighbours^ or themselves. f 



* In that hesaith, A new covenanf, he hath made the first old. 
Now that which decayeth and waxeth old is ready to vanish away. 
He!). Viii. 13. 

+ For I will be merciful to their unrighteousness, and their sins 
and their inquiries will 1 remember no more. Heb. viii. 12.... 
F or I have given unto them the words which thou gavest me : and 
they have received them, and have known surely that I came out 
from thee, and they have believed that thou didst send me. Joha 
xv ii. 8. 




Emanuel anznlsa nm Cha/1/:rtv ~Mhti/fWt '. 



if,/,/,//,.,/... . ■ fytiv./M ■ •Min ■■ ■ 



HOLY WAR, 



1 > c Goudiliont of if. 



' Secondly, I do give them the holy law, and my 
1 testament, with all therein contained, for their 

* everlasting; eemfort and consolation.* 

■ Thirdly, I do also give them a portion of the 

* self-same grace and goodness that dwells in my 

* Father's heart and mine. 

' Fouithly, I do give, grant, and bestow upon 
' them freely, the world and what is therein, for 

* their good.f And they shall have that power 
' ever it, as shall stand with the honour of my Fa- 
' iher, my glory., and their comfort, yea, I grant 

* them the benefits of life and death, and of things 
'present and things to come. This privilege, no 
' other city, town, or corporation shall have, but my 
e M-ansoul only. 

"Fifthly, I do give and grant them leave, and 
' free access to me in my palace at all seasons, there 
1 to make known their wants to me ; and I give 
' them moreover a promise, that I will hear and 
' redress all their grievances .t 



* Whereby are given unto us exceeding great and precious pro- 
mises : that by these ye might be partakes of the divine nature, 
having escaped the corruption that is in the world through lust. 
2. Pet. i. 4.. .We then, as workers together with him, beseech you 
also that ye receive not the grace of God in vain. 2. Cor. vi. ]. 

f Therefore let no man glory iii men. For ail things are yours ; 
whether Paul, or Apollos, or Cephas, or the world, or life, or 
death, or things present, or things to come ; all are yours. 1. Cor. 
iii. 21, 22. 

J Having, therefore, brethren, boldness to enter into the holiest 
by the blood of Jesus. By a new and living way, -which he hath 
consecrated for us through the veil, that is to say, the flesh. Hob. x.; 



205 ' HOLY WAR. 



Grants ami imnvunitie-. 



: Sixthly, I do give, grant to, and invest the town 
' of Mansoul with full, power and authority to 

* seek out, take, enslave, and destroy, all and all 

* manner of Diabolonians, that at anytime, from 
4 whence soever, shall be found straggling in. or 
e about the town of Mansoul. 

* Seventhly, I do further grant to my beloved 
s town of Mansoul, that they shall have authority 
e not to suffer any foreigner or stranger, or their 
' seed, to be free in and of the blessed town of 
' Mansoul, nor to share in the excellent privileges 
''thereof: but that all the grants, privileges, and 

* immunities, that I bestow upon the famous town 
'of Mansoul, shall be for those the old natives, 

* and true inhabitants thereof : to them, I say, and 
' to their right seed after them.* But all Diabo- 
f lonians, of what sort, b.ixth, country, or king- 

* dom soever, shail be debarred a share therein/ 

So when the town of Mansoul had received their 
gracious charter (which in itself is infinitely more 



18, 20, ...Ask, and it shall be given you : seek, and ye shall find : 
knock, and it shall be opened unto you. Mat. vii. f. 

*Thatye put off, concerning the former conversation, the old 
man/which is corrupt according to the deceitful lusts. Eph. iv. 22, 
Mortify, therefore, your members which arc upon the earth : for- 
nication, uncleanhess, inordinate affection, evil concupiscence, 
and covetousness, which is- idolatry. For which things' sake the 
wrath of God cometh on the children of disobedience. Inthe which 
ye also walked sometime, when ye lived in them. But now ye also 
put off all these ; anger % wrath, malice, blasphemy, filthy commu, 
ideation out of your mouth. Lie not one to another, seeing that 
ye have put off the old man with his deeds. Col. iii. 5.. 9. 



HOLY WAR. 



.Toy in Mansoul. 



large,) (hey carried it to audience, (bat is, to tho 
market-place, and there Mr. Recorder read it in ths 
presence of all the people.* This being done, it 
was had back to the castle-gates, and there fairly 
eagraven upon the doors thereof, ami laid in letters 
of gold, to' the end that the town of Mansoll, with 
all the people thereof, might have it always in their 
view, or might go where they might see what a 
blessed freedom their prince had bestowed upon 
them, that their joy might be increased in them- 
selves, and their love renewed to their great and 
good Emanuel. 

But what joy, what comfort, what consolation, 
think you, did now possess the hearts of the men of 
Mansoul ! The bells rung, the minstrels played, 
the people danced, the caplains shouted, the colours 
waved in the wind, the silver trumpets sounded, 
and all the Diabolonians were now glad to hide 
their hands. 

When this was ever, the Prince sent for the 
elders of Mansoul, and communed with them 
about a ministry he intended to establish among 
them ; such'a ministry that might open unto them, 
and instruct them in the things that concerned their 
present and future state ; for, said he, you, of your- 
selves, unless you have teachers and guides, will not 



* But this shall be the covenant that I will make with the house 
of Israel ; after those days, saith the Lord, I will put my law ia 
iheir i award parts, and write it In thtirhearts, and will be their 
Cod, and they shajl be. my people. Jer. xixi. 33. 



HOLY WAR. 

A ministry proposed. 



be able to know, and, if not to know, to be sure not 
to do the will of my Father.* 

At this news, when the elders of Mansoul. 
brought it to the people, the whole town came run- 
ning together ( for it pleased thern well, as whatever 
the Prince did now pleased the people, ) and all with, 
one consent implored his Majesty, that he would 
forthwith establish such a ministry among them, as 
might teach them both law and judgment, statute 
and commandment ; that they nii^ht be document- 
ed in all good and wholesome things. So he told 
them he would grant their requests ; and would es- 
tablish two amongthem, one that was of nis Father's 
court, and one that was a native of Mansoul. 

He that is from the court, said he, is a person of 
no less quality and dignity than my Father and I.f 
And he is the Lord Chief Secretary of my Father's 
house ; for he is, and always has been, the chief 
dictator of all my Father's laws ; a person well 
skilled in all mysteries, and knowledge of mysteries, 
as is my Father, or as myself is. Indeed he is one 



* O Lord, I know that the way of man is not in himself: it is 
not in man that walketh to direct his steps. Jer. x. 23...Butthe 
natural man receivcth not the things of the Spirit of God : for they 
are foolishness unto him : neither can he know them because they 
are spiritually discerned. 1 Cor. ii. 14. 

f For the prophecy came not in old time by thewill of man ; but 
holy men of God spake as they were moved by the Holy Ghost. 
2. Pet. i. 21... But God hath revealed them unto us by his Spirit; 
for the Spirit searcheth all things, yea, the deep things of God. 
1 Cor. ii. 10. ...In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was 
with God, and the Word was God. John. i. 1. 



HOLY WAR. 209 



Tfae teaching of God's Spirit. 



with us in nature,and also as to loving of, and being 
faithful to, and in the eternal concerns of, the town 
of Mansoul. 

And this is he, said the Prince, that must be your 
chief teacher ; for 'tis he, and he only, that can 
teach you clearly in all high and supernatural 
things : he, and he only it is, that knows the ways 
and methods of my Father's court ; nor can any, 
like him, shew how the heart of my Father is at all 
times, in all things, upon all occasions, towards 
Mansoul; for, " as no man knows the things of 
sc a man, but the spirit of a man which is in him ;" 
so the things of my Father knows no man but this 
his high and mighty secretary ;* nor can any, as 
he, tell Mansoul how and what they shall do to 
keep themselves in the love of my Father. He also 
it is that -can bring lost things to your remembra j, 
and that can tell you things to come. This teacher 
therefore must have the pre-eminence, both in your 
affections and judgment, before your other teacher ; 
bis personal dignity, the excellency of his teaching, 



* But the Comforter, -which is the Holy Ghost, whom the Father 
will send in my name, he shall teach you all things, and bring all 
things to your remembrance, whatsoever I have said unto you. 
John. xir. 2o"...Howbeit when he, the Spirit of truth, is come, hi 
will guide you into all truth : for he shall not speak of himself - 
but whatsoever he shall hear, that shall he speak ; and he will shew 
yov. things to come. xvi. 13... But the anointing winch ye have re- 
ceived of him abidefh in yon, and ye need not thaf any m.'n teach 
you : but as the same anointing teacheth you of all things, and 
is truth, and is no lie, and even as it hath taught you, ye shall 
abide in him. 1 John ii. 27. 

nd 



210 HOLY WAR. 



The Spirit teaches to pray. 



also the great dexterity that he ha(h to assist, you 
to. make and draw up petitions to my Father for 
jour help and to his pleasing, must lav obligations 
upon you to love him, fear h'im, and to take heed 
that you grieve him not. 

This Person can put life and vigour into all he 
says : yea, and can also put it into your heart. 
Tin's Person can make seers of you.; and can make 
you tell what shall be hereafter. f By this Person,, 
you must frame all your petitions. to my Father and 
Me ; and without his advice and counsel first ob- 
tained, let nothing enter into the town or castle of 
Mansoul, for that may disgust and grieve this 
noble Person. 



* For our gospel came not unto you in word only, but also in 
power, andinthe Holy Ghost, and in much assurance ; as ye know 
what manner of men we were among you for your sake* And ye 
became followers of us, andof the Lord, having received the word 
in much affliction with joy of the Holy Ghott. 1 Thes. i. 5, 6. 

f And when he was come unto us, hs took Paul's girdle, and 
bound his own hands and feet, and said, Thns saith the Holy 
Ghost, So shall the Jews at Jerusalem bind the man that owneth 
this girdle, and shall deliver him into the hands of (he Gentiles. 
Acts xsi. 1 1 ..But ye, beloved, building up yourselves in your most 
holy faith, praying in the Holy Ghost, Jude. 20... Praying always 
with all prayer and supplication in the Spirit, and watching there- 
unto with all perseverance and supplication for ail saints. Eph* 
vi. IS. ..The Spirit itself beareth witness with our spirit, that we 
are the children of God. Rom. viii. 1 6... He that hath an ear, Let 
•him hear what the Spirit saith unto, the chuyehes; To him that 
overcometh will I give to eat of the hidden manna, and will g':7e 
him a white stone, and in the stone a new name written, which no. 
man knoweth save he that receiveth it. Rev. ii. l7...Aud grieve 
not the Holy Spirit of God, whereby ye'are sealed unto the da.y 
of redemption. Eph. it. 30. 



HOLY WAR. 

'ht- duly of CoNU'lK.X E> 



Take heed, I say, that you do not grieve tins 
minister ; for ii' you do he may fight against you ; 
and should lie once be moved by you to sot himself 
against you in battle array, that will distress you 
more th.an if twelve legions should be sent from my 
Father's court to make war upon you. 

But, a-s I said, if you shall hearken unto him, and 
shall love him ; if you shall devote yourselves to 
bis teaching, and seek to have converse, and to 
maintain communion with him ; you shall find 
him ten times better than is the whole world to 
any. Yea, be shall shed abroad the love of my 
Father in your hearts, and Mansocl will be the 
wisest and :onost blessed of people. 

Then did the Prince call unto him the old gentle- 
man, who afore had been the recorder of Mansoul, 
Mr. Conscience by name, and told him, that for- 
asmuch as he was well skilled in the law, and go- 
vernment of the town of JM at* soul, and wan also 
well spoken, and could pertinently deliver to them 
))ls Master's will in terrene and domestic matters, 
therefore he would also make him a minister for, in, 
and to the goodly town of Maxsoul, in all the 
law?, statutes, and judgments of the famous town of 
Mansocl. And thou must, said the Prince, con- 
fine thyself to the teaching of moral virtues, to the 
civil and natural duties ; but thou must not attempt 
or presume to be a revealer of those high and super- 
natural mysteries that are kept close in the bosom 
of Sua dd ai my Father, for those tilings knoweth no 
jnan, nor can any reveal them but my Father's Se*« 



!12 HOLY WAR. 



Conscience subject lo the Spirit. 



dietary only. Thou art a native of the town of 
Mansoul, but the Lord Secretary is a native with 
my Father ; wherefore; as thou hast knowledge of 
the laws and customs of the corporation, so he of 
the things and will of my Father. 

Wherefore, Oh Mr. Conscience, although I 
have made thee minister and a preacher to the 
town of Mansoul, yet as to the things which the 
Lord Secretary knoweth, and shall teach to this 
people, t'herethou must be his scholar, and a learn- 
er, even as the rest of Mansoul are. Thou must 
therefore, in all high and supernaturalthings, go to 
him for information ; for though there be a spirit 
in man, this Person's inspiration must give him un- 
derstanding.* Wherefore, O tlswvu Mr. Recorder, 
be humble, and remember, that the Diabolonians, 
that kept not their first charge, but left their own 
standing, are now made prisoners in the pit. Be 
therefore content with thy station. 

I have made thee my Father's vicegerent on earth, 
in such things of which I have made mention before. 
And take thou power to teach them to Mansoul, 
yea, and to impose them with whips and chastisements 
if they shall not willingly hearken to thy command- 
ments. And, Mr. Recorder, because thou art old 
and feeble, therefore I give thee leave and licence 
to go when thou wilt to my fountain, my conduit, 
and thereto drink freely of the blood of my grape, 



* And unto men he said, Behold the fear of the Lord, that is 
Hisjlom ; and to depart from evil is understanding. Job. xxviii. 28. 



HOLY WAR. 213 



Christ's blood purges the_conscicnce. 

for my conduit doth always run wine.* Thus 
doing, thou shalt drive from thy heart and stomach 
all foul, gross, and hurtful humours. It will a No 
lighten thine eyes, and strengthen thy memory for 
the reception and keeping of all that the King's 
most noble Secretary teacheth. 

When the Prince had thus put Mr. Recordcr( that 
once so was) into the place and office of a minister 
of Mansoul, and the man had thankfully accepted 
thereof, then did Emanuel address himself to the 
townsmen themselves. 

' Behold (said the Prince to Mansoul) ray love 
' and care towards you ; I have added to all that, is 
( past, this mercy, to appoint you preachers, the 
' most noble Secretary, to teach you in all sublime 
' mysteries ; and this gentleman (pointing to ?»Xr. 
e Conscience) is to teach you in all things human 
' and domestic, for therein lieth his work. He is 
'not, by what I have said, debarred of telling to 
' Mansoul any thing that lie hath heard from the 
' lord high Secretary ; only he shall not attempt, or 
' presume to pretend, to be a revcaler of those 
' high mysteries himself ; for the breaking; of them 
' up, and the discovery of them to Mansoul, lieth 
( only in the power, authority, and skill of the lord 
f high Secretary himself. Talk of them he may, 
' and so may the rest of the town of Mansoul, as 



* How much more shall the blood of Christ, who through ihe 
eternal Spirit, offerer! himself without spot to God purge y out 
pbhscieuces from dead works, to serve the lining God ? xleb. ix. 14. 



'Sn HOLY WAR. 



3a!?atioa only ;n Christ. 



* they have opportunity, press them upon each 

* oilier for the benefit of the whole. These thing* 

* I would have you observe and do ; for it is for 

* yemr life, and the lengthening of your days. 

''And one thing more to rny beloved town of 
' Mansoul : you must not dwell in, nor stay upon 
f any thing of that which he hath in commission 
f to teach you as to your trust and expectation of 

* the next world : of the next world, I say : for I 
' propose to give another to Mansoul, when this 
' with them is worn out, but for that you must 
1 wholly have recourse to, and make stay upon his 

* doctrine, that is your teacher after the first order. 
'Yea, Mr. Recorder himself must not look for life 
' from that which he himself rcvealeth ; his de- 
' pendence for that must be founded in the doctrine 

* of the other preacher. . Let Mr. Recorder also 
'take heed that he receive not any doctrine, or 
' point of doctrine, that is not communicated to 
' bim by his superior Teacher, nor yet within the 
' precincts of his own formal knowledge.' 

Now after the Prince had thus settled things in 
the famous town of Mansoul, he proceeded to give 
the elders of the corporation a necessary caution, 
to wit, how they should carry it to the noble cup-f 
tains that he had sent or brought with him from 
his Father's court, to the famous town of Mansoul. 
'• These captains fsaid he) love the town of Man- 
' sou A, and they are men picked out of abundance, 
■ as men that best suit, and thnt will most faithfully 

* serve in the v, ars of Suaddai againsi the Diaeqt 



HOLY WAR. 215 



Ministers must be kindly trpaled. 



* LONIANS for the preservation of the town of 
' Man soul. I charge you, therefore., said he, O 

* ye inhabitants of the now flourishing' town of 

* Mansoul, that yon carry it not un to ward ly to my 
' captains or their men ; since they are picked and 

* choice men, men chosen out of many for the good 

* of the town of Mansoul. I say, I charge you, 
' that you carry it not untowardly to them ; for 
'though they have the hearts and faces of lions, 
' when at any time they shall be called forth to en- 

* gage and fight with the King's foes, and the ene- 
mies of the town of Mansoul, yet a little dis- 

* countenance cast upon them from the town of 
4 Mansoul will deject and cast down their faces, 
' will weaken and take away their courage. Do 
' not, therefore, carry it unkindly to my valiant 
'captains and courageous men of war, but love 
{ them, nourish them, succour them, and lay them 
' to your besoms, and they will not only fight for 
c you, but cause to fly from you all those Diabo- 
' lonians that seek, and will, if possible, prove 
' your utter destruction. 

' If, therefore, any of them should at any time be 
' sick, or weak, and so not able to perform that of- 
' fice of love which with all their hearts they are 
' willing to do (and will do also when well and rn 

* health)* Slight them not, nor despise them, but 



* Wherefore Sift «p the hands that hang down, ami the Kecbie 
knees, lleb. xii. 12...Strengtheu ye the weak hands, andcoa- 
fa-'m the feeble knees. Isa. xxiy. 3. 



'16 HOLY WAR. 



The feeble must he supported. 



' rather strengthen and encourage them, though weak 
'and ready to die; for they -are your fence and 

* your guard, your walls, gates, locks, and bars. 

* And although when they are weak they can do but 

* little, but rather need to be helped by you,* than 
' that you should expect great things from them ; 
' yet when well, you know what exploits and war- 

* like achievements they can do, and will perform 
' for you. 

■' Besides, if they be weak, the town of Mansoul 

* cannot be strong ; if they be strong, then Man- 
€ soul cannot be weak ; your safety therefore doth 

* lie in their health, and in your countenancing 

* them. Remember also, that if they be sick, they 
/catch their disease of the town of Mansoul it- 

* self. 

' These tilings I have said unto you, because I 
' love your welfare and your honour : observe, 
' therefore, Oh my Mansoul, to be punctual in all 
e things that I have given in charge unto you, and 
!* that not only as a town corporate, and so to your 
' officers and guard and guides in chief, but to you 
' as you are a people whose well- being, as single 

* persons, depends on the observation of the orders 
' and commandments of their Lord. Next, Oh 
' my Mansoul, I warn you of that, of which, not- 
' withstanding the reformation that is at present 



♦Now \ve exhort you brethren, warn them that are unruly, 
comfort the feebla minded, support the weak, be patient toward 
allmeu. I Thes. v. 14; 



HOLY WAR. 217 



Remaining corruptions in (lie soui. 



' wrought among you, you have need to be warned 
■ about : wherefore hearken diligently unto me. I 
' am now sure, and you will know hereafter, that 
' there are yet some Biabolonians remaining in 
' thetownof Mansoul; Diaboloniaxs that are 
' sturdy and implacable, and that do already while 
' I am yet with you, and that will yet more when I 
c am from you, study, plot, contrive, invent, and 
'jointly attempt to bring you to desolation, and so 
' to a state tar worse than that of Egyptian bondage ; 

* they are the avowed friends of Diaeolus, there- 
' fore look about you.* They used therefore to 
' lodge with their Prince in the castle, when Incre- 
' dulity was lord-mayor of this town ; but since 
' my coming hither, they lie more in the outsides 
'and walls, and have made themselves dens, and 
c caves, and holes, and strong holds therein, f 
'Wherefore, Oh Mansoul, thy work as to this, 

* will be so much the more difficult and hard ; that 
' is, to take, mortify, and put them to death, ac- 
' cording to the will of my Father. Nor can you 

* utterly rid yourselves of them, unless you should 
' pull down the walls of your town, the which I am 

* Not every one that saith unto me, Lord,-Lord, shall enter in- 
to the kingdom of heaven ; but he that doeth the will of my 
Father which is in heaven. Many will say unto me in that day, 
Lord, Lord, have we not prophesied in thy name ? and in thy 
name have cast out devils ? and in thy name done many wonder- 
ful works. Mat. vii. 21, 22. 

f For I know that in me (that is in my flesh) dwelleth, no go-id. 
thing : for to will is present with me, but,how to perform that 
which is good 1 tind aot. Rom. vii. 18. 
E e 



HOLY WAR. 



W e must fight our sins. 



* by no means willing you should. Do you ask me, 
■ What shall we then do ? Why, be you diligent, 

* and quit yourselves like men ; observe their holds, 
'find out their haunts, assault them, and make no 

* peace with them ; wherever they haunt, lurk, or 
' abide, and what terms of peace soever they offer 
'■ you, abhor ; and all shall be well betwixt you and 
6 me. And that you may the better know them 
' from the natives of Mansoul, I will give you 

* this brief schedule of the names of the chief ot 
' them ; and they are these that follow : The lord 
' Fornication, the lord Adultery, the lord 
' Murder, the lord Anger, the lord Lascivious- 
' ness, the lord Deceit, the lord Evil-eye, Mr. 

* Drunkenness, Mr. Revelling, Mr. Idola- 
' try, Mr. Witchcraft, Mr. Variance, Mr. 

* Emulation, Mr. Wrath, Mr. Strife, Mr. Se- 
' dition, and Mr. Heresy. These are some of 
' the chief, O Mansoul, of those that will seek to 

* overthrow thee for ever ; these, I say, are the 

* skulkers in Mansoul ; but look well into the law 
' of thy King, and thou shalt find their physiogoo- 
f my, and such other characteristical notes of them, 
f whereby they may be known. 

e These, O my Mansoul, and I would gladly 
f that you should certainly know it, if they be suf- 
fered to run and range about the town as they 
s wish, would quickly, like vipers, eat out your 
' bowels, yea poison your captains, cut the sinews 
6 of your soldiers, break the bars and bolts of your 
e gates, and turn your now most flourishing Man- 



HOLY WAR. 219 



And crucify our lusfs. 



' soul into a barren desolate "wilderness and ruin- 
' ous heap. Wherefore, that you may take courage 
' io yourselves to apprehend these villains wherever 
'you find them, I give to you my lord-mayor, my 

* lord Will-be-w.ill, and Mr. Recorder, with all 
'the inhabitants of the town of Mansoul, full 
' power and commission to seek out, to take, and 

* cause to be put to death by the cross, all manner of 
' Diabolonians, wherever you shall find them 

* lurk within or without the walls of the town of 
' Mansoul. I told you before, that I had placed 
' a standing ministry among you ; not that you have 
' but these with you, for my four first captains who 
' came against the master and lord of the Diabo- 
f lonians that was in Mansoul, they can, and 
' if need be, if they be required, will not only pri- 
' vately inform, but publicly preach to the corpo- 
' ration, good and wholesome doctrine : yea, they 
' will set up a weekly, and, if need be, a daily lec- 
f ture in thee, Oh Mansoul! and will instruct 
' thee in such profitable lessons, that, if attended 
f to, will do thee good at the end. And take good 
' heed that you spare not the men whom you have 
' a commission to take and crucify. 

' Now as I have set before your eyes the vagrants 
'and runagates by name, so I will tell >ou, that 
f among yourselves some of them shall creep in to 
' beguile you, even such as would seem, and that 
' in appearance are very rife and hot for religion : 
' and they, if you watch not, will do you a mischief, 
' such an one as you do not think of. These will 



S20 HOLY WAR. 



The garment of holiness. 



* shew themselves to you in another hue than those 
' under the description before ; wherefore watch 

* and be sober, and suffer not thyself to be be- 
' trayed.' 

When the Prince had thus far new modelled the 
town of Mansoul, and had instructed thera in such 
tnatters as were profitable for them to know ; then 
he appointed another day, on which he intended 
when the townsfolk came together, to bestow a fur- 
ther badge of honour upon the town o{ Mansoul : 
a badge that should distinguish them from all peo- 
ple, kindreds, and tongues, that dwell in the king- 
dom of Universe. Now it was not long before the 
day appointed came, and the Prince and the people 
met in the King's palace, where first Emanuel 
made a short speech unto them and then did for them 
as he had said, and unto them as he had promised. 

' My Mansoul, (said he) that which I now am 

* about to do, is to make you known to the world 
f to be mine, and to distinguish you also in your 

* own eyes, from all false traitors that may creep ia 
s among you/ 

Then he commanded that thosothat waited upon 
him should go and bring forth out of his treasury 
those white glittering robes that I, said he, have 
provided and laid up in store for my Mansoul. 
So the white garments were fetched, and laid forth 
to the eyes of the people.* Moreover, it was 

*And to her was granted thatshe should be arrayedin fine linen, 
clean and white : for the fine linen is the righteousness of saints. 
Rev. iix. 8, 



HOLY WAR. 221 



Che ist's livery 



granted to them, that they should take them and put 
them on. So the people were put into white, into 
fine linen, white and clean. 

Then said the Pnnce unto them, f This, O Man- 
r soul, is my livery, a.<;d the badge by which mine 

* are known from the servants of others. Yea, it is 
' that which I grant to all that are mine, and with- 
4 out which no man is permitted to see my face. 
f Wear them, therefore, for my sake that gave 
e them uoto you ; and also if you would be known 
' by the world to be mine.' 

But now, can you think how Mansoul shone ? 
It was fair as tHe sun, clear as the moon, and ter- 
rible as an army with banners. 

The Prince added further, and said, ' No prince, 
' potentate, or mighty one of Umyerse, givetli 
'this livery but myself: behold, therefore, as I 
' said before, you shall be known by it to be mine. 

€ And now (said he) I have given you my livery, 

* let me give you also in commandment concerning 
' them : and be sure that you take good heed to 

* my words. 

e First, Wear them daily, day by day, lest you 
' should at some times appear to others as if you 
' were none of mine. 

* Secondly, Keep them always white; for if 
*' thev be soiled it is dishonour to me.* 



♦Let thy garments be always white; and let thy head lack 
no ointment. Eccl. ix. 8. 

Be watchful, and strengthen the things which remain, that aro 



22£ HOLY WAR. 



We must keep ourselves pure. 



' Third! y, Wherefore gird the n up from the 
'ground, and let them not be soiled with dust or 

* dirt. 

e Fourthly, Take heed that you lose them not, 

* lest you walk naked, and they see your shame. 

' Fifthly, But if you should sully them, if you 

* should defile them (the which I am unwilling you 

* should, and the Prince Diabolus would be glad if 
' you would, )* then speed to do that which is writ- 

* ten in my law, that yet you may stand and not 
.* fall before me, and before my throne. f Also this 
'is the way to cause that I may not leave you 

* nor forsake you while here, but dwell in this town 

* of Mansoul for ever.' 

And now was Mansoul, and the inhabitants of 
it, as the signet upon Emanuel's right-hand : 
where was there now a town, a city, a corporation, 
that could compare with Mansoul ! A town re- 
deemed from the hand and from the power of Di- 



ready to die : for I have not found thy works perfect before God. 
Iter. iii. 2. 

* These are they which cameout of great tribulation, and have 
washed their robes, and made them white in the blood of the Lamb. 
Therefore are they before the throne of God, and serve him day 
and night in his temple : and he that sitteth on the throne shall 
dwell among them. They shall hunger no more, neither thirst any 
more, neither shall the sun light on them, nor any heat. For the 
Lamb, which is in the midst of the throne, shall feed them and shall 
lead them unto living fountains of waters : and God shall wipe 
away all tears from their eyes. Rev. vii. 14.. 17. 

+ Watch ye therefore, and pray always, that ye may be account- 
ed worthy to escape all these things that shall come to pass, 
and to stand before the Son of man. Luke xxi. 36, 



HOLY WAR. 223 



Christians have free access to Christ. 



abolus ! A town that the king Shaddai loved, 
and he sent Emanuel to regain from the prince of 
the infernal cave; yea, a town that Emanuel 
loved to dwell in, and that he chose for his royal 
habitation; a town that he fortified for himself, and 
made strong by the force of his arm. What shall I 
say ! Mansoul has now a most excellent prince, 
golden captains and men of war, weapons proved, 
and garments as white as snow. Nor are these 
benefits to be counted little, but great : can Man- 
soul esteem them so, and improve them to that end 
and purpose for which they are bestowed upon 
them ? 

When the Prince had thus completed the mo- 
delling of the town, to shew that he had great de- 
light in the works of his hands, and took pleasure 
in the good that he bad wrought for the famous and 
flourishing Mansoul, he commanded and they set 
his standard upon the battlements of the castle. 
And then : 

First he gave them frequent visits ; not a day now 
out the elders of Mansoul mustcome to him, or he 
to them, into his palace. Now they must walk to- 
gether, and talk of all the great things that he had 
done, and yet further promised to do for the fa- 
mous town of Mansoul. Thus would be often do 
with the lord-mayor, my lord Will-be-will, and 
the honest subordinate-preacher, Mr. Conscience, 
and Mr. Recorder. But oh how graciously, how 
lovingly, how courteously and tenderly, did the bles- 
sed Piince carry it towards the town of Mansoul ! 



224 HOLY WAR. 



Christ feasts the soul 



In all the streets, gardens, orchards, and other places 
where he came, to be sure the poor should have his 
blessing and benediction : yea, he would kiss them, 
and, if they were ill, he would lay hands on them, 
and make them well. The captains also he would 
daily, yea, sometimes hourly, encourage with his 
presence and goodly words : for you must kuow, 
that a smile from him upon them would put more 
vigour, life, and stoutness into them, than any thing 
else under heaven. 

The Prince would now also feast them, and be 
with them continually ; hardly a week would pass 
but a banquet must be had betwixt him and them.* 
You may remember, that some pages before we 
made mention of one feast that they had together, 
but now to feast them was a thing more common ; 
every day with Mansoul was a feast-day now. 
Nor did he, when they returned to their places, send 
them empty away ; either they must have a ring, a 
gold chain, a bracelet, a white stone, or something ; 
so dear was Minsoul to him cow, so lovely was 
Mansoul in his eyes. 

Secondly, When the elders and townsmen did 
not come to him, he would send in much plenty of 
provision upon them : meat that came from court, 
wine and bread that were prepared fnr his Father'* 
table : yea, suchdelicates would he send unto them, 



* Therefore let us keep the feast, not with old leaven, neither 
with the leaven of malice and wickedness ; hut with the utileaVea- 
ed bread of sincerity and truth. 1 Cor. t. 8. 



HOLY WAK. 



The condescension of Christ. 



and therewith would so cover their table, that who- 
ever saw it, confessed that the like could not be 
seen in any kingdom. - 

Thirdly, If Man soul did not frequently visit 
him as he desired they should, he would walk out 
to them, knock at their doors, and desire entrance, 
that amity might be maintained betwixt them and 
him ; if they heard and opened to him, as commonly 
tbey would if they were at home, then would he re- 
new his former love, and confirm it too, with some 1 
new tokens, and signs of continued favour.* 

And it was now amazing to behold, that iu that 
very place where sometimes Diabolus had his 
abode, and entertained the Diaeolonians, to the 
almost utter destruction of Mansoul, the Prince 
of princes should sit eating'and drinking with them, 
while all his mighty captains, men of war, trumpet- 
ers, with the singing- men and singing-women of his 
Father stood round about to wait upon them ! Now 
did Mansoul s cup run over, now did her conduits 
run sweet wine, now did she eat the finest of the 
wheat, and drink milk and honey out of the Rock ! 
Now she said, How great is his goodness ! for since 
I found favour in his eyes, how honourable have I 
been ! 



* Behold I stand at the door and knock : if any man hear my 
Toice and open the door, 1 wiW come in to him, and will sup with 
him, and he with me. Rev. iii. 20. ..I bleep, but my heart waketh ; 
it is the voice of my beloved that knocketh, saying, Open to me 
my sister, my love, my dove, my undeuled : for my head is filled 
*ith dew, and my locks with the drops of the night. Cunt, v, 2* 
F f 



SM HOLY WAR. 



Harmony in the soul. 



The blessed Prince also ordained a new ofHcer in 
town,* and a goodly person be was, his name 
was Mr. God's-peace ; this man was set over 
my lord Will-be-will, my lord-mayor, Mr. 
Recorder, 'the subordinate preacher, Mr. Mind, and 
over all the natives of the town of Mansoul. Him- 
self was not a native of it, but came with the Prince 
Emanuel from the court. He was a great ac- 
quaintance of captain Credence and captain 
Good-hope ; some say they were akin, and I am 
of thart opinion too.f This man, as I said, was 
made governor of the town in general, speciallyover 
the castle, and captain Credence was to help him 
there. And I made great observations of it, that so 
long as all things went in Mansoul as this sweet- 
natured gentleman would, the town was in most 
happy condition. Now there were no jars, no 
eludings, no inferferings, no unfaithful doings in 
the town of Mansoul ; every man in Mansoul 
kept close, to his own employment. The gentry, 
officers^ the soldiers, and all in place, observed their 
order. And as for the women and children of the 
town, they followed their business joyfully, they 
would work and sing- from" morning till night ; so 
that, quite through the town of Mansoul now, no- 
thing was to be found but harmony, quietness, joy, 



* And let the peace of God rule in your hearts, to the which 
also yc are called in one body • and be ye thankful. Col. iii. 15. 

f Now the God of hope fill you with ail joy and peace in believ- 
ing, that ye may abound in hope, through the Dower of the Holy 
Ghost. Rom. xv. J 3. 






The origin of Cars 



and health ; and this lasted all that sampler. But 
there was a man in the town of MansouLj and hi* 
name was idr. Carnal-security ; this man, af- 
ter all the mercy bestowed upon this corporation, 
brought the town of Mansoul into great and griev- 
ous slavery and bondage. A brief account of him 
and of his doings take as followeth : 

When Diabolus at first took possession of ihe 
town of Mansoul, he brought thither with himself 
a great number of Diabolonians, men of his own 
conditions. Now among these there was one whose 
name was Mr. Self-conceit ; and a notable brisk 
man be was., as an}' that in those days posssessedihe 
town of Mansoul. Diabolus, then, perceiving 
this man to be active and bold, sent him upon many 
desperate designs : the which he managed better, 
and more to the pleasing of his lord, than most that 
came with him from the dens could do. Where- 
fore finding him so fit for his purpose, he preferred 
him, and made him next to the great lord VV ill-be- 
will, of whom we have spoken so much before. 
Now the lord Will-be- will, being in those davs 
very well pleased with him and with his atchiev- 
ments, gave him his daughter, the lady Fear-no- 
thing, to wife. Now of my lady Fear-nothing 
did this Mr. Self-conceit beget this gentleman 
Mr. Carnal-secuuity. W'herefore there being 
then in Mansoul those strange kind of mixtures, it 
was hard fur ihem, in some cases, to find out who 
were natives, who not ; for Mr. Carnal-security 
•prang from my lord Wi i. l-be-wi ll by his mother's 



223 HOLY WAR. 



icter of Carnai.-secl'ritv. 



side, though he had for his father a Diabolonian 
by nature. 

Well, this Carnal-security took much after 
his father and mother : he was self- conceited, he 
feared nothing, he was also a very busy man ; no- 
thing of news, nothing of doctrine, nothing of alter- 
ation or talk of alteration, could at any time be on 
foot in Mansoul, but Mr. Carnal-security 
would be at the head or tail of it. But to be sure 
he would decline those that he deemed the weakest, 
and stood always with them, in his way of standing, 
that he supposed was the strongest side. 

Now when Shaddai the mighty, and Emanuel 
his Son, made war upon Mansoul to take it, this 
Mr. Carnal-security was then in the town, and 
was a great doer among the people, encouraging 
them in their rebellion, and putting them upon 
hardening themselves in their resisting the King's 
forces : but when he saw that the town of Mansoul 
w as taken and converted to the use of the glorious 
Prince Emanuel ; and when he also saw what was 
become of Diabolus, and how he was unroofed 
and made to quit the castle in the greatest contempt 
and scorn : and that the town of Mansoul was 
well lined with captains, engines of war, and men, 
and also provisions ; what doth he but wheel about 
also, and, as he had served Diabolus against the 
good Prince, so he feigned that he would serve the 
Prince against his foes; and having got some little 
smattering of Emanuel's things by the end, being 
bold, he ventures himself into the company of tf*e 



HOLY WAR. 2S9 



lie beguiles ' 



tmwtsinea, and attempts also to chat a:. a. 

Now he knew that the power and strength of the 
town of Man SOUL was great, and that it amid nut 
but be pleasing to the people, if he cried up their 
might and their glory ; wherefore he beginneth his 
tale with the power and strength of Mansoul, and 
afllrmetb, that it was impregnable ; now magnifying 
the captains, and their slings, and their rams; then 
crying up their fortifications and strong holds ; and 
lastly, theassurance that tiiey had from their Prince 
that Mansoul should be happy for ever. But 
when he saw that seme of the men of the town were 
tickled and taken with this discourse, he makes it 
his business, and, walking fromstreetto street, house 
to house, and man to man, he brought also Man- 
soul to dance after his pipe, and to grow almost as 
carnally-secure as himself ; so from talking, they 
went to feasting, znd from feasting to sporting, and 
B<n to some other matters (now Emanuel was yet 
*n the town of Mansoul, and he wisely observed 
their doings : ) my lord-mayor, my lord Will-be- 
will, and Mr. Recorder, were also taken with the 
words of this tattling Diabolon i an gentleman ; 
forgetting that their Prince had given them warning 
before, to take heed that they were not beguiled with 
any Diaboloniax sleight ; he had further told 
them, that the security of the now flourishing fcwa 
of MANSOULdid not so much lie in her present for- 
tifications and force, as in her so using of what she 
had, as might oblige her Emanuel to abide within 
her castle. For the right doctrine of Emanuel was 



950 HOLY WAR. 



Christ leaves the carnally-secure. 



that the town of Mansoul should take heed that 
they forg-ei not his Father's love and his ; also that 
they should so demean themselves as to continue to 

keep themselves therein. Now this was not the way 
to do it, namely,' to fall in love with one of the Di- 
abolonians, and with such an one too as Mr.- 
Carnal-security was, and to be led up and down 
by the nose by him : they should have heard their 
Prince, feared their Prince, loved their Prince, and 
have stoned this naughty pack to death, and taken 
care to have walked in the ways, of their Prince's. 
prescribing ; for then should their peace have been 
as a river, when their righteousness had been like 
the waves of the sea. 

Now when Emanuel perceived that through .the 
policy of Mr. Carnal-security the hearts of the 
men of Mansoul were chilled and abated in their 
practical love to him : 

First he bemoans them, and bewails their state 
with the Secretary, saying, ' O that my people had 
s hearkened unto me, and that Mansoul had walk- 
ff ed in my ways ! I would have fed them with the 
* finest of the wheat i and with honey out of the 
' rock would I have sustained them/ This done, 
he said in his heart, I will return to the court, and 
go to my place, till Mansoul shall consider and 
acknowledge their offence. And lie did so, and the 
cause and manner of his going away from them was 
thus, for that Mansoul declined him, as is manifest 
iii these particulars : 

I. They left off their former way of visit- 



HOLY WAR. 221 



Who tnist ia thci 



ing him, they came not to his royal palace as 
afore. 

2. They did not regard nor yet take notice, that 
he came or came not to visit them. 

3. The love-feasts that had wont to be between 
their Prince and them, though he made them still, 
and called them to them, yet they neglected to come 
iothera, or to be delighted with them. 

4. They waited not for his counsel, but began to 
be headstrong and confident in themselves, conclud- 
ing that now they were strong and invincible, and 
Mansoul was secure, and beyond all reach of the 
foe, and that her state must be unalterable for 
ever. 

Now, as was said; Emanuel, perceiving that 
by the craft of Mr. Carnal-security, the town 
of Mansoul was taken off from her dependance 
upon him, and upon bis Father by him, and set up- 
on what by them was bestowed upon it ; he at ilr:t, 
as I said, bemoaned their state ; then he used means 
to make them understand that the way they went on 
in was dangerous : for he sent my lord high Secre- 
tary to them, to forbid them such ways ; but twice 
when he came to them he found them at dinner in 
Mr. Carnal-security's parlour ; and perceiving 
also that they were not willing to reason about 
matters conceraiog their good, he took grief and 
went his way. The which, when lie told to the 
Prince Emanuel, he was grieved a 
ed to hi ..". ' r's court. 



232 HOLY WAR. 



Carnai.-securitv withholds C»R] 



Now the methods of his withdrawing, as I was 
saying befure, were thus : 

J. Even while he was yet with them in Mansoul 
he kept himself close and more retired than for- 
merly. 

2. His speech was not now, if he came into 
their company, so pleasant and familiar as for- 
merly. 

3. Nor did he, as in times past, send to Man- 
soul from his table those dainty bits which he was 
wont to do. 

4. Nor, when they came to visit him, as now~and~ 
then they would, would he be so easily spoken with 
as they found him in times past. They might. now 
knock once, yea, twice, but he would seem not at 
all to regard them ; whereas formerly he would rim 
and meet them half way, and take them too and 
lay them in his bosom. 

Thus Emanuel carried it now ; and by this 
his carriage lie thought to make them betake them- 
selves, and return to him. But alas ! they did not 
consider, they did not know his ways, they regarded 
cot, they were not touched with these, pot with the 
true remembrance of former favours.* Wherefore 



' * But as for them, whose heart walketh after the heart of their 
detestable things, and their abominations, I will recompense their 

way upon their own heads saith ths Lord God. Ezek. xi. 21 

I will go and return to ray place, till they acknowledge their 
offence and geek my face : in their affliction they shall seek e&s 
early. Hos. V. 15. 



HOLY WAR. 233 



Cikv u-securitv hardens the toui. 



vthtt does he but in private manner withdraw him- 
self, first from his palace, then to the gate of the 
town, and so away from Mansoul he goes, till they 
should acknowledge their offence, and more earnest- 
ly seek his face. Mr. God's-peace also laid down 
his commission, and would for the present act no 
longer. Thus they walked contrary to him, and he 
again, by way of retaliation, walked contrary to 
them. Rut alas ! by this time they were so har- 
dened in their way, and had so drunk in the doc- 
trine of Mr. Carnal-security, that the departing 
of their Pnr.ee touched them not, nor was he re- 
membered by them when gone ; and so of conse- 
quence his absence was not bewailed by them.* 

Now there was a day wherein this old gentleman,' 
Mr. Carnal-security, again made a feast for 
the town of Mansoul, and there was at that time 
in the town one Mr. Godly-fear ; one now but 
little set by, though formerly one of great request. 
This man, old Carnal-security had a mind, if 
possible, to gull and abuse as he did the rest, and 
therefore he now bids him to the feast with his 
neighbours. So the day being come, they prepare, 
and he goes and appears with the rest of the guests ; 
and being all set at the table, they ate and drank, 
and were merry, even all but this one man ( for Mr. 
Godly-fear set like a stranger, and neither ate nor 
was merry ;) which when Mr. Carnal-security 



* Can a maid forget her ornaments, or a bride her attire ? Yel 
my people have forgotten me days without number. Jer. ii. 3'?, 



234 HOLY WAR. 



Godly-fear accuses Carnal-security. 

perceived, he addressed himself in a speech thus to 
him .' 

' Mr. Godly-fear, are you not well ? you seem 
' to be ill of body or mind, or both. I have a cor- 

* dial of Mr. Forget-good's making-, which, Sir, if 
9 you will take, I hope it may make you bonny and 
' blithe, and so make you more fit for us feasting 
f companions/ 

Unto whom the good old gentleman discreetly 
-replied : ' Sir, I thank you for all things courteous 
'and civil; but for your cordial I have no list 
■* thereto. But a word to the natives of Man- 

* soul : you the elders and chief of Mansoul, 
' to me it is strange to see you so jocund and merry, 
'when the town of Mansoul is in such woeful 

* case.' 

Then said Mr. Carnal-security, e You want 

* sleep, good Sir, I doubt. If you please, lie down 

* and take a nap, and we the mean while will be 
s merry.' 

Then said Mr. Godly-fear a3 follows : ' Sir, 
s if you were not destitute of an honest heart, you 
' could not do as you have done, and do. 

Then said Mr. Carnal-security, ' Why ?* 
Godly-fear. Nay, pray interrupt me not. It 
is true, the town of Mansoul was strong, and, with 
a proviso, impregnable ; but you have weakened it, 
and it now lies obnoxious to its foes; nor is it a 
time to be silent; it is you Mr. Carnal-security, 
that have stripped Mansoul, and driven her glory 
from her; you have pulled down her towers, >ou 



HOLY WAIL 2S5 



And deals plainly -with him. 



have broken down her gates, you have spoiled her 
locks and bars. 

And now to explain myself : from that time that 
my lords of Mansoul, and you, Sir, grew so great, 
from that time the strength of Mansoul has been 
effended, and now he is risen and is gone. If any 
shall question the truth of my words, I will answer 
him by this and such-like questions : Where is the 
Prince Emanuel ? When did a man or woman 
in Mansoul see him ? When did you hear from 
him, or taste any of his dainty bits ? You are now 
a feasting with this Diabolonian monster, but he 
is not your prince ; I say, therefore, though ene- 
mies from without, had you taken heed, could not 
have made a prey of you, vet since you have sinned 
against your Prince, your enemies within have been 
toohard for you. 

Then said Mr. Carnal-security, e Fie ! Fie ! 
' Mr. Godly-fear, Fie 1 will you never shake off 
' your timorousness ? Are you afraid of being 

* sparrow-blasted ? Who hath hurt you ? Behold, 
f lam on your side; only you are for doubting, 
' I am for being confident. Besides, is this a time 
'to be sad in ? A feast is made for mirth ; why 
1 then do you now, to your shame and our trouble, 

* break out into such passionate, melancholy lanr 

* guage, when you should eat and drink and be 
" merry ? ? 

Then said Mr. Godly-fear again, 'I may 
i well be sad, for Emanuel is gone froL. " T • v- 



£36 ■ , ■ KOLY WAR. 



Warning to M ansooi-, 



' soul : I say again, lie is gone, and you Sir, are 

* the man that has driven him away : yea, he 
' is gone without so much as acquainting thenobies 
'of Mansoul with his going; and if that is not 
I- a sign of anger, 1 am not acquainted with the me- 
' thods of godliness. 

' And now, my lords and gentlemen, my speech is 

* still. to you. Your gradually declining from him,, 

* provoked him to depart from you ; the which he 
" did gradually, if perhaps you would have been 

* made sensible thereby, and have been renewed by 

* humbling yourselves ; but when he saw that none 
' would regard, or lay these fearful beginnings of 
'his anger and judgment to heart, he went away 

* from this place ; and this I saw with mine own 

* eyes. Wherefore now, while you boast, your 
' strength is gone ; you are like the man that had 

* lost his locks which before waved about his shoul- 
" ders. You may with this lord of your feast, shake 
' yourselves, and think to do as at other times ; but 
'since without him you can do nothing, and he 

* is departed from you, turn your feast into a sigh, 

* and your mirth into lamentations. 1 

Then the subordinate- preacher, old Mr. Con- 
science by name, he that of old was recorder of 
Mansoul, being startled at what was said, began 
io second it thus : 

Conscience. Indeed, my brethren, quoth he, I 
fear that Mr. Godly-fear tells us true ; J, for 
my part, have not seen my Prince a long season. I 



HOLY WAR. 237 



The soul greatly alarmed. 



cannot remember the day, for my part : cor can I 
answer Mr'. Godly-fear's question. I am afraid 
that ail is naught with Mansoul. 

Cod-fk. Nay, I know that you will not find him 
in Mansoul., for. he is departed and gone ; yea, and 
gone for the faults of the elders, and for that they 
rewarded his grace with insufferable unkindness. 

Then did the subordinate preacher look as if he 
would fall down dead at the table; also all there 
present, except the man of the house, began to look 
pale and wan. But having a little recovered them- 
selves, and jointly agreed to believe Mr. Godly- 
fear and his sayings, they began to consult what 
was best to be done [now Mr. Carnal-security 
was gone into his withdrawing room, for he liked 
not such dumpish doings] both to the man of the 
house, for drawing them into evil and also to reco- 
ver Emanuel's love. 

Then the saving of their Prince came very hot 
into their minds, concerning the false prophets that 
should arise to delude the town of Mansoul. So 
they took Mr. Carnal-security, concluding that 
he was the person, and burnt his house upon him 
with fire, for he also was a Diabglonian by na- 
ture. 

When this was past and over, they bespeed them- 
selves to look for Emanuel their Prince, and 
" they sought him, but they found him not." (Sol. 
Song v. 6.) Then they were more confirmed in the 
truth of Mr. Godly-fear's sayings, and began also 
severely to reflect upon themselves for their vile and 



m HOLT WAR. 



A time of darkness to the soul. 



ungodly doings ; for they concluded now, that 
their Prince had left them. 

Then they agreed and went to my lord Secrexary., 
whom before they refused to hear, and had grieved 
•with their doings, to know of him, (for he was a 
seer, and could tell where Emanuel was, ) how they 
might direct a petition to him. But the lord Se- 
cretary would not admit them to a conference about, 
this matter, nor would admit them to his royal pa- 
lace nor come out to them.* 

Now was it a day gloomy and dark, a day of 
clouds and of thick darkness with Mansoul. Now 
they saw that they had been foolish, and began to 
perceive what the company and prattle of Mr. 
Carnal-security had done, and what desperate 
damage his swaggering words had brought poor 
Mansoul into: but what further it was likely to 
cost them, that they were ignorant of. Now Mr. 
Godly-fear began to be in great repute with the 
men of the town ; yea, they were ready to lotfk up- 
on him as a prophet. 

Well, when the sabbath-day was come, they went 
to hear their subordinate preacher ; but Oh how did 
itthunder and lighten this day ! His text was that 
in the prophet Jonah, " They that observe lying va-? 
<<r nities, forsake their own mercies," ch. ii. 8. Bu4 



* But they rebelled and ?exedhis holy Spirit : therefore he was 
turned to be their enemy, an.i he fought against them. Isa. ls?i;i 
*0, .And grieve aot the holy Spirit of God whereby ye are sealed 
into the day of redemption. Eph. iv. 30... Quench not the Spirits 
1 The*. W. 10. 



HOLY WAR. 239 



Followed by alarming fears. 



there was then such power and authority in that ser- 
mon, and such a drjection seen in the countenances 
of the people that day, that the like hath seldom been 
heard or seen. The people, when sermon was done 
were scarce able to go to their homes, or to betaka 
themselves to their employs the week after ; thejr 
were so sermon smitten, and also so sermon-sick, 
that they knew not what to do. He not only shew- 
ed Mansoul their sin, but trembled before them 
tinder the sense of his own, still cryiog out of him- 
self, as he preached to them. e Unhappy man that 
' I am ! that I should do a wicked thing ! that I, a 
'preacher I whom the Prince did set up to teach 
'■ M ansoul his law, should myself live senseless 

* and sottishly here, and be one of the first found 

* in transgression ! This transgression also fell 
' within my precincts ; I should have cried out 
' against the wickedness ; but I let Man-soul, lie 
'wallowing in it, until it had driven Emanuel 

* from its borders.' With these things he also 
charged all the lords and gentry of- Mansoul, to 
the almost distracting of them. 

About this time also there was a great sickness in 
M ansoul, and most of the inhabitants were greatly 
afflicted : yea, the captains also and men of war 
were brought to a languishing condition, and that 
for a long time together; so that in case of an in- 
vasion, nothing could to purpose now have been 
jdone, either by the townsmen or field officers.* Oil 

* £k watchful, and strengthen the things which remain, that 



240 IfOLY WAR. 



The garments of holiness defaced. 



how many pale faces, weak hands, feeble knees, and 
staggering men, were now seen to walk the streets 
of Mansoul ! Here were groans, there pants, 
and yonder lay those that wercready to faint. 

The garments too, which Emanuel had given 
them, were but in a sorry case : some were rent, 
some were torn, and all in a nasty condition; some 
also hung so loosely upon them, that the next bush 
they came at was ready to pluck them off. 

After some time spent in this sad and desolate con- 
dition, the subordinate preacher called for a day of 
fasting, and to humble themselves for being so 
"wicked against the great Shaddai and his Son : and 
he desired that captain Boanerges would preach; 
which he consented to do; and the day being come, 
his text was this, (i Cut it down ; why cumbereth it 
fC the ground ?" and a very smart sermon he made 
upon the text. First he shewed what was the oc- 
casion of the words, to wit, " because the fig-tree 
"was barren." Then he shewed what was con- 
tained in the sentence, to wit, repentance or utter 
desolation. He next shewed by whose authority 
this sentence was pronounced, and that was by 
SuiDDAi himself. And lastly, he shewed the rea- 
sons of the point: and then concluded his sermon. 
But he was very pertinent in the application, inso- 
much that he made poor Mansoul tremble : for 
this sermon, as well as the former, wrought much 



are ready to die : for I have not found thy works perfect b< 
God. Rev. ill - % 



for3 



HOLY WAR. 241 



Prayer the sir.Der's hcpe. 



upon the hearts of the men of Mansoul ; yea, it 
greatly hel ped to keep awake those that were roused 
by the. preaching that went before ; so that now 
throughout the whole town there was little or no- 
thing to be heard or seen but sorrow ana mourning; 
and woe. 

Now after sermon they got together^ and consult- 
ed what was best to be done. But, said the subordi- 
nate preacher, I will do nothing of my own head, 
without advising with my neighbour Mr. Godly- 
fear. So they called and sent for Mr. Godlt- 
feau, and he forthwith appeared. Then they de- 
sired that he would further shew his opinion about 
what they had best to do : whereupon the old 
gentleman said as followeth ; ' It is of my opinion 
* that this town of Mansoul should, in this day of 
' her distress, draw up and send an humble petition 
'to their offended Prince Emanuel, that he, in 
'his favour and grace, will turn again unto them, and 
' not keep his anger for ever.' 

When the townsmen had heard this speech, they 
unanimously agreed to his advice : so they presently 
drew up their request : and the next question was, 
But who shall carry it ? At last they all agreed to 
send it by my lord-mayor, who accepted the service, 
and addressed himself to his journey ; after which, 
he came to the court of Shaddai, whither Ema- 
nuel the prince of Mansoul was gone ; but the 
gate was shut, and a strict watch kept thereat ; so 
that the petitioner was forced to stand without for 
u h 



242 HOLY WAR. 



An answer of reproof. 



a great while together.* Then he desired that some 
would go in to the Prince, and tell him who stood 
at the gate, and also what his business was. Ac- 
cordingly one went and told Shaddai and Emanu- 
el his Son, that the lord-major of the town of Man- 
soul stood without at the gate of the King's ^ourt, 
desiring to be admittted into the presence of the 
Prince, the King's Son. He also told the lord-may- 
or's errand, both to the King and his Son Emanu- 
el. But the Prince would not comedown, nor ad- 
mit that the gate should be opened, but sent an an- 
swer to this effect, ' They have turned their back 
' unto me, and not their face ; but now in the time 
' of their trouble, they say unto me, Arise and save 
' us. But can they not now go to Mr. Carnal-se- 
' curity, to whom they went when they turned 
' from me, and make him their leader, their lord 
' and their protector ? And now in their trouble 
* they visit me, from whom in their prosperity they 
s went astray.'']' 

This answer made my lord-mayor look black in 
the face ; it troubled, it perplexed, it rent him sore. 



* Also when I cry and shout,' he shutteth out my prayer, Thou 
hast covered thyself with a cloud, that our prayer should not 
pass through. Lam. Ui. 8, 44,. 

+ Saying to a stock, Thou art my father ; and to a stone Thou 
hast brought me forth : for they have turned their back unto me, 
and not their face : but in the time of their trouble they will say 
Arise and save us. But where are thy gods that thou hast made 
thee ? let them arise, [if they can save thee in the time of thy 
trouble. Jer. u. 28, 28. 



HOLY WAR. 2*3 



We must not withhold prayer. 



And now he began to see what it was to be familiar 
with Diabolonians, such as Carnal-security 
was. When he saw that at court> as yet there was 
little help to be expected, either for himself or 
frietuls io Mansoul ; he smote upon his breast, 
and returned weeping, and till the way bewailing 
the lamentable state of Mansoul. 

When he was come within sight of the town, the 
elders and chief of the people of Mansoul went 
out at the gate to meet him, and to saluie him, 
and to know how he sped at court. But he told 
them his tale in so doleful a manner, that they ail 
cried out, and mourned, and wept. Wherefore they 
threw ashes and dust upon their heads, and put 
eackclol.il upon their loius, and went crying out 
through the town of Mansoul ; which when the 
rest of the townsfolk saw, they all mourned and 
wept. This therefore was a day of rebuke, trouble, 
and anguish to the town of Mansoul, and also of 
great distress. 

After some time, when they had somewhat re- 
covered themselves, they came together to consult 
again what was yet to be done ; and they asked ad- 
vice, as they did before, of (he Rev. Mr. Godlv- 
i'Eak ; who told them, (hat ihere was no way bet- 
ter to do, than to do as they had done, nor would 
"lie that they should be discouraged at ail with what 
they had met with at court ; yea, though several of 
their petitions should be answered with nought but 
i Hence or rebuke ; for, said he, it is the way of the 
\vi3e Shaddai, to make men wait, and to exercise 



34A HOLY WAR, 



Pray without ceasing. 



patience ; and it should be the way of them in want, 
to be willing to stay his leisure, 

Then they tcok courage, and sent again and 
again and again and again ; for there was not a 
day nor an hour, that went over Mansoul-'s head, 
wherein a man might not have met upon the road, 
one or other riding post from Mansoul to the 
court of king Shaddai, and all with letters peti- 
tionary in behalf of, and for the Prince's return 
tf<, Mansoul. The road, I say, was now full 
cf messengers, going and returning, and meeting 
one a.)oih r ; some from the court, and some from 
M'iNsouL ; and this was the work of the miserable 
town of Mansoul all that long, that sharp, that 
cold, and tedious winter. 

Now you may remember, that I told you before, 
that after Emanuel had taken Mansoul, yea., 
and after he had new-modelled the town, there re- 
mained, in several lurking-places of the corpora- 
tion, many of the old Diabolonians, that either 
came with the tyrant, when he invaded and took the 
tow ?,or that had there (by reason of unlawful mix- 
tures in their birth, breeding, and bringing up, ) their 
holes, dent, and lurking places in, under, and about 
the walls of the town; some of their names are, the 
lord Fornication, the lord Adultery, the lord 
Murder, the lord Anger, She lord Lascivious- 
nlss, the lord Deceit, the lord Evil-eve, the lord 
Blasphemy, and tnat horrible villain the old and 
daogerous lord Covetousness ; these, with many 
aore, had yet their abode in the town of Mansoul, 



HOLY WAR. 245 



Unsubdued sins trouble the soul. 



even after Emanuel had driven Diabolus out of 
the castle. 

Against these the good Prince granted a commis- 
sion to the lord Will-be-will and others, yea, to 
the whole town of Man'soul, to seek, take, secure, 
and destroy, any or all they could lay hands on ; for 
that they were Di abolonians by nature, enemies 
to the Prince, and those who sought to ruin the 
blessed town of Mansoul. But Mansoul did not 
pursue this warrant, but neglected to apprehend, 
secure, and destroy those Diabolonians • where- 
fore what do these villains, but by degrees take 
courage to shew themselves to the inhabitants of the 
town ; yea, and as I was told, some of the men of 
Mansoul grew too familiar with several of them, 
to the sorrow of the corporation, as you will hear 
more in time and place. 

Well, when the Diabolonian lords perceived 
that Mansoul had, through sinning, offended 
Emanuel their Prince, and that he had withdrawn 
himself and was gone, what do they but plot the 
ruin of the town of Mansoul ? Accordingly they 
met together at the hold of one Mr. Mischief, who 
was a Diabolonian, and here consulted how they 
might deliver up Mansoul into the hands of Dia- 
bolus again. Now some advised one way, and some 
another, every man according to his own liking. 
At last my lord Lasciviousness proposed that 
somre of the Diabolonians in Mansoul should 
offcr themselves for servants to some of the natives 
iff the town; for, said he, if they do so, and Man- 



M6 HOLY WAR. 



A conspiracy to rainMAiSsouE. 



soul shall accept of them, they may for us, and for 
Diabolus our lord,, make the taking of the town 
of Mansoul more easy than otherwise it would 
foe. But then stood up the lord Murder, and 
said, This may not be done at any time, for Man- 
soul is now in a kind of rage, because by our friend 
•Mr. Caudal-security, she hath been once en- 
snared already, and made to offend against her 
Prince ; and how shall she reconcile herself unto 
her Lord again, but by the heads of these men ? 
Besides, we know that they have in commission to 
take and slay us wherever they shall find us : let us 
therefore be wise as foxes : when we arc dead, 
we can do them no hurt; but while we live we 
may. 

Thus when they had tossed the matter to and fro, 
they jointly agreed that a le(ter should forthwith be 
sent away to Diabolus in their name, by. which the 
state of the town of Manscul should be shewed 
him, and how much it is under the frowns of their 
Prince ; we may also, said some, let him know our 
intentions, and ask his advice in the case. So a 
letter was presently framed, the contents of which 
were these : 

* To our great lord, the prince Diabolus, dweh 
ling below in the Infernal Cave. 

e O great father, and mighty prince Diabolus> 
' we, the true Diabolonians, yet remaining in the 
' rebellious town of Mansoul, having received our 



V WAR. 247 



L in desertion. 



'being's from thee, and our nourishment -.a thy 
' hands., cannot with content and quiet endure to 
' behold, as we do this day, how thou art dispraised, 
' disgraced and reproached among the inhabitants 
' of this town ; nor is thy long absence at all de- 
' lightful to us, because greatly to our detriment. 

' The reason of this our writing to ourlurd, is, 
' that we are not altogether without hope that this 
' town may become thy habitation again : for it is 
' greatly declined from its Prince Emanuel, and 
'he is departed from them ; yea, and though 
' they send and send and send after him to return 
f to them, yet they cannot prevail, nor get good 
' words from him. 

' There has been also of late, and is yet remain- 
' ing a very great sickness and faintings among 
' them ; and that not only upon the poorer sort of 
' the town, but upon the lords, captains, and chief 
'gentry of the place [we only who are Diaboloni- 
' ans by nature, remain well, lively, and strong."'* 
' so that through their great transgression en one 
f hand, and their dangeroussicknesson the other, we 
' judge they lay open to thy hand and power. If 
' therefore it shall stand with thy horrible cunning, 
' and with the cunning of the rest of the princes 
f with thee, to come and make an attempt to take 
J Mansoul again, send us word, and we shall, to 
' the utmost of our power, be ready to deliver it int© 
' thy hand. Or if what we have said, shall not be 
' thought best and most meet to be done, send us 



£48 . HOLY WAR; 



The connection between our lusts and Satan. 

' thy mind in a few words, and we are all ready to 
8 follow thy counsel to the hazard of our lives, and 
• what else we have. 

* Given under our hands this day and date 

above -written, after a close consultation at 

e the house of 'Mr. Mischief, who isyet alive, 

' and hath his place in our desirable town of 

* Mansoul/ 

When Mr. Profane, for he was the carrier, 
was come with this letter to Hell-gate hill, he 
knocked at the gate for entrance. Then did Cer- 
berus the porter (for he was the keeper of that 
gate) open to Mr. Profane; to whom he de- 
livered his letter which he had brought from the 
Diabolonians in Mansoul. So he carried it in, 
and presented it to Diabolus his lord, and said, 
Tidings, my lord, from Mansoul ; and from our 
trusty friends in Mansoul. 

Then came together Beelzebub, Lucifer, 
Apollyon, with the rest of the rabble there, to hear 
what news from Mansoul. So the letter was read, 
and Cerberus stood by. When the letter was 
openly read, and the contents thereof spread into 
all the corners of -the den, command was given, that 
without iet or stop, Deadman's bell should be rung 
for joy. So the bell was rung, and the princes re- 
joiced that Mansoul was likeiy to come to ruin. 
Now the clapper of the bell went, ' The town of 
" Mansoul is coming to dwell with us ; make room 



HOLY WAR. 249 



-elapse o>' the soul. 



r for Mansoul.' This beli, therefore, they rang 
because thev hoped that thev should hare Mansoul 
again. 

Now when they had performed this their horrible 
ceremony, they got together again, to consult what 
answer to send to their friends in Mansoul; and 
some advised one thing and some another : but as 
length, because the business required haste, thev left 
the whole business to Diabolus, judging him the 
most proper lord of the place. So he drew up a 
letter in answer to what Mr. Profane had brought, 
and sent it to the Diabolonians in Mansoul, by 
the same hand that brought theirs to him; and these 
were the contents thereof : 

' To our offspring, the high and mighty Dia- 
' bolonians, that yet dwell in the town of 
' Mansoul ; Diabolus, the great prince of 
' Mansoul, wisheth a prosperous issue and 
' conclusion of those many brave cnterpri7.es , 
' conspiracies, and designs,, that you, of your 
' love and respect to our honour, have in 

* your hearts to attempt to do againstMkK- 

* SOUL, 

< Beloved children and disciples, my lord For- 
' nication, Adultery, and the rest; We have 
' here in our desolate den, received, to our highest 
1 joy and content, your welcome letter, by the 
< hand of our trusty Mr. Profane : and to shew 
'how acceptable your tidings were, we rung out 
i i 



§50 HOLY WAR. 



Satan hopes to ruin and re-possess the soul. 



9 our bell for gladness ; for we rejoiced as much as 
e we could, when we perceived that yet we had 
' friends in Mansoul, and such as sought our 

* honour and revenge in the ruin of the town of 

* Mansoul. We also rejoice to hear that they 
f are in a degenerate condition, have offended their 

* Prince, and that he is gone. Their sickness also 
f pleaseth us, as does also your health, might, and 
' strength. Glad also would we be, right horribly 
" beloved, could we get this town into our clutches 

* again. Nor will we be sparing of our wit, cun- 
' uing, craft, and hellish inventions, to bring to a 
' wished conclusion this your brave beginning. 

' And take this for your comfort, our birth and 
' offspring, that if we again surprise and take it, we 
c will attempt to put all your foes to the sword, and 

* will make you the great lords and captains of the 
■ place. Nor need you fear, if ever we get it again, 
c that we after that shall be cast out any more ; for 
' we will come with more strength, and so take 
' faster hold than we did at first. Besides, it is the 
< law of that Prince which now they own, that if 
" we get them a second time, they shall be ours foi 
f ever.* 



* When the unclean spirit is gone out of a man, he walketh 
through dry places, seeking rest, and findeth none. -Then he saith, 
1 will return into my house from whence I eame out ; and when 
he" is' come he findeth it empty, swept, and garnished. Then go- 
eih he, and take th with himself seven other spirits more wicked 
than himself, and they enter in and dwell there : and the last state 
of t'hat man is worse than the first. Even so shall it be also uaia 
this wicked generation. Mat.xii. 43. ..45. 



HOLY WAR. 251 



His means of destruction. 



1 Do you therefore, our trusty Diabolonians, 
' yet more pry into, and endeavour to spy out, the 
r weakness of the town of Mansoul. We would 
' also that you yourselves do attempt to weaken 
' them more and more. Send us word also by what 
' means we had best to attempt the regaining there- 

* of, to wit, whether by persuasion to a vain and 
f loose life ; by tempting them to doubt and des- 
' pair ; or by blowing up the town by the gunpow- 
f der of pride and self-conceit. Do ye also, O ye 
1 brave Diabolonians, and true sons of the pit, 
' be always in readiness to make a most horrid as- 

* sault within, when we shall be ready to storm it 
c without. Now speed you in your project, and we 
' in our desires, the utmost power of our gates, 
' which is the wish of your great Diabolus, 
' Mansoul's enemy, and him that trembles when 
e he thinks of judgment to come. All the blessings 

* of the pit be upon you ! and so we close up our 
' letter. 

* Given at the Pit's Mouth, by the joint con- 
' sent of all the princes of darkness, to he sent 
' to the force and power that we have yet re- 
' maining in Mansoul, by the hand of Mr. 
' PnorANE. 

f By me, DIABOLUS: 

This letter was sent to the Diabolonians Unit 
vet remained in Mansoul, and that yet inhabited 
the wall, from the dark dungeon of Diabolus, by 
the hand of Mr. Profane, by whom they also iu 



£5§ HOLY WAR. 



Satan encourages our sins to rebel. 



Mansoul sent theirs to the pit. Now when this 
Mr. Profane returned to Man soul, he came as 
he was wont, to the house of Mr. Mischief, for 
that was the place where the contrivers were met. 
Now when they saw that their messenger was re* 
turned safe and sound, they rejoiced at it. Then 
lie presented them his letter ; which, when they had 
read and considered, much augmented their gladness. 
They asked him after ihe welfare of their friends ; 
as how their lord Diabolus, Lucifer, and Beel- 
zebub did, witn the rest of those in the den. To 
which this Pkofane made answer, Well, well, teiy 
lords, they are well, even as well as can be in their 
place. They also, said he, rang for joy at the read- 
ing your letter, as you will perceive by this when 
you read it. 

Now, as was sajd, when they had read their let- 
ter, and perceived that it encouraged them in their 
work, they fell to their way of contriving again, how 
they might complete their design upon Mansoul; 
and the first thing they agreed upon, was, to keep all 
things from Mansoul as close as they could. Let 
it not be known, let not Mansoul be acquainted 
with what we design against it. The nextthing was, 
how or by what means they should try to bring to 
pass the ruin and overthrow of Mansoul ; and one 
said after this manner, and another said after that. 
Then stood up Mr. Deceit, and said, My right 
Djabolonian friends, our lords, and the high ones 
of the dungeon propound unto us these tbre,e 
ways : 



HOLY WAIT. 253 



Unbelief causes to withhold prayer. 



1. Whether we had best to seek itsruin, by mak- 
ing Man soul loose and vain : 

2. Or, by driving them to doubt and despair : 

3. Or, by endeavouring to blow them up with 
the gunpowder of pride and self conceit. 

Now I think if we shall tempt them to pride, that 
may do something; and if we tempt them to wan- 
tonness, that may help. But in my mind, if we 
could drive them into desperation, that would knock 
the nail on the head ; for then we should have them, 
in the first place, question the truth of the love of 
the heart of their Prince towards them, and that 
will disgust him much. This, if it works well, will 
quickly make them leave off their way of sending 
petitions to him ; then farewel earnest solicitations 
for help and supply ; for then this conclusion lies 
naturally before them, f As good do nothing, as to 
' do to no purpose.* So they unanimously ap- 
proved of Mr. BECErT's advice. 

Then the next question was, but how shall we do 
to bring our project to pass ? And it was answered 
by the same gentleman, that this might be the best 
way to do it : Even let, quoth he, so many of our 
friends as are willing to venture themselves for the 
promoting of their prince's cause, disguise them- 
selves with apparel, change their names, and go in- 
to the market like far country men, and proffer 
themselves for servants to the famous town of Man- 
soul, and let them pretend to do for their masters 
as beneficially as may be : for by so doing they may, 
if Man soul shall hire them, in a little time, so cor- 



S5-1 HOLY WAR. 



Vices assume the names of virtues. 



rupr and defile the corporation, that her now Prince 
shall be not only further offended with them, but 
in conclusion spue them out of his mouth. And 
when this is done, our prince Diabolus shall prey 
upon them with ease : yea, of themselves, they 
shall fall into the mouth of the eater. 

This project was no sooner propounded, but was 
as readily accepted, and forward were all Diabo- 
loaiANsiiorto engage in the enterprise: but it 
was not thought fit that all should do thus ; where- 
fore they pitched on two or three, namely, the lord 
Govet'ocskess, the lord LasciVxousness, and the 
lord Anger: the lord Ooyetousness called him- 
self by the name of Prudent-thrifty, the. lord 
JjAsciviousnes* called himself by the name of 
Harmless-^ irth ; and the lord Anger called 
himself by the name of Good-zeal. 

So upon a market-day the) came into the market- 
place ; three lusty fellows they were to look on, and 
they were clothed in sheep's russet, which was now 
in a manner as white as the robes of the men of 
Mansoul. Now the men could speak the lan- 
guage of Mansoul well : so when they came into 
the market-place, and offered themselves to the 
townsmen, they were presently entertained ; for 
ihej asked but little wages, and promised to 'do 
their masters- great service. 
' Mr. 'Mind hired Prudent-thrifty, and Mr. 
Godly-fear hired Good-zeal. True, this fellow 
Harmless-mirth hung a little in hand, and could 
net so soon get a master as the others did, because 



HOLY WAR. 253 



The danger of worldly business. 



the ; Ubsoul was now in Lent; but after 

% ' use Lent was almost out, lord Will- 

br-will hired Harmless-mirth to be both. his 
waiting man and lacquey ; and thus they got theca 
masters. 

These villains being now got into the houses cf 
the men of Mansoul, quickly began to do great 
mischief therein ; for being filthy, arch, and sly, 
fhey quickly corrupted the families where they were ; 
yea, they tainted their masters much, especially this 
Prudent-thrifty, and him they called Harm- 
less-mirth. True, he that went under the visor 
of Good-z£al wasnotso well liked by his master, 
who quickly found that he was but a counterfeit 
rascal ; which when the fellow perceived, he with 
speed made his escape from the house, or 1 doubt 
not but his master had hanged him. 

When these vagabonds had thus far carried on 
their design, and corrupted the town as much as 
they could, in the next place they considered 
with themselves at what time their prince Biabolus 
without, and themselves within the town, should 
make an attempt to seize upon Man'soul ; and 
they all agreed upon this, that a market day would 
be the best for that svork ; because then the towns- 
folk will be busy in their ways : and always take 
this for a rule, ' when people arc most busy in 
' the world, they least fear a surprize.* We also 
then, said they, shall be able with less suspicion to 
gather ourselves together for the work of our friends 
and lords: yea, on such a day should we attempt 



256 HOLY WAR. 



Our lusts invite Satan to attack us. 



our work, and miss it, we may, when they give us 
the rout, the better hide ourselves in the croud, and 
escape. 

Having thus far agreed upon these things they 
wrote another letter to Djabolus, and sent it by 
the hand of Mr. Profane ; the contents of which 
were these : 

' The lords of Looseness send to the great and 
* 7iighT}iABQhvs, from our dens, caves, holds, 
e and strong holds, in and about the wall of 
( the town of Mansqul, Greeting. 

e Our great lord, and the nourisher of our lives, 

* Di a bolus ; how glad we were, when we heard of 
' your fatherhood's readiness to comply with us, and 
' to forward our design, in attempting to ruin 
f Mansoul; none can tell but those, who as we 
' do, set themselves against all appearance of good, 

* when and wheresoever we find it.* 

e Touching the encouragement that your great- 
'.ness is pleased to give us, to continue to devise, 
f contrive, and study, the utter desolation of Man- 
s soul, that we are not solicitous about ; for we 
' know right well, that it cannot but be pleasing 
f and profitable to us, to see our enemies, and 

* them that seek our lives die at our teet, or 



* For the flesh kisteth against the Spirit, and the Spirit against 
the fiesh : and these are contrary the one to the other ; so that ye 
cannot do the things that ye would. Gal. v. IJ, 



HOLY WAR. 257 



Despair ruins the soul. 



c or fly before us. We therefore are still contriv- 
1 iog, to the best of our cunning,, to make this work 
e most facile and easy to your lordship and to 

* us. 

' First we considered of that most hellish cun- 

* ning, compacted, threefold project, that by you 
e was propounded to us in our last ; and have con- 
*■ eluded, that though to blow them up by the gun- 

* powder of pride would do well, and to do it by 

* tempting them to be loose and vain, will help on* 

* yet to contrive to bring them into the gulf of des- 
Operation we think will do best of all. Now we, who 
' are at your beck, have thought of two ways to do 
' this ; first, we, for our parts, will make them as vile 

* as we can,and then you with us, at a time appointed^ 
e shall be ready to fall upon them with the utmost 

* force. And of all the nations that are at your 

* whistle, we think that an army of Doubters may 
1 be the most likely to attack and overcome the 
'town of Mansoul. Thus shall we overcome 

* these enemies, else the pit shall open her mouth 

* upon them, and desperation shall, thrust them 
e down into it. We have also to effect this our 

* so much wished design, sent already three of 

* our most trusty Dfabolonians among them ; 
' trfey are disguised in garbs, have changed their 

* names, and are now accepted of them, to wit, Co- 

* vetousness, Lasciviousness, and Anger. The 

* name of Covetousness is changed into Prudent- 
c thrifty, and him Mr. Mind has hired, and is 

2 k 



£58 HOLY WAR.' 



The progress of siu. 



6 almost become as bad as our friend. Lascivi- 
e ousness has changed his name to Harmless- 
| mirth, and he has got to be the lord WrLL-BE- 
6 will's lacquey ; but he has made his master very 
c wanton. Anger changed his name into Good- 
' zeal, and was entertained by Mr. Godly-fear, 
, r but the peevish old gentleman took pepper in the 

* nose, and turned our companion out of the house: 
e nay, he has informed us since, that he ran away 

* from him, or else his old master had hanged him 

* for his labour. Now these have much helped 

* forward our work and design upon Mansoul ; for 
' notwithstanding the spite and quarrelsome temper 
e of the old gentleman last mentioned, the other two 

* ply their business well, and are likely to ripen the 

* work apace. 

c Our next project is, that it be concluded that 
*■ you come upon the town upon a market-day, and 

* that when they are in the heat of their business ; 
s for then to be sure they will be most secure, and 
' least think that an assault will be made upon 
f them. They will also at such a time be less able 
e to defend themselves, and to offend you in the 
' prosecution of our design. And we your trusty 
c (and we are sure your beloved) ones shall, when 
f you make your furious assault without, be ready 

* to second the business within. So shall we in all 
( likelihood be able to put Mansoul to utter con- 
e fusion, and swallow them up before they can come 
« to themselves. If your serpentine heads, most 



HOLY WAR." S59 

The disease of the sou!. 

' subtle dragons, and our highly esteemed lords, 
' can find cut a better way than this, let us quickly 
' know your minds. 

' To the monsters of the Infernal Ca*be, from 
' the house of Mr. Mischief in Mansoul, 
' hy the hand of Mr. Profane. 

Now all the while that the raging runagades, and 
hellish Diabolonians were thus contriving the 
ruin of the town of Mansoul, they, to wit, the 
poor town itself, was in a sad and woeful case 
partly because they had so greatly offended Shad- 
pAi and his Son,' and partly because that the ene- 
mies thereby got strength within them afresh, and 
alsj because, though they had by many petitions 
made suit to the Prince Emanuel, and to his Fa- 
ther Shaddai by him, for their pardon and favour, 
yet hitherto obtained they not one smile ; but con- 
trariwise, through the craft and subtlety of the do- 
mestic Diabolonians, their cloud was made to grow 
blacker and blacker, and their Emanuel to stand 
at further distance. The sickness also still greatly 
raged in Mansoul., both among the captains, and 
the inhabitants of the town ; their enemies, and their 
enemies only, were now lively and strong ; and like 
to become the head, whilst Mansoul was made the 
tail. 

By this time the letter last mentioned, that was 
written by the Diabolonians that yet lurked in 
the town of Mansoul, was conveyed to Diabolic, 



*60 "HOLY WAR. 



The state ofli cksliders described. 



In the black den, by the hand of Mr. Profane, 
He carried the letter by Hell-gate-IhII as afore^ 
and conveyed it by Cerberus to his lord. 

Bot when Cerberus and Mr. Profane met, they 
were presently great as beggars, end thus they fell 
into discourse about Mansoul, and about the pro- 
ject against her. 

Ah ! old friend^ quoth Cerberus., art thou come 
to HELL-GATE-hill again ? By St, Mary, I am 
glad to see thee. 

Pro. Yes, my lord, I am come again about the 
concerns* of the town of Mansoul. 

Cee. Prithee tell me, what condition is that town 
of Mansoul in at present. 

Pro. In a. brave condition, my lord, for us* and 
for my lords, the lords of this place, I trow ; for 
they are greatly decayed as to godliness, and that's 
as well as our heart can wish : their Lord is greatly 
out with them, and that doth also please us well. 
We have already also a foot in their dish, for our 
Diabolonian friends are laid in their bosoms, 
and what do we iack, but to be masters of the place ? 
Besides, our trusty friends in Mansoul are daily 
plotting to betray it to the lords of this town ; also 
the sickness rages bitterly among them, and that 
which makes up all, we hope at last to prevail. 

Then said Cerberus, No time like this to as- 
sault them. I wish that the enterprise be followed 
close, and that the success desired may be soon ef- 
fected, yes„ I wish it for the poor Diabo&onians* 



HOLY WAR. 261 



His imminent danger. 



sakes, that live in the continual fear of their lives 
in that traitorous town of Mansoul. 

Pro. The contrivance is almost finished, the 
lords in Mansoul that are Diabolonians are at 
it day and night; and the other are like silly doves, 
they want heart to be concerned with their state, 
and to consider that ruin is at hand. Besides, you 
may, yea must think, when you put all things to- 
gether, that there are many reasons that prevail with 
Diabolus to make what haste he can. 

Cek. Thou hast said as it is, I am glad things are 
at this pass. Go in, my brave Profane, to my 
lords, they will give thee for thy welcome as good 
a Coranto as this kingdom will afford. I have sent 
thy letter in already. 

Then Mr. Profane went into the den, and his 
lord Diabolus met him, and saluted him with, 
Welcome, my trusty servant, I have been made glad 
with thy letter. The rest of the lords of the pit gave 
him atao their salutations. Then Profane, after 
obeisance made to them all, said, Let Mansoul be 
given to my lord Diabolus, and let him be her king 
for ever. And with that the yawning gorge of hell 
gave so loud and hideous a groan (for that is the 
music of that place) that it made the mountains 
about it totter, as if they would fall in pieces. 

Now after they had read and considered the let- 
ter, they consulted what answer to return, and the 
first that spake to it was Lucifer. 

Luc. The first project of the Diabolonians in 
Mansoul is like to be lucky, and to take ; to wit, 



"562 ■ 'HOLY WAR. 



Sin only ruins the soul. 



that they will, hy all the means they can, make 
Mansoul yet more vile ; no way to destroy a soul 
like this ; our old friend Balaam went this way, 
and prospered many years ago.* Let this therefore 
stand with us v for a maxim, and be to Diabolo- 
Nians for a general rule in all ages : for nothing 
can make this to fail but grace, in which I would 
hope that this town has no share. But whether to 
fall upon them on a market- day, because of their 
cumber in business, that I would should be under 
debate. And there is more reason why this head 
should be debated, than why some other should ; 
because upon this will turn the whole of what we 
shall attempt. If we time not our business well, 
our whole project may fail. Our friends the Di- 
abolonians say, that a market-day is best, for 
then will Mansoul be most busy, and have fewest 
thoughts of a surprise. But what if they shall 
double their guards on those days (and methinks 
nature and reason should teach them to do it ? ) and 
what if they should keep such a watch on those days 
as the necessity of their present care requires ? Yea, 
what if their men should be always in arms on those 
days ? Then you may, my lords, be disappointed 
in your attempts, and may bring our friends in the 
town to utter danger of unavoidable ruin. 

Beelzebub. There is something in what my 

* Behold, these caused the children of Israel, through the 
counsel of Balaam, to commit trespass against the Lord in the 
matter of Peor, and there was a plague among the eongregatioa 
©f the Lord. Numb. xxxi. 16*. 



HOLY WAR. 283 



Satan fears prayer. 



lord hath said, but his conjecture may, or may not 
fall out. Nor hath my lord laid it down as that 
which must not be receded from : for I know that 
he said it only to provoke a warm debate thereabout. 
Therefore we must understand, if we can, whether 
the town of Mansoul has such a sense of her de- 
cayed state, and of the designs we have on foot 
against her, as to set watch and ward at her gates, 
and to double them on market-days. But if, after 
inquiry made, it shall be found that they are asleep, 
then any day will do, but a market-day is best ; and 
this is my judgment. 

Then quoth Diabolus, How should we know 
this ? And it was answered, Inquire about it at the 
mouth of Mr. Profane. So Profane was called 
in, and asked the question, and he made his answer 
as follows : 

Pro. My lords, so far as I can gather, this is at 
present the condition of the town of Mansoul ; 
they are decayed in their faith and love ; Emanuel, 
their Prince, has given them the back ; they send 
often by petition to fetch him again, but he makes 
no haste to answer their request ; nor is there much 
reformation among them. 

Diabolus. I am glad that they are backward to 
a reformation, but yet I am afraid of their petition- 
ing. However, their looseness of life is a sign that 
there is not much heart in what they do, and without 
the heart, things are little worth. Rut go on, 
my masters, I will divert you, my lords, no lon- 
ger. 



2o4 HOLY WAR. 



A few sins will ruia the soul. 



Beel. If the case be so with Mansoul, as Mr. 
Profane has described it to be, it will be no great 
matter what day we assault it ; not their prayers^, 
nor their power, will do them much service. 

When Beelzebub had ended his oration, then 
Apollyon began. My opinion, said he, concern* 
lug this matter, is, that we go on fair and softly, not 
doing things in a hurry. Let our friends in Man- 
soul go on still to pollute and defile it, by seeking 
to draw it yet more into sin (for there is nothing like 
sin to devour Mansoul. ) If this be done, and takes 
effect, Mansoul itself will leave off to watch, peti- 
tion, or any thing else, that should tend to her secu- 
rity and safety ; for she will forget her Emanuel, 
she will not desire his com pany ; and can she begotten 
thus to live, her Prince will not come to her in 
haste. Our trusty friend, Mr. Carnal-security, 
with one of his tricks, drove him out of the town, 
and why may not my lord Covetousness, and my 
lord Lasciviousness, hy what they may do, keep 
him out of the town ? And this I will tell you, not 
because you know it not, but that two or three 
Diabolonians, if entertained and countenanced by 
the town of Mansoul, will do more to the keeping 
of Emanuel from them, and • towards making the 
town our own, than an army or legion that should 
be Sent out from us to withstand him. 

Let therefore the first project that our friends in 
Mansoul have set on foot, be strongly and diligently 
carried on with all cunning and craft imaginable ; 
and let them send continually under one guise or 



HOLY WAR. 



The more siiifuJ the more open to Satan's attack. 



other, more and other of their men to play with the 
people of Mansoul : and then perhaps we shall 
not need to be at the charge of making a war upon 
them ; or if that must of necessity be done, yet the 
more sinful they arc, the less able they will be to 
resist us, and then the more easily we shall over- 
come them. And besides, suppose, and that is the 
worst that can be supposed, that Emanuel should 
come to them again, why may not the same means, 
or the like, drive him from them once more ? Yea, 
why may he not, by their lapse into that sin again, 
be driven from them for ever, for the sake of which 
he was at the first driven from them for a season ? 
And if this should happen, then away will go with 
him his rams, his slings, his captains, his soldiers, 
and he leaveth Mansoul naked and bare. Yea, 
will not this town, when she sees herself utterly for- 
saken of her Prince, of her own accord open her 
gates again unto you? But this must be done 
by time, a few days will not effect so great a work 
as this. 

When AroLLYON had made an end of speaking, 
Diabolus began to blow out his own malice, and 
plead his own cause ; and he said, My lords aud 
powers of the cave, my true and trusty friends, I have 
with much impatience, as becomes me, given ear to 
your long and tedious orations. But my furious 
gorge and empty paunch so lusteth after a reposses- 
sion of my famous town of Mansoul, that whatever 
comes on't, I can wait no longer to see the events of 
lingering projects, I must, and that without fur- 



2 L 



$66 HOLY WAR. 



Doubts Satan's instruments of attack. 



ther delay, seek by all means I can to fill my in- 
satiable gulf with the soul and body of the town of 
Mansoul. Therefore lend me your heads, your 
hearts, and your helps ; now I am going to recover 
my town of Mansoul. 

When the lords and princes of the pit saw the 
flaming desire that was in Diabolus to devour the 
miserable town of Mansoul, they left off to raise 
any more objections, but consented to lend him what 
strength they could: though had Apollyon's ad- 
vice been taken, they had far more fearfully distress- 
ed the town of Mansoul. But I say, they were wil- 
ling to lend him what help they could, not know- 
ing what need they might have of him, when they 
should engage for themselves, as he. Wherefore 
they fell to devising about the next thing propound- 
ed, to wit, what soldiers they were, and also how 
many, with whom Diabolus should go against the 
town of Mansoul, to take it : and, after some de- 
bate, it was concluded, according as the letter of 
the Diabolonians had suggested, that none was 
more fit for that expedition, than an army of terrible 
Doubters. They therefore concluded to serid 
against Mansoul an army of sturdy Doubters. 
The number thought fit to be employed in that ser* 
vice, was between twenty and thirty thousand. So 
then the result of that great counsel of those high 
and mighty lords was, that Diabolus should even 
now out of hand beat up his drum for men in the 
land of Doubting, which land lieth upon the con- 
fines of the place called Hell- gate-diII,, for men 



Y WAR. 267 



Correspondence between Satan and our lusts. 



that might be employed by bim against the miserable 
town of Mansoul. It was also concluded, that 
these lords themselves should help him in the war, 
and that they would to that end, head and manage 
his men. So they drew up a letter,, and sent it back 
to the Diabolqxians that lurked in Mansoul, 
and that waited for the coming back of Mr. Pro- 
fane, to signify to them into what method they 
had put their design. The contents whereof fol- 
low. 

'From the dark and horrible dungeon of lull, 

* Diaeolus, with all the society of the 
' 'princes of darkness, send to our trusty ones 

* in and about the walls of the town of Man- 
€ soul, nozv impatiently waiting for our most 
' devilish answer to their venomous and most 
' poisonous design against the town o/Man- 

s SOUL. 

'Our native ones., in whom from day to day we 

* boast, and in whose actions all the year long we 

* greatly delight ourselves, We received your wel- 
' come, because highly esteemed letter, at the hand 
' of our trusty and greatly beloved, the old gentle- 
' man, Mr. Profane ; and do give you to under- 

* stand, that when we had broken it up, and had 

* read the contents (to your amazing memory be it 
' spoken,) our yawning hollow-bellied place where 

* we are, made so hideous and yelling a noise for 
joy, that the mountains that stan$ -round about 



26S HOLY WAR. 



Ouv sins are Satan's faithful servants. 



* HELL-GATE-hili had like to have been shaken to 
'pieces at the sound thereof. 

c We could also do no less than admire your 
' faithfulness to us, with the greatness of that sub 
e tility that now hath shewed itself to be in your 
c heads to serve us against the town of Mansoul. 

* For you have invented for us so excellent a me- 

* thod for our proceeding against that rebellious 
' people, that a more effectual cannot be thought of 
c by all the wits of hell. The proposals therefore 
e which now at last you have sent us, since we saw 
' them, we have done little else, but highly approv- 
( ed and admired them. 

' Nay, we shall, to encourage you in the profun- 

* dity of your craft, let you know, that at a full as- 
' sembly and conclave of our princes and princi- 
e palities of this place, your project was discoursed 
' and tossed from one side of the cave to the other 
' by their mightinesses ; but a better, and, as waa 
' by themselves judged, a more fit and proper way, 
' by all their wits could not be invented, to surprise, 
'■ take, and make our own, the rebellious town of 
' Mansoul. 

' Wherefore, in fine, all that was said that va- 
"* ried from what you had in your letter propounded, 
' fell of itself to the ground, and yours only was 
' stuck to by Diabolus the prince ; yea, his gaping 
' gorge, and yawning paunch was on fire to put your 
f invention into execution. 

' We therefore give you to understand, that 
*■ our stout, furious, and unmerciful Diabolus is 



HOLY WAR. 269 



Sin brings forth death 



f raising- for your relief and the ruin of the rebellion 
' town of Man soul, more than twenty thousand 
' Doubters to come against that people. They 
' are all stout and sturdy men, that of old have been 
' accustomed to war ; I say, he is doing this work 

* of his with all possible speed he can, for with his 
' heart and spirit he is engaged in it. We desire, 

* therefore, that as you have hitherto stuck to us, 

* and given us both advice and encouragement, you 
f still will prosecute our design, nor shall you lose, 
f but be gainers thereby ; yea, we intend to make 
f you the lords of Mansoul. 

* One thing may not by any means be omitted, 
c that is, those with us desire, that every one of you 
' that are at Mansoul would still use all your 

* power, cunning, and skill, with delusive persua- 

* sions, yet to draw the town of Mansoul into more 
f sin and wickedness, even that sin may be finished, 
f and bring forth death. 

f For thus it is concluded with us, that the more 
' vile, sinful, and debauched the town of Mansoul 
' is, the more backward will their Emanuel be to 
' come to their help, either by presence, or other 

* relief; yea, the more sinful, the more weak, and 
' so the more unable will they be to make resistance 

* when we shall make our assault upon them to 
' swallow them up. Yea, they may cause that their 
' mighty Shaddai himself may cast him out of his 
' protection ; yea, and send for his captains and 
' soldiers borne, with his slings and rams, and leave 
' ^hem naked and bare., and then the town of Man- 



270 HOLY WAR. 



Constant danger of Satan's attack. 



e soul will of itself open to us, and fall as a fig into 
the mouth of the eater. Yea, to be sure that we 
then with a great deal of ease shall come upon her 
and overcome her. 

' As to the time of our coming upon Mansoul, 
we as yet have not fully resolved upon that, 
though at present some of us think, as you, that a 
market-day, or a ( market-day at night, will cer- 
tainly be the best. However, do you be ready* 
and when you shall hear our roaring drum with- 
out, do you be as busy to make the most horrible 
confusion within;* so shall Mansoul certainly 
be distressed before and behind, and shall not 
know which way to betake herself for help. My 
lord Lucifer, my lord Beelzebub, my lord 
Apollyon, my lord Legion, with the rest, salute 
you, as does also my lord Diabolus; and we 
wish both you, with all that you do or shall pos- 
sess, the very self-same fruit and success for 
your doing, as we ourselves at present enjoy for 
ours. 

' From our dreadful confines in the most fear ~ 
* ful pit, we salute you, and so do those many 
c legions here with us, wishing you may be 
( as hellishly prosperous as we desire to be 
'ourselves. By the letter-carrier, Mr Pro- 

'. FANE.' 



* Be sober, be vigilant ; because your adversary the devil, as 
a roaring lion, walketh about seeking whom he may devour. A 
Peter v. 8. ' 



HOLY WAR. 271 



The cics:raction of man the joy of devils. 



Then Mr. Profane addressed himself for his 
return to Mansoul, with his errand from the hor- 
rible pit to the Diabolonians that dwelt in that 
town. So he came up the stairs from the deep to 
the mouth of the cave where Cerberus was. Now 
when Cerberus saw him, he asked how matters 
went below, about, and against the town of Man- 
sou l. 

Pro. Things go as well as we can expect. The 
letter that I carried thither was highly approved, 
and well liked by all my lords, and I am returning 
to tell our Diabolonians so. I have an answer 
to it here in my bosom, that I am sure will make 
our masters that sent me glad ; for the contents 
thereof are to encourage them to pursue their de- 
sign to the utmost, and to be ready also to fall on 
within, when they shall see my lord Diabolus be- 
leaguering of the town of Mansoul. 

Cer. But does he intend to go against them 
himself ? 

Pro. Does he ! Ay, and he will take along 
with him more than twenty thousand, all sturdy 
DooBTEus, and men of war, picked men from 
the land of Doubting, to serve him in the expe- 
dition. 

Then was Cerberus glad, and said, And are 
there such brave preparations a making to go against 
the miserable town of -Mansoul ? And would I 
might be put at the head of a thousand of them, 
that I might also shew my valour against the fa- 
mous town of Mansoul. 



HOLY WAR. 



Devils delight iu mischici 



Pro. Your wish may come to pass, you look like 
one that has mettle enough, and my lord will have 
with him those that are valiant and stout. But my 
business requires haste. 

Cer. Ay, so it does. Speed thee to the town of 
Mansoul, with all the deepest mischiefs that this 
place can afford thee. And when thou shalt come 
to the house of Mr. Mischief, the place where 
the Diabolonians meet to plot, tell them that 
Cerberus doth wish them his service, and that if 
he may, he will with the army come up against the 
famous town of Mansoul. 

Pro. That I will. And I know that my lords 
that are there will be glad to hear it, and to see you 
also. 

So after a few more such kind of compliments, 
Mr. Profane took leave of his friend Cerberus ; 
and Cerberus again, with a thousand of their pit 
wishes, bid him haste with all speed to his mas- 
ters. The which when he had heard, he made 
obeisance, and began to gather up his heels to 
run. 

Thus therefore he returned, and came to Man- 
soul, and going as afore to the house of Mr. Mis- 
chief, there he found the Diabolonians as- 
sembled, and waiting for his return. Now when he 
was come, and had presented himself, he delivered 
his letter, and adjoined his compliment to them 
therewith : My lords, from the confines of the pit, 
the high and mighty powers of the den salute you 
here, the true Diabolonians of the town of Man- 



HOLY WAU. 273 



Reformation should attend prayer. 



soul ; wishing you always the most proper of their 
benediction, for the great service, high attempts, 
and brave achievements, that you have put your- 
selves upon, for the restoring to our prince Diabo- 
lus the famous town of Mansoul. 

This was therefore the present state of She mise- 
rable town of Mansoul. She had offended her 
Prince, and he was gone ; she had encouraged the 
powers of hell by her foolishness, to come against 
her to seek her utter destruction. 

True the town of Mansoul was somewhat made 
sensible of her sin, but the Diabolonians were 
gotten into her bowels ; she cried, but Emanuel 
was gone, and her cries did not fetch him as yet 
again. Besides she knew not whether ever or ne- 
ver he would return, and come to his Mansoul 
again ; nor did they know the power and industry 
of the enemy, nor how forward they were to put in 
execution that plot of hell that they had devised 
against her. 

They did indeed still send petition after petition 
to the Prince, but he answered all with silence. 
They did neglect reformation and that was as Bia- 
bolus would have it ; for he knew if they regarded 
iniquity in their heart, their King would not re-* 
gard their prayer ; they therefore grew weaker and 
weaker, and were as a rolling thing before the 
whirlwind. They cried to their King for help, 
and laid Diabolonians in their bosoms ; what 
therefore should a King do with them ? Yea, 
there seemed bow to be a mixture in Mansoul, the 
% m 



HOLY WAR. 

iins begin to be cherished. 



Biabolonians and Mansoulians would walk the 
streets together. Yea, they began to seek their 
peace, for they thought, that since the sickness had 
been so mortal in Mansoul, it was in vain to go 
to handy-gripes with them. Besides, the weakness 
of Mansoul' was the strength of their enemies; 
and the sins of Mansoul the advantage of the 
Biabolonians. The foes of Mansoul also now 
began to promise themselves the town for a pos- 
session ; there was no great difference now betwixt 
the Mansoulians and Biabolonians ; both 
seemed to be masters of Mansoul. Yea, the Bi- 
abolonians increased and grew, but the town of 
Mansoul diminished greatly. There were mor« 
than eleven thousand men, women, and children^ 
that died by the sickness of Mansoul. 

But now, as Shaddai would have it, there* wa» 
one whose name was Mr. Prywel, a great lover of 
the town of Mansoul. . And he, as his manner 
was, went listening up and down in Mansoul, to 
see and to hear if at any time he might, whether 
there was any design against it, or no., For he wai 
always a jealous man, and feared some mischief 
some time would befal it, either from the Biabolo- 
nians within, or from some power without. Now 
upon a time it so happened, as Mr. Phywel went 
listening here and there, that he lighted upon a 
place called Vile-hill in Mansoul, where Biabo- 
lonians used to meet; so hearing a muttering 
(you must know that it was in the night) he softly 
drew near to hear ; nor had h® stood long under the 



HOLY WAR. 275 



Conscience raises an alarm. 



end, for there stood a house there, but lie 
>ne confidently affirm, that it was not, or 
>t be long, before Diabolus should possess 
? Mansoul, and that then the Diabolo- 
mtend to put all Mansouli ans to the 
s vould kill and destroy the King's cap- 

iat rive al! his soldiers out of the town. 

1. ^ said moreover. That he knew there were 
above twenty thousand fighting men prepared by 
Diabolus for tht» accom pishing of this design, and 
it would not be many months before thej all should 
see it. When Mr. Prv wel l m d heard this story, 
he quickly believed it was ct rue ; wherefore he went 
forthwith to my lord-mayor's hou, S e, and acquainted 
him therewith, who sending for the suborbinate 
preacher, brake the business to him, aiiurj he as soon 
gave the alarm to the town ; for he was now the 
chief preacher in Mansoul, because as yet Amy lord 
Secretary was ill at ease. And this was the Wary the 
subordinate preacher took to alarm the town there- 
with. The same hour he caused the lecture-bcli fc 
be rung, and the people came together ; he then 
gave them a short exhortation to watchfulness, and 
made Mr. Prywel's news the argument thereof. 
For, said he, an horrible plot is contrived against 
Mansoul, even to massacre us all in a day ; nor 
is this story to be slighted, for Mr. Prywell is the 
author thereof. Mr. Prywell was always a lover 
of Mansoul, a sober and judicious man that is no 
tattler, nor raiser of false reports, but one that loves 



HOLY WAR. 



When God is angered destruction is to be feared. 



to look into the very bottom of matters, an 
nothing of news but by very solid argument 
I will call him, and you shall hear ! 
your own selves; so he called him, ar 
and told his tale so punctually, and s 

truth with such ample grounds, that 3 JL 

fell presently under a conviction of the ** v ' °* 
what he said. The preacher also b9 x ^ e " him, 
saying, Sirs, it is not irrational for us *° believe it, 
for we have provoked Shaddai to anger, and have 
sinned Emanuel out of the *-°wn ; we have had 
too much correspondence w» itn Diabolonians, and 
Isave forgotten our tender- mercies ; no marvel, then 
if the enemy both wi* !ilul an< l without should design 
and plot our ruin > an d what time like this to do it ? 
The sickness ; * s now m * ne town, and we have been 
made weak thereby. Many a good-meaning man is 
dead, and the Diabolonians of late grow stronger 
and «tr yi onger. 

Besides, quoth the subordinate preacher, what I 
hp- ve received from this good truth-teller is one ink- 
"sing further, that he understood by those that he 
overheard, that several letters have passed between 
the furies of the pit and the Diabolonians, in or- 
der to our destruction. When Mansoul heard all 
this, and not being ableto gainsay it, they lift up their 
voice and wept. Mr. Prywell also, in the presence 
pf the townsmen, confirmed all that their subordinate 
preacher had said. Wherefore they now set afresh 
to bewail their folly, and to a doubling of petitions 



HOLY WAR. 277 



Holy resolutions. 



to Shaddai, and his Son. They also brake the 
business to the captains, high commanders, and men 
of war in the town of Mansoul, intreating of them 
to use the means to be strong, and to take good 
courage, and that they would look after their har- 
ness and make themselves ready to give Diabolus 
battle by night or by day, should he come, as they 
are informed he will, to beleaguer the town of 
Mansoul. 

When the captains neard of this, they being al- 
ways true lovers of the town of Mansoul, what do 
they, but like so many Samsons, they shake them- 
selves, and come together to consult and to contrive 
how to defeat those bold and hellish contrivances, 
that were upon the wheel, by the means of Di- 
abolus, and his friend, against the now sickly, 
weakly, and much impoverished town of Man- 
soul; and they agreed upon these following parti- 
culars. 

1. That the gates of Mansoul should be kept 
shut, and made fast with bars and locks, and that all 
persons that went out or came in should be very 
strictly examined by the captains of the guards,* 
to the end, said they, that those thai are managers of 
the plot amongst us may, either coming or going, 
be taken ; and that we may also find out who are 
the great contrivers, amongst us, of our ruin.f 

* Watch ye, stand fast in the faith, quit you like men, be 
strong. 1 Cor. xvi. 13. 

f Let us search and try our ways, and turn again unto the 
Lord. Lam. iii. 40. 



S7S HOLY WAR. 



A solemn fast. 



2. The next thing was, that a strict search should 
be made for all kind of Diabolonians, throughout 
the whole town of Maksoul ; and that every man's 
house from top to bottom, should be looked into, 
and that too house by house, and that if possible a 
farther discovery might be made of all such among 
them as had a hand in these designs.* 

3. It was further concluded upon, that whereso- 
ever or with whomsoever any of these Diabolo- 
nj'ans were found, that even those of the town of 
Mansoul, that had given them house and harbour, 
should, to their shame and the warning of others, 
do penance in the open place. f 

4. It Mas moreover resolved by the famous town 
of Mansoul, that a public fest, and a day of humi- 
liation, should be kept throughout the whole cor- 
poration, to the justifying of their Prince, the 
abasing of themselves before him for their trans- 
gressions against him, and aga.ir.st Shaddai his 
Father. J It was further resolved, that all such in 
Mansoul as did not on that day endeavour to keep 
that fast, and to humble themselves for their faults, 
but should mind their worldly employments, or be 

* Looking diligently, lest any man fail of the grace of God : 
iest any root of bitterness springing up trouble you, and thereby 
many be defiled ; lest there be any fornicator, or profane person, 
as Esau, who for one morsel of meat sold his birth-right. Ileb. 
zii. 15, 16". 

f For among my people are found wicked men : they lay waitas 
he that setteth snares ; they set a trap, they catch men. Jer. v. 26. 

+ Sanctify ye a fast, call a solemn assembly, gather the elders, 
and all the inhabitants of the land, into the house of the Lord 
your God, aud cry unto the L©rd. Joel i. 14. 



HOLY WAR. ?79 



Reformation began. 



found wandering up or down the streets, should be 
taken for Diaeoloniaxs, and surfer as Diabolq- 
niaxs for such wicked doings. 

5. It was further concluded then,, that with what 
speed, and with what warmth of mind they could, 
they would renew their humiliation for sin, and their 
petitions to Shaddai for help ; they also re- 
solved to send tidings to the court, of all that Mr. 
Prywel had told them. 

6. It was also determined, that thanks should be 
given by the town of Man soul to Mr. Prywel, for 
his diligent seeking of the welfare of their town ; 
and further,, that forasmuch as he was so naturally 
inclined to seek their good, and also to undermine 
their foes, they gave him a commission of Scout- 
master-general, for the good of the town of Man- 
soul. 

When the corporation, with their captains, had 
thus concluded, they did as they had said, they shut 
up their gates, they made for Diabolonians strict 
search, they made those with whom any were found, 
to do penance in the open place. They kept their 
fast, and renewed their petitions to their Prince, 
and Mr. Prywel managed his charge, and the 
trust that Mansoul had put into his hands, with 
great conscience, and good fidelity ; for he gave 
himself wholly up to his employ, and that not only 
within the town, but he went out to pry, to see, and 
to hear. 

Not many days afUr, be provided for his journey., 



^80 HOLY WAR. 



Danger foreseen. 



and went towards Hell-gate-IuII, into the coun- 
try where Doubters were, where he heard of all 
that had been talked of in Mansoul, and h« per- 
ceived also that Diabolus was almost ready for hi3 
march, &c. So he came back with speed, and calling 
the captains and elders of Mansoul together, he 
told them where he had been^ what he had heard, 
and what he had seen. Particularly he told 
them, that Diabolus was almost ready for his 
inarch, and that he had made old Mr. Incre- 
dulity, that once brake prison in Mansoul, 
the general of his army ; that his army consisted 
of all Doubters, and that their number was 
above twenty thousand. He told moreover, that 
Diabolus intended to bring with him the chief 
princes of the Infernal Pit, and that he would make 
them chief captains over his Doubters. He told 
them moreover, that it was certainly true, that se- 
veral of the black den would, with Diabolus., ride 
reformades, to reduce the town of Mansoul to the 
obedience of Diabolus their prince. 

He said moreover, that he understood by the 
Doubters, among whom he had been, that the 
reason why old Incredulity was made general of 
the whole army, was, because none truer than he to 
the tyrant ; and because he had an implacable spite 
against the town of Mansoul. Besides, said he, 
he remembers the affront that Mansoul has given 
him, and he is resolved to be revenged of them. 

But the black princes shall be made high com- 



IIOIfY WAR. 



Sin detected and puiiished. 



manders ; only Incredulity shall be over them 
all, because he can more easily and dexterously be- 
leaguer the town of Mansoul, than any of the 
princes besides. 

Now when the captains of Mansoul, with the 
elders of the town, had heard the tidings that Mr. 
Prywel brought, they thought it expedient,without 
further delay, to put into execution the laws against 
the Diaboloxians, which their Prince had made 
and given them in commandment to manage against 
them. Wherefore forthwith a diligent and impar- 
tial search was made in all houses in Mansoul, for 
all and all manner of Dtabolonians. Now in the 
house of Mr. Mind, and in the house of the great 
lord Wtll-be-will, were two Diabolonians 
found. In Mr. Mind's house was one lord Co- 
vetousness found ; but he had changed his nam* 
to Prudent-thrifty. In my lord Will-be- 
-will's house, one Lascjviousness was found; 
but he had changed his name to Harmless-mirth. 
These two the captains and elders of the town of 
Mansoul took and committed to custody, under the 
hand of Mr. Trueman, the gaoler ; and this man 
handled them so severely, and loaded them so well 
with irons, that they both fell into a deep consump- 
tion, and died in the prison ; their masters also, ac- 
cording to the agreement of the captains and elders, 
were brought, to do penance in the open place, to 
their shame, and a warning to the rest of the town of 
Mansoul. 

2 n 



2S2 HOLY WAR. 



The nature of repentance. 



Now this was the manner of penance in those 
days. The persons offending, being made sensible 
of the evil of their doings, were enjoined open con- 
fession of their faults, and. a strict amendment of 
their lives. 

After this, the captains and elders of Mansoul 
sought yet to find out more Diabolonians, where» 
ever they lurked, whether in dens, ca\es, holes, 
vaults, or where else they could, in or about the 
wall or town of Mansoul. But though they could 
plainly see their footing, and so follow them by their 
track and smell to their holds, even to the mouths 
of their caves and dens, yet take and do justice upon 
them they could not, their ways were so crooked, 
their holds so strong, and they so quick to take 
sanctuary there. 

But Mansoul ruled now with so stiff an hand 
over the Diabolonians that were left, that they 
were glad to shrink into corners ; time was when 
they durst walk openly and in the day, but now they 
were forced to embrace privacy and the night : time 
was when a Mansoulian was their companion, 
but now they called them deadly enemies. This 
change did Mr. Prvwel's intelligence make in the 
town of Mansoul. 

By this time Djaeolus had finished his army 
which he intended to bring with him for the ruin of 
Mansoul ; and had set over them captains, and 
other field officers, such as liked bis furious stomach 
best ; himself was lord paramount. Incredulity. 



HOLY WAR. &,$ 



The officers sent against Mansotji 



was general of his army. Their highest captains 
shall be named afterwards; but now for their of- 
ficers, colours, and scutcheons. 

1. Their first captain was captain Rage, he was 
captain over the Election-Doubters, his were 
the red colours ; his standard-bearer was Mr. De- 
structive, and the Great Red Dragon he bad for 
his scutcheon.* 

2. The second captain was captain Fury, he 
was 'captain over the Vocation-Doubters ; his 
standard-bearer was Mr. Darkness, his colours 
were those that were pale, and he had for his scut- 
cheon the Fiery Flying Serpent. f 

3. The third captain was captain Damnation, 
he was captain over the Grace-Doubters, his 
were the red colours ; Mr. No-life bare them,, 
and he had for his scutcheon the black den. J 



* And there appeared another wonder in heaven, and behold, 
a great red dragon, having seven heads, and ten horns, and seven 
crowns upon his heads. And his tail drew the third part of the 
stars of heaven, and did cast them to the earth : and the dragon 
stood before the woman which Avas ready to be delivered, for to 
devour her child as soon as it was born. And when the dragon 
Baw that he was cast unto the earth, he persecuted the woman 
which brought forth the man-child. And the dragon was wrath 
with the woman, and went to make war with the remnant of her 
seed, which kept the commandment of God, and have the testi- 
mony of Jesus Christ. Rev. xii. 3, 4, 13, \J. 

f And the Lord sent fiery serpents among the people : and they 
bit the people, and much people of Israel died. Numb. xxi. 6. 

I And the fifth angel sounded, and I saw a star fall from heaven 
upon the earth ; and to bim was given the key of the bottomless 
pit. Rev, ix. 1. 



284 . HOLY WAR. 



Doubts are Satan's captains. 



4. The fourth captain was captain Insatiable, 
he was captain over the Faith-Doubters, his were 
the red colours ; Mr. Deyourer bare them, and 
he had for his scutcheon the Yawning Jaws.* 

5. The fifth captain was captain Brimstone, 
he was captain over the Perseverance-Doubters, 
his also were the red colours ; Mr. Burning bare 
them, and his scutcheon was the Blue and Stinking 
Flame. f 

6. The sixth captain was captain Torment, he 
was captain over the Resurrection-Doubters, 
his colours were those that were pale, Mr. Gnaw 
was his standard-bearer, and he had the Black 
Worm for his scutcheon. J 

7. The seventh captain was captain No-ease, he 
was captain over the Salvation-Doubters, his 
were the red colours, Mr. Restless bare them, 
and his scutcheon was the Ghastlv Picture of 
Death. % 

¥ Hell and destruction are never full : so the eyes of man are 
never satisfied. Prov. xxvii. 20. 

■f- Upon the wicked he shall rain snares, fire and brimstone, and 
an horrible tempest : this shall be the portion of their cup. Psal. 
ix. &\ And the smoke of their torment ascendeth up for ever and 
ever : and they have no rest day nor night, who worship the beast 
and his image, and whosoever receiveth the mark of his name, 
Rev. xiv. 11 

X Where their worm dieth not, and the fare is not quenched^ 
Mark ix. 44. 

fl And I looked, and behold a pale horse ; and his name that 
sat on him was Death, and hell followed with him : and power 
was given unto them over the fourth part of the earth, to kill 
with sword, and with hunger, and with death, and tvith the beasts 
of the earth. Rev. vi. 8. 



HOLY WAR. 2S5 



The nature of ihe army going to attack the soul. 
*■-■■■ — - t , ■■ -X 

8. The eighth captain was captain Sepulchre, 
he "was captain over the Glory-Doubters, his also 
were the pale colours ; Mr. Corruption was his 
standard-bearer, and he had for his scutcheon a 
Scull, and Dead Men's Bones.* 

9. The ninth captain was captain Past-hope, hs 
was captain of those that are called the Felicity- 
Doubters, his standard-bearer was Mr. Despair ; 
his also were the red colours, and his scutcheon was 
the Hot Iron and the Hard Heart. f 

These were his captains, and these were their 
forces, these were the standards, these were their 
colours, and these were their scutcheons. Now 
over these did the great Diabolus make superior 
captains, and they were in number, seven ; as name- 
ly, the lord Beelzebub, the lord Lucifer, the lord 
Legion, and lord Apollyon, the lord Python, the 
lord Cerberus, and the lord Belial ; these seven 
he set over the captains, and Incredulity was 
lord general, and Diabolus was king. 

The reformades also, such as were like them- 
selves, were made some of them captains of hun- 
dreds, and some of them captains of more. .And 
thus was the army of Incredulity completed. 

So they set out at HELL-GATE-hill (for there they 



* Their quiver is a* an open sepulchre, they are all mighty men. 
Jer. v. 16. 

t Bat after thy hardness and impenitent heart, treasures^ up 
unto thyself v/rath against the day of wrath, and revelation of 
the righteous judgment of God. Rom. ii. $. 



98* ' HOLY WAR. 



Satan attacks the soul. 



had their rendezvous) from whence they came with 
a straight course upon their march towards the town 
of Mansoul. Now, it was hinted before,, the town 
had., as Shaddai would have it, received from the 
mouth of Mr. Prywel the alarm of their coming 
before. Wherefore they set a strong watch at the 
gates, and had also doubled their guards ,* they also 
mounted their slings in good places, where they 
might conveniently cast out their great stones to the 
annoyance of the enemy. 

l Nor could those Biabolonians that were in the 
town do that hurt as was designed they should ; for 
SVIansoul was now awake. But alas, poor people, 
they were sorely affrighted at the first appearance of 
their foes, and at their sitting down before the town, 
especially when they heard the roaring of their 
drum.* This, to speak truth, was amazingly hideous 
to hear, it frightened all men seven miles round. 
The streaming of their colours was also terrible and 
dejecting to behold. 

When Diabolus was come up against the town, 
first he made his approach against Ear-gate ; and 
gave it a furious assault, supposing, as it seems, that 
his friends in Mansoul had been ready to do the 
work within : but care was taken of that before, by 
the vigilance of the captains. Wherefore missing 
of the help that he expected from them, and finding 



* Be sober, be vigilant ; because your adversary the devil, as 
a roaring lion 3 walketh about, seeking whom he may devour. 1 
Pet. v. 8. 



HOLY WAR. 287 



Is Bravely repulsed 



his army warmly attacked with the stones from the 
slingers (for that I will say for the captains, that, 
considering the weakness that yet was upon them by 
reason of the long sickness that had annoyed the 
town of Mansoul, they behaved themselves gal- 
lantly, ) he was forced to make some retreat from 
Mansoul, and intrench himself and his .men in the 
field, without the reach of the slings of the town. 

Now having intrenched himself, he cast up four 
mounts against the town ; the first he called mount 
Diabolus, putting his own name thereon, the more 
to affright the town of Mansoul : the other three 
he called thus, mount Alecto, mount Megara, 
and mount Tisiphone, for these are the names of 
the dreadful furies of hell. Thus he began to play 
his game with Mansoul, and to serve it as the 
lion his prey, even to make it fall before his terror. 
But, as I said, the captains and soldiers resisted so 
stoutly, and did so much execution, that they made 
him, though against stomach, to retreat : wherefore 
Mansoul began to take courage. 

Now upon mount Diabolus, which was raise*! 
upon the north side of the town, there did the tyrant 
set up his standard, and a fearful thing it was to 
behold, for he had wrought in it, by devilish art, 
after the manner of his scutcheon, a flaming fire, 
fearful to behold, and the picture of Mansoul 
burning in it. 

When Diabolus had thus done, he commanded 
that his drummer should every night approach the 
walls of the town of Mansoul, and beat a parley ; 



9SB HOLY WAR. 



We must not parley witb our foe= 



the command was to do it at night, as in the da\- 
time they annoyed him with their slings : for the ty- 
rant said, that he had a mind to parley with the now 
trembling town of Mansoul, and he commanded 
that the drum should beat every night, that through 
weariness they might at last if possible ( at the first 
they are unwilling, yet) be forced to do it. 

So the drummer did as commanded ; he arose 
and did beat his drum. But when his drum did go, 
if any looked towards the town of Mansoul, be- 
hold darkness and sorrow, and the light was dark- 
ened in the heaven thereof.* No noise was ever 
heard upon earth more terrible, except the voice of 
Shaddai, when he speaketh. But how did Man- 
soul tremble ! it now looked for nothing but being 
swallowed up. 

When this drummer had beaten a parley, he made 
this speech to Mansoul ; e My master has bid me 
4 tell you, that if you will willingly submit, you shall 
* have the good of the earth ; but if you shall be 
e stubborn, he is resolved to take you by force.* 
But by that the fugitive had done beating his drum., 
the people of Mansoul had betaken themselves to 
the captains that were in the castle, so that there 
was none to regard, nor to give this drummer an 
answer ; so he proceeded no further that night, but 
returned again to his master to the camp. 



* And in that clay they shall roar against them, like the roaring 
of the sea ; and if one look unto the land, behold darkness and sor- 
row ; and the light is darkened in the heavens thereof. Isa. t. 30. 



HOLY WAR. 2S9 



A summons to Mansoul. 



When Diabolus saw that by drumming, he 
could not work out Mansoul to his will, the next 
night he sendeth his drummer without his drum, 
still to let the townsmen know that he had a mind 
to parley with them. But when all came to all, 
his parley was turned into a summons to the town, 
to deliver up themselves : but they gave him neither 
heed nor hearing, for they remembered what it 
first cost them to hear him a few words. 

The next night he sends again, and then who 
should be his messenger to Mansoul, but the ter- 
rible captain Sepulchre ; so captain Sepulchre 
came up to the walls of Mansoul, and made this 
oration to the town : 

' O ye inhabitants of the rebellious town of Man- 
' soul ! I summon you in the name of the prince 

■ Diabolus, that without any more ado you set 
' open the gates of your town, and admit your lord 
' to come in. But if you shall still rebel, when we 
' have taken the town by force, we will swallow 
' you up as the grave ; wherefore if you will heark- 
' en to my summons, say so ; and if not, then let 
' me know. 

' The reason of this my summons,' quoth he, 'is 
f for that my lord is your undoubted prince and 
' lord, as you yourselves have formerly owned. Nor 

■ shall that assault that was given to my lord, when 
' Emanuel dealt so dishonourably by him, prevail 
1 with him to lose his right, and to forbear to at- 
' tempt to recover his own. Consider then, O 
< Mansoul, with thyself, wilt thou shew thyself 

o o 



S90 HOLY WAR. 

- ■■■ ' ■ - ■ ' ••■ i- .- - . ■ - ' i i ,5£fcr 

Application for advice. 

f peaceable, or not ? If thou wilt quietly yield up 
s thyself, then our old friendship shall *je renewed ; 
' but if thou wilt yet refuse and rebel, then expect 
* nothing but fire and sword/ 

When the languishing town of MaNsoul had 
heard this summoned and his summons, they were 
yet more put to their dumps, but made the cap- 
tain no answer at all ; so away he went as he 
came. 

After some consultation among themselves, as 
also with some of their captains, they applied them- 
selves afresh to the Lord Secretary for counsel and 
advice from him ■ for this Lord Secretary was their 
chief preacher, a* mentioned before, only now he 
was ill at ease; and of him they begged favour in 
these two or three things. 

1. That he would look comfortably upon them, 
and not keep himself so much retired from them as 
formerly. Also that he would be prevailed with to 
give them a hearing while they should make known 
their miserable condition to him. But to this he 
told them as before, That as yet he was but ill at 
ease, and therefore could not do as he had former- 
ly done. 

2. The second thing the}' desired, was, that he 
would be pleased to give them his advice about 
their now so important affairs, for that Biaeolus 
was come and set before the town with no less than 
twenty thousand Doubters. They said moreover 
that both he and his captains were cruel men, and 
that they were afraid of them. But to this he said, 



TlrtLY WAR- 291 



Enrourasempnt in distress. 



You must look to the law of the Prince, and there 
see what is laid upon you to do. 

3. Then they desired that his Highness would 
help them to frame a petition to Shaddai, and 
unto Emanuel his Son, and that he would set his 
hand thereto, as a token that he was one with theru 
in it : for, said they, my Lord, many a one have we 
sent, but can get no answer of peace, but now sure- 
ly one with thy hand to it, may obtain good for 
Mansoul. 

But all the answer he gave to this, was, That 
they had offended Emanuel, and had also grieved 
himself, and that therefore they must as yet partake 
of their own devices. 

This answer of the Lord Secretary fell like a mill- 
stone upon them : yea it crushed them so, that they 
could not tell what to do, yea, they durst not com- 
ply with the demands of Diabolus, nor with the 
demands of his captains. So then here were the 
straits that the town of Mansoul was in when the 
enemy came upon her : her foes were ready to 
gwallow her up, and her friends forbore to help 
her. 

Then stood up my lord-mayor, whose name was 
my lord Understandino, and he began to pick 
a-nd pick, until he had picked comfort out of that 
seemingly biUer saying of the Lord Secretary ; for 
thus he descanted upon it : First, said he, This un- 
avoidably follows upon the sayingof my Lord, That 
we must yet suffer for our sins. 2. But, quoth he, 
$hfl word c yet' sounds as if at last we should be 



m HOLY WAR. 



Satan opposed. 



saved from our enemies, and that, after a few more 
sorrow^ Emanuel will come and be our help. 
Now the lord-mayor was the more critical in his 
dealing wiili the Secretary's words, because my 
Lord was more than a p'ophet, and because none 
of his words were such, but that at all times they 
were most exactly significant, and the townsmen 
were allowed to pry into them, and to expound 
them to their best advantage. 

So they took their leaves of my Lord, and re- 
turned to the captains, to whom they told what 
my Lord Secretary had said, who, when they had 
heard it, were all of the same opinion as was my 
lord-mayor himself ; the captains therefore began 
to take courage, and prepare to make some brave 
attempt upon the camp of the enemy, and to de- 
stroy all that were Diabolonians, with the roving 
Doubters that the tyrant had brought with him to 
ruin the poor town of Mansoul. 

So nil betook themselves forthwith to their places, 
the captains to theirs, the lord-mayor to his, the sub- 
ordinate preacher to his, and mylord Will-be-will 
to his. The captains longed to be at some work for 
their Prince, for they delighted in warlike atchiev- 
ments. The next day therefore they came together 
and consulted; and after consultation had ihey re 
solved to give an answer to the captain of Diabolus 
with slings ; andsotheydidattherisingofthesunon 
the morrow ; for Diabolus had adventured to come 
nearer again, but the sling stones were to him and his 
like hornets. For as there is nothin/r to the town of 



HOLY WAR. 293 



Satan deceives by flattery. 



Mansoul so terrible as the roaring of Diabolus' 
drum, so there is nothing to Diabolus so terrible as 
the well playing of Emanuel's slings. Wherefore 
Diabolus was forced to make nnother retreat, yet 
further off from the famous town of Mansoul. 
Then did the lord-mayor of Mansoul cause the 
bells to be rung, and that thanks should be sent to 
the Lord High Secretary by the mouth of the sub- 
ordinate preacher ; for that by his words the cap- 
tains and elders of Mansoul had been strengthened 
against Diabolus. 

When Diabolus saw that his captains and sol- 
diers, high lords, and renowned, were frightened 
and beaten down by the stones that came from the 
golden slings of the Prince of the town of Man- 
soul, he bethought himself, and said, I will try to 
catch them by fawning, I will try to flatter them 
into my net. 

Wherefore after a while he came down again to 
the wall, not now with his drum nor with captain 
Sepulchre, but having all so besugared his lips, 
he seemed to be a very sweet-mouthed, peaceable 
prince, designing nothing for honour-sake, nor to 
be revenged on Mansoul for injuries by them 
done to him ; but the welfare, and good, and ad- 
vantage of the town and people therein, was now, 
as he said, hi 9 only design, Wherefore, after he 
had called for audience, and desired that the towns- 
folk would give it to him, he proceeded in his ora- 
tion : and said, 

' Oh ! the desire of my heart, the famous town 



20 i HOLY WAR. 



False promises of peace 



* of MansouLj how many nights have I watched, 
' and how many weary steps have I taken, if per- 
f haps I might do thee good ! Far he it, far be it 
' from me to desire to make war upon you ; if ye 
< will but willingly and quickly deliver up your- 
c selves unto me. You know that you were mine 
e of old. Remember also that so long. as you en- 
' joyed me for your lord, and that I enjoyed you 
' for my subjects, you wanted for nothing, of all the 
' delights of the earth, that I your lord and prince 
' could get for you ; or that I cculd invent to make 
e you bonny and blithe withal. Consider, you 
'*'■ never had so many hard, dark, troublesome, and 
1 heart-afflicting hours,, while you were mine, as you 
' have had since you revolted from me, nor shall you 
!? ever have peace again until you and I become one 
' as before. Be but prevailed with to embrace me 
' again, and I will grant, yea, enlarge your old 
' charter with abundance of privileges, so that your 
' license and liberty shall be to take, hold, enjoy 
' and make your own, all that is pleasant from east 
' to west.* Nor shall any of those incivilities 
e wherewith you have offended me, be ever charged 

* upon you by me, so long as the sun and moon en- 
' dure. Nor shall any of those dear friends of 
' mine, that now, for the fear of you, lie lurking- in 
1 dens, and holes, and caves, in Mansoul, be 



* Again the tlcyil taketh him up into an exceeding high tnoun^, 
tain, and sheweth him all the kingdoms of the world and the gi'o,, 
ry.of them. Mat. iv. 4S. 



IiOJ.Y WAR. 295 



.Mixed with thread 



* hurtful to you any more ; yea, they shall be your 

* servants, and shall minister unto you of their sub- 
' stance, and of whatever shall come to hand. I 

* need speak no more, you know them, and have 
'.some time since been much delighted in their com- 
' pany ; why then should v»e abide at such odds ? 

* Let us renew our old acquaintance and friendship 
' again. 

* Bear with your friend, I take the liberty at this 
[ time to speak thus freely unto you. The love that 
' I have to you presses me to do it, as also does the 
' zeal of my heart for my friends with you ; put me 
' not therefore to further trouble, nor yourselves to 
' further frights. Have you I will, in a way of 

* peace or war, nor do you flatters yourselves with 
' the power and force of your captains, or that 
' your Emanuel will shortly come in to your help , 
' for such strength will do you no pleasure. 

* I am come against you with a stout and valiant 
' army, and all the chief prince? of the den are even 

* at the head. Besides, my captains are swifter 
' than eagles, stronger than lions, and more greedy 
' of prey than are the evening wolves. What is 
' Og of Babhan ! what is Goliath of Gath ! and 
' what are an hundred more of them to one of tnfi 
'least of my captains ! how then shall Mansoul 
e think to escape my hand and force.' 

DiABOLushavingthus ended his flattering, fawn- 
ing, deceitful, and lying speech to the famous town 
of Mansoul, the lord-mayor replied unto him as 
v follows ; 



296 HOLY WA1 



The soul attacked by terrors. 



' O Diabolus, prince of darkness, and master ot 

* all deceit ; thy lying flatteries we have had., and 

* made sufficient probation of, and have tasted too 

* deeply of that destructive cup already; should 
' we therefore again hearken unto thee, and so 
' break the commandment of our great Shaddai, 
' to join affinity with thee, would not our Prince 

* reject us, and cast us off forever,, and being cast 

* off by him, can the place lhat he has prepared for 
' thee be a place of rest for us ? Besides, O thou 
' art empty and void of all truth, we are rather 

* ready to die by thy hand tlian to fall in with thy 
' flattering; and lying deceits. 

When the tyrant saw that there was little to be 
got in parleying 1 with my lord-mayor, he fell into 
an "hellish rage> and resolved that again with his 
army of Doubters lie would another time assault 
the town of Mansoul. 

So be called for his drummer, who beat up for 
his men (and while he did beat, Mansoul shook) 
to be in readiness to give battle to the corporation ; 
then Diabolus drew near with his army, and thus 
disposed of his men. Captain Cruel, and cap- 
tain Torment, these he drew up against Feel- 
gate, and commanded them to sit down there for 
the* war. And he also appointed, that if need were, 
captain No-ease should come in to their relief. 
At Nose-gate he placed captain Brimstone and 
captain Sepulchre, and Lid them look well to their 
ward on that side of the town of Mansoul. But 
at Eye-gate he placed lhat grim-faced one, the cap- 



HOLY WAR. 2* 



Preparations on both sides. 



tain Past-hope, and there also now did he set up 
his terrible standard. 

Now captain Insatiable was to look to the 
carriages of Diabolus, and was also appointed to 
take into custody that, or those persons and things 
that should at any time as prey be taken from the 
enemy. The inhabitants of Mansoul kept Mouth- 
gate for a sally-port., wherefore that they kept 
strong, for that was it by and out at .which the 
townsfolk sent their petitions to Emanuel their 
Prince ; that also was the gate, from the top of 
which the captains played their slings at the enemies, 
for that gate stood somewhat ascending, so that the 
placing of them here, and the letting of them fly 
from that place, did much execution against the 
tyrant's army ; wherefore for these causes with 
others, Diabolus sought, if possible, to stop up 
Mouth-gate with dirt. 

Now as Diabolus was busy and industrious in 
preparing to make his assault upon the town of 
Mansoul without, so the captains and soldiers in 
the corporation were as busy in preparing within; 
they mounted their slings, set up their banners, 
sounded their trumpets, and put themselves in such 
order as was judged most for the annoyance of the 
enemy, and for the advantage of Mansoul, and 
gave their soldiers orders to be ready at the sound of 
the trumpet for war. The lord Will-re-will also, 
he took the charge of watching against the rebels 
within, and to do what he could to take them while 
pp 



0m HOLY WAR. 



Sins crucified 



without, or to stifle them within their caves, dens, 
and holes in the town-wall of Mansoul. And to 
speak the truth of him, ever since he did penance 
for his fault,, he has showed as much honesty and 
bravery of spirit as may be in Mansoul, for he 
took one Jolly, and his brother Griggish, the 
two sons of his servant Harmless-mirth ; (for to 
that day, though the father was committed to ward, 
the sons had a dwelling in the house of my lord) I 
say he took them, and with his own hands put them 
to the cross. And this was the reason why he hang- 
ed them up : after their father was put into the 
hand of Mr. Truem\an the gaoler, his sons began to 
play their pranks, and to be tricking and toying with 
the daughters of their lord ; nay, it wasjealoused 
that they were too familiar with them, which was 
brought to his lordship's ear. Now his lordship 
being unwilling unadvisedly to put any man to 
death, did not suddenly fall upon them ; but set 
watch and spies to see if the thing was true ; of the 
which he was soon informed, for his two servants, 
whose names were Find-out, and Tell-all, 
catched them together in an uncivil manner more 
than once or twice, and went and told their lord. 
So when my lord Will-be-will had sufficient 
ground to believe the thing was true, he takes the 
two young Diabolonians, for such they were, foe 
their father was a Diabolonian born, and has 
them to Eyb-gate, where he raised a very high 
cross just in the face of Diabolus, and of his army 



853 



Covetoi sness delected. 



and there he hanged the young villains, in defiance 
to captain Past-hope, and (he horrible standard of 
the tyrant. 

Now this christian act. of the brave lord Will-ee- 
will greatly abashed captain Past-hope, discoura- 
ged the army of Biabolus, put fear into the Dia- 
bolonian runagates in Mansoul, and pat strength 
and courage into the captains that belonged to 
Emanuel the Prince; .for they without gathered, 
and that by this very act of my lord, that Mansoul 
was resolved to fight, and that the Diabolonians 
within the town could not do such things as Dia- 
bolus had hopes they would. Nor was this the 
only proof of the brave lord Will-be-w ill's 
honesty to the town, nor of his loyalty to his Prince, 
as will afterwards appear. 

Now when the children of Prudent-thrifty 
who dwelt with Mr. Mind, ( for Thrift left chil- 
dren with Mr. Mind, when he was also committed 
to prison, and their names were Gripe and Rake- 
all, these he begat of Mr. Mind's bastard daugh- 
ter whose name was Mrs. Hold-fast-bad,) I say, 
when his children perceived how the lord Will-be- 
will had served them that dwelt with him, what do 
they, but, lest they should drink of the same cup, en- 
deavour to make their escape. But Mr. Mind 
being wary of it, took them, and put them in hold 
in his house till the morning, for this was done over 
night, and remembering that by the law of Mansoul 
all Diabolonians were to die (and to be sure they 
yreie at least by father's side such, and some say by 



300 HOLY WAR. 



Watchfulness against hidden sins. 



mother's side too ; ) what does he but takes them,, 
and puts them in chains, aud carries them to the 
self-same place where my lord hanged his two be- 
fore, there he hanged them. The townsmen also 
took great encouragement at this act of Mr. Mind, 
and did what they could to have taken some more 
of these Diabolotni an troublers of Mansoul ; 
but at that time the rest laid so close, that they 
could not be apprehended ; so they set against them 
a diligent watch, and went every man to his place. 
I told you a little before, that Diabolus and 
his army were somewhat abashed and discouraged 
at the sight of what my lord Will-be-will did, 
when he hanged up those two young Diaboloni- 
ans ; but this discouragement quickly turned it- 
self into furious madness and rage against the town 
of Mansoul, and fight it he would. Also the towns- 
men and captains within had their hopes and ex- 
pectation heightened, believingatlastthe day would 
be theirs, so they feared them the less. Their sub- 
ordinate preacher too made a sermon about it, and 
took that theme for his text, " Gad, a troop shall 
tc overcome him, but he shall overcome at the last." 
Gen. xlix. 19. Whence he shewed, that though 
Mansoul should be sorely put to it at the first, yet 
the victory should certainly be Mansoul's at the 
last. 

So Diabolus commanded that his drummer 
should beat a charge against the town, and Ihe cap- 
tains also that were in the town sounded a charge 
against them, but they had no drum, they were 



JJOLY WAR. 501 



Contest between Satan and the soul. 



trumpets of silver with which they sounded against 
them. Then they which were of the camp of Dj- 
a bolus came down to the town to take it, and the 
captains in the castle, with the slingcrs at Mouth- 
gate, played upon them amain. And now there 
was nothing heard in the camp of Diabolijs but 
horrible rage and blasphemy ; but in the town good 
words, prayer, and singing of psalms. The enemy 
replied with horrible objections, and the terribleness 
of their drum ; but the town made answer with the 
slapping of their slings, and the melodious noise of 
their trumpets. And thus the fight lasted for seve- 
ral days together, only now and then they had some 
small intermission, in which the townsmen refreshed 
themselves, and the captains made ready for another 
assault. 

The captains of Emanuel were clad in silver 
armour, and the soldiers in that which was of proof ; 
the soldiers of Diabolus were clad in iron, which 
was made to give place to Emanuel's engine shot : 
in the town some were hurt, and some were greatly 
wounded. Now the worst of it was, a surgeon was 
scarce in Mansoul, for that E'yianuel at this 
time was absent. Howbeif, with the leaves of a 
tree the woundei were kept from dying; yet their 
wounds greatly petrified,* and some did grievously 



» In the midst of the stree\of it, and on cither side oi'fhe river, 
was there the tree of life, which bare twelve manner of fruits, and 
yielded her fruit every month : and tVo leaves of the l ree were for 
the healing of the nations. Rev. xxii. 2.... My wounds stink and 
are corrupt : because of my foolishness. Psu\. XXiV iii 5. 



r02 HOLY WAIL 



Wounded yet conquering 



slink. Of the townsmen these were wc-unded, to 
wit, my lord Reason, he was wounded in the head. 
Another that was wounded was the brave lord* 
mayor ; he was wounded in the eye. Another that 
was. wounded was Mr. Mind ; he received his 
wound about the stomach. The honest subordi- 
nate preacher also received a shot not far off the 
heart, but none of these were mortal. Many also 
of the inferior sort were not only wounded, but slain 
outright. Now in the camp of Diabolus were 
wounded and slain a considerable number : for in- 
stance, captain Rage was wounded, and s,owag 
captain Cruei»- Captain Damnation was made t© 
retreat, and intrench himself further off Mansoul ; 
the standard also of Diabolus was beaten down, 
and his standard-bearer, captain Much-hurt, had 
his brains beat out with a sling-stone, to the no 
little grief and shame of his prince Diabolus. 

Many also of the Doubters were slain outright, 
though enow of them were left alive to make Man- 
soul shake and loiter. Now the victory mat day 
being turned to Mansoul, put great v»four into 
the townsmen and captains, and covered Diabolus' 
camp with a clotid, but withal it made them far 
more furious, So the next day ]>1ansoul rested, 
and commanded that the bells should be rung, the 
trumpets also joyfully sounded, and the captain* 
also shouted round the town. 

My lord Will-be-will was not idle, but did 
notable service witbi" against the domestics, or the 
Diabolonians that were in the (own, not only by 



• WAR. 






keeping them in awe : for he lighted on-one at last, 
whose name was Mr. Anv-THIT»Gj afeliow of whom 
mention was made before, for it was he it' you re- 

member, that brought the three fellows to Diabo- 
lus, whom the DIabolonians took out of captain 
Bo.4nkk.ges' companies, and that persuaded them 
to list themselves under the tyrant, to fight against 
the army of Shaddai ; my lord Wil-l-be-will 
also took a notable Diabolonian, wliose name 
was Loose- foot ; this Loose-foot was a scout to 



the vagabonds in Mansoul, and used to carr 



-^ 



tidings out of Mansoul to the camp, and out of the 
camp to those of the enemies in Mansoul ; both 
these my lord sent away safe to Mr. Trueman th«j 
gaoler, with a commandment to keep them in iron? , 
for he intended then to have them out to be cruci- 
fied, when it would be for the best to the corpora- 
tion, and most for the discouragement of the can;.? 
of the enemies. 

My lord-mayor also, though he could not stir 
about so much as formerly, because of the wound 
that he bad lately received, yet gave he v,ut orders 
to all that were the natives of Mansoul, to look io- 
their vralchj and stand upon their guard, and as oc- 
casion shall o filer, to prove themselves men, Mr 
Conscience the preacher also did his utmost to 
keep all his good documents alive upon the heart* 
of the people of Mansoul. 

Well, a while after the captains-arid stout ones 
of the town oi' Mansoul agreed, and resolved upon 
a time to make a sally out upon the camp of D* 



304 HOLY WAR. 



Diabolus aUacKvd. 



Aeolus, and this must be done in the night, and 
there was the folly of Mansoul (for the night is 
always the best for the enemy, but the worst for 
Mansoul to fight in) but yet they would do it, 
their courage was so high ; their last victory also 
still stuck in their memories. 

The night appointed being come, the Prince's 
brave captains cast lots who should lead the van in 
this new and desperate expedition against Diabo- 
lus and against his Diabolonian army ; and 'the 
lot fell to captain Credence and captain Experi- 
ence; captain Good-hope led the Forlorn-hope ; 
(this captain Experience the Prince created such 
when himself resided in the town of Mansoul ; ) so 
as I said, they made their sally out upon the army 
that lay in the siege against them ; and their hap 
was to fall in with the main body of the enemies.. 
Now Diaeolus and his men being expertly ac- 
customed to night-work, took the alarm presently, 
and were as ready to give the battle, as if they had 
sent them wor d of their coming. Wherefore to it 
they went amain, and blows were hard on every side ; 
the hell-drum also was beat most furiously, while 
the trumpets of the Prince most sweetly sounded. 
And thus the battle was joined, and captain Insati- 
able looked to the enemies carriages, and waited 
when he should receive some prey. 

The Prince's captains fought it stoutly, beyond 
what indeed could be expected they should; they 
wounded many, they made the whole army of Di- 
abolus to make a retreat. But I cannot tell how 



HOLY WAR. 505 



Satan wounds the captains. 



but as the brave captain Credence, captain Good- 
hope, and captain Experience, were upon the 
pursuit, cutting down and following hard after the 
enemy in the rear, captain Credence stumbled and 
fell, by which fall he caught so great a hurt, that he 
could not rise till captain Experience helped him 
up, at which their men were put in disorder ; the 
captain also was so fiill of pain that he could not 
forbear but aloud to cry out ; at this the other two 
captains fainted, supposing that captain Credence 
had received his mortal wound : their men also were 
more disordered, and had no mind to fight. Now 
Diabolus being very observing, though at this time 
as yet he was put to the worst, perceiving that an 
halt was made among the pursuers, what does he, 
but taking it for granted that the captains were 
either wounded or dead ; he therefore at first makes 
a stand, then faces about, and so conies up upon the 
Prince's army with as much of his fury as hell could 
help him to, and his hap was to fall in just among 
the three captains, captain Credence, captain 
Good-hope, and captain Experience, and did 
eut, wound, and pierce them so dreadfully, that 
what through discouragement, what through disor- 
der, and what through the wounds that now they 
had received, and also the loss of much blood, they 
were scarce able, though they had for their power 
the three best hands in Mansoul, to get safe into 
the town again. 

Now when the body of the Prince's army saw 
bow these three captains were put to the worst, 
o. q 



305 ; HOLY WAR. 



Satan urges the soul to surrender to him. 



they thought it their wisdom to make as safe and 
good a retreat as they could, and so returned by the 
sally-port again, and so there was an end of the 
present action. 

Diabolus was so flushed with this night's work, 
that he promised himself in a few days an easy and 
complete conquest over the town of Mansoul ; 
wherefore on the day following he comes up to the 
sides thereof with great boldness, and demands en- 
trance, and that forthwith they deliver up them- 
selves to his government (the Diabolonians too 
that were within, began to be somewhat brisk, as 
we shall shew afterwards,) but the valiant lord- 
mayor replied, that what he got he must get by 
force ; for as long as Emanuel their Prince was 
alive, (though at present he was not so with them 
as they wished,) they could never consent to yield 
Mansoul up to another. 

The lord Will-be-will then stood up, and said, 
' Diabolus, thou master of the den, and enemy to 

* all that is good, we poor inhabitants of the town of 
' Mansoul are too well acquainted with thy rule 

* and government, and with the end of those things 

* that for certain will follow submitting to thee, to 
' do it. Wherefore, though a while we were without 
' knowledge, we suffered thee to take us, as the bird 

* that saw not the snare fell into the hands of the 

* fowler, yet since we have been turned from dark- 
4 ness to light, we have also been turned from the 

* power of Satan to God And though through 
*Ahy subtilty a and the subtilty of the Diabolo 



HOLY WAR. 507 



Resolution to resist. 



' nians within, we have sustained much loss, and 
' also plunged ourselves into much perplexity, vet 
' give up ourselves, lay down our arms, and yield 
' to so horrid a tyrant as thou, we will not ; die up- 
' on the place we chuse rather to do. Besides^ we 
' have hopes that in time deliverance will come 
* from court unto us, and therefore wc yet will 
f maintain war against thee. 

This brave speech of the lord Will-be-will, 
with that also of the lord-mayor, somewhat abated 
theboldnessof Diabolus, though it kindled the 
fury of his rage. It also encouraged the townsmen 
and captains ; yea, it was as a plaister to the brave 
captain Credence's wounds ; for you must know 
that a brave speech now r , when the captain* of the 
town, with their men, came routed heme, and when 
the enemy took courage and boldness at the success, 
that. he had obtained, to draw up to the walls, and 
demand entrance as he did, was in season, and also 
advantageous. 

The lord Will-be-will also played the man 
within, for while the captains and soldiers were in 
the field, he was in arms in the town, and wherever 
by him there was aDiABOLONUN found, they were 
forced to feel the weight of his heavy hand, and also 
the ed^e of his penetrating sword ; many therefore 
of the Diaeolonians he wounded, as the lord 
Cavil, the lord Brisk, the lord Pragmatick, ihe 
lord Murmur ; several also of the meaner sort he 
sorely maimed ; though there cannot at this time 
8>n account be given you of any that he slew' out- 



SC5 HOLY WAR. 



Fightiugs in the soul. 



right. The cause,, or rather the advantage that my 
lord Will-be-will had at this time to do thus, 
was, for that the captains were gone out to fight the 
enemy in the field. For now thought the Diabo- 
lonians within, is our time to stir and make an up- 
roar in the town ; what do they therefore but quick- 
ly get themselves into a body, and fall forthwith to 
hurricaning in Mansoul, as if nothing but whirl- 
wind and tempest should be there : wherefore, as I 
said, he takes this opportunity to fall in among them 
with his men, cutting and slashing with courage that 
was undaunted ; at which the Diabolonians with 
all haste dispersed themselves to their holds, and my 
lord-mayor to his place as before. 

This brave act of my lord somewhat revenged 
the wrong done by Diabolus to the captains, and 
also let them know, that Mansoul w«as not to be 
parted with, for the loss of a victory or two : where- 
fore the wing of the tyrant was dipt again, as to 
boasting, I mean, in comparison of what he would 
have done if the Diabolonians had put the 
town to the same plight to which he had put the 
captains. 

Well, Diabolus yet resolves to have the other 
bout with Mansoul ; for, thought he, since I beat 
them once, I may beat them twice : wherefore he 
commanded his men to be ready at such an hour of 
thenightto make a fresh assault upon the town, and 
he gave it out in special, that they should bend 
all their force against Feel-gate, and attempt to 
break into the town through thai, The word that 



HOLY WAR. C1S9 



One entrance forccl. 



then he gave to his officers and soldisrs was, Hell- 
fire. And, said he, if we break in upon thein, 
as I wish to do, either with some, or with all our 
force, let them that break in look to it, that they 
forget not the word. And let nothing be heard in 
the town of Mansoul, but hell-fire, hell-fire, hell- 
fire ! The drummer was also to beat without 
ceasing, and the standard-bearers were to display 
their colours ; the soldiers too were to put on what 
courage they could, and to see that they played man- 
fully their parts against the town. 

So the night being come, and all things by the ty- 
rant made ready for the work, he suddenly makes 
his assault upon Feel-gate, and after he had a 
while struggled there, he throws the gates wide open, 
for the truth is, those gates were but weak, and so 
most easily made to yield. When Diabolus had 
thus far made his attempt, he placed his captains, 
to wit, Torment and No-ease there ; so he at- 
tempted to press forward, but the Prince's captains 
came down upon him, and made his entrance more 
difficult than he desired. And to speak the truth, 
they made what resistance they could ; but three of 
their best and most valiant captains being wounded, 
and by their wounds made much incapable of doing 
the towu that service they would (and all the rest 
having more than their htinds full of the Doubt- 
ers, and their captains that followed Diabolus,) 
they were overpowered with force, nor could they 
keep them out of the town. Wherefore the Prince's 
men and the captains betook themselves to the 



310 HOLY WAR. 



Doubts dreadful in the soiil. 



castle, as to the strong hold of (be town ; and this 
they did, partly for their own security, partly for the 
security of the town, and partly, or rather chiefly, 
to preserve to Emanuel the prerogative royal of 
Mansoul, for so was the castle of Mansoul. 

The captains therefore being fled into the castle, 
the enemy without much resistance, possessed them- 
selves of the rest of the town, and spreading them- 
selves as they went, into every corner; they cried out 
as they marched, according to the command of the 
tyrant, hell-fire, hell -fire, hell-fire ! so that nothing 
for a while throughontthe town of Mansoul could 
be heard, but Mie direfuTnoise of hell-fire, together 
with the roaring of Diabolus' drum. And now 
did the clouds hang black over Mansoul, nor, to 
reason, did any thing but ruin seem to attend it. 
Diabolus also quartered his soldiers in the houses 
of the inhabitants of the town of Mansoul. Yea, 
the subordinate preacher's house was as full of these 
outlandish Doubters as ever it could hold ; and 
so was my lord-mayors and my lord Will-be- 
will's also. Yea where was there a corner, a cot- 
tage, a barn, or a hog-sty, that now was not full of 
these vermin ? Yea, they turned the men of the 
town out of their houses, and would lie in their beds, 
and sit at their tables themselves. Ah, poor Man- 
soul ! now thou feelest the fruits of sin, and whaf 
venom was in the flattering words of Mr. Carnal- 
security ! They made great havoc of whatever 
they laid their hands on ; yea, they fired the town 
in several places ; many young children were by 



HOLY WAR. 



The deplorable consequences of s»u. 



them dashed in pieces, yea, those that were -yet un- 
born they destroyed in their mothers' wombs ; for 
you must needs think that it couid not now be other- 
wise ; for what conscience, what pity, what bowels 
of compassion can any expect at the hands of out- 
landish Doubters ? Many in Mansoul that were 
women, both young and old, they forced, ravished, 
and beast like abused, so that they swooned, miscar- 
ried, and many of them died, and so lay at the top 
of every street, and in all by places of the town. 

And now did Mansoul seem to be nothing but 
a den of dragons, an emblem of hell, and a place of 
total darkness. Now did Mansoul lie almost 
like the barren wilderness ; nothing but nettles, 
briars, thorns, weeds, and stinking things seem now 
to cover the face of Mansoul. I told you before, 
how that these Diabolonian Doubters turned 
the men of Mansoul out of their beds, and now I 
will add, they wounded them, they mauled them, 
yea, and almost brained many of them. Many, did 
I say ? yea, most, if not all of them. Mr. Con- 
science they so wounded, yea, and his wounds so 
festered, that he could have no ease day nor night, 
but lay a? if continually upon a rack (but that 
Shaddai rules all, certainly they had slain him out- 
right. ) My lord-mayor they so abused, tiiat they 
almost put out his eyes ; my lord Will-be-will 
got into the castle, they intended to have chopt him 
all to pieces, for they looked upon him, as his heart 
now stood, to be one of the very worst that was ia 



HOLY WAR. 

Sins not welcome to a renewed soul. 

Mansoul against Diabolus and his crew And 
indeed he shewed himself a man, and more of his 
exploits you will hear of afterwards. 

Now a man might have walked for many days in 
Mansoul, and scarce have seen one in the town 
that looked like a religious man. Oh the fearful 
state of Mansoul now ! now every corner swarmed 
with outlandish Doubters ; red-coats and black- 
coats walked the town by clusters, and filled up ail 
the houses with hideous noises, vain songs, lying 
stories, and blasphemous language against Shaddas 
and his Son. Now also those Diaeolonians that 
lurked in the walls and dens, and holes that were in 
the town of Mansoul, came forth and shewed 
themselves ; yea, walked with open face in com- 
pany with the Doubters that were in Mansoul„ 
Yea, they had more boldness now to walk the streets., 
lo haunt the houses, and to shew themselves abroad, 
than had any of the honest inhabitants at the now 
woeful town of Mansoul. But Diabolus and 
his outlandish men were not at peace in Mansoul ; 
for they were not there entertained as were the cap- 
tains and forces of Emanuel ; the townsmen brow- 
beat them what they could ; nor did they partake 
or make destruction of any of the necessaries of 
Mansoul, but that which they seized on against 
the townsmen's will ; what they could they hid from 
them, and what they could not they had with an ill 
will. They, poor hearts, had rather have had their 
room than their company, but they were at present 



HOLY Vv'AA. Si: 



Mansoul the seat of war. 



their captives, and their captives for the. present 
they were forced to be.* But I say they discounte- 
nanced them as much as they were able, and shew- 
ed them all the dislike they could. 

The captains also from the castle IhjIcI them i\\ 
continual play with their slings, to the chafing ar.d 
fretting of (he minds of the enemies. True, Dia- 
bolus made a great many attempts to have broken 
open the gates of the castle, but Mr. Godly-fear 
was made the keeper of that ; and he was a man of 
courage, conduct, and valour, so that it was in vain, 
as long as life lasted within him, to think to do that 
work, though most desired ; wherefore all the at- 
tempts that Diabolus made against him, were 
fruitless (I have wished sometimes that that man 
had had the whole rule of the town of Mansoul. 

Well, thio was the condition of the town of* 
Mansoul, for about two years and a half; the 
body of: the town was the seat of war ; the people of 
the town were driven into holes, ar.d the glory of 
Mansoul was laid in the dust ; what rest then 
could be to the inhabitants, what peace could Man- 
soul have, and what sun could shine upon it ? 
Had the enemy lain so long without in the plain 
against the town it had been enough to famish them ; 
but now when they shall be within, when the town 
shall be their tent, their trench, and fort against the 



* Know ye not brethren, (for I spaak to them that know tb« 
law) how that a roan hath dominion over a Jam as lo;i^ as k-3 
Hveth. Rom. vii. 1. 

& r 



214 HOLY WAR. 



Mr. Godly-fear's advice. 



castle that was in the town, when (he town shall be 
against the town, and shall serve to be a defence to 
the enemies of her strength and life; I say, when 
they shall make use of the forts and town-holds to 
secure themselves in, even till they shall take, spoil, 
and demolish the castle ; this was terrible, and vet 
this was now the state of the town of Mansoul. 

After the town of Mansoul had been in this sad 
and lamentable condition for so long a time as I 
have told you, and no petitions that they had pre- 
sented their Prince with, all the whiles- could pre- 
vail ; the inhabitants of the town, to wit, the elders 
and chief of Mansoul, gather together, and after 
some time spent in condoling their miserable state, 
and this miserable judgment coming upon them, 
they agreed together to draw up yet another peti- 
tion, and to send it away to Emanuel for relief. 
But Mr. Godly-fear stood up, and answered, 

* That he knew his Lord the Prince never did, nor 

* ever would receive a petition for these matters 

* from the hand of any whoever, unless the Lord 
' Secretary's hand was to it (and this, quoth he, is 

* the reason you prevailed not all this while.') Then 
they said they woule draw up one, and get the Lord 
Secretary's hand to it. But Mr. Godly-fear 
answered again, ' That he knew also that the Lord 
'Secretary would not set his hand to any petition 

* that himself had not an hand in composing and 

* drawing up ; and besides, said he, the Prince doth 
e know my Lord Secretary's hand from all hands in 

* the world ; wherefore he cancot be deceived by 



HOLY WAR. 

Mansoul prays. 



any pretence whatever ; wherefore my advice is, 
' that you go to my Lord, and implore him to lend 
' you his aid.' (Now he abode in the castle, where 
all the captains and men of war were at arms.) So 
they heartily thanked Mr. Godly-fear, took his 
counsel, and did as he had bidden them ; so they de- 
parted and came to my Lord, and made known the 
cause of their coming to him : to wit, that since 
Mansoul was in so deplorable a condition, his 
Highness would be pleased to undertake to draw 
up a petition for them to Emanuel the son of the 
mighty Shad dai, and to their King and his Father, 
by him. 

Then said the Secretary to them, ' What petition 
€ is it that you would have me draw up for you ? B 
but they said, OurXord knows best the state and 
condition of the town of Mansoul, and how we are 
backslidden and degenerated from the Prince ; thou 
also knowest who is come up to war against us, and 
how Mansoul is now the seat of war. My Lord 
knows moreover what barbarous usage our men, 
women, and children have suffered at their hands, 
and how our home-bred Diabolonians walk now 
with more boldness than dare the townsmen, in the 
streets of Mansoul. Let our Lord therefore, ac- 
cording to the wisdom of God that is in him, draw 
up a petition for his poor servants to our Prince 
Emanuel. 'Well (said the Lord Secretary,) I 
' will draw up a petition for you, and will also set 
* my band thereto.' Then said they, ' But when 
9 ihall e call for it at the hand of our Lord ?' He 



816 HOLY WAR. 



'Ih; subject of prayer. 



answered, 'Yourselves must be present at tl-.c 
- doing of it. Yea, you must put your desires <o 

* it. True, the Land and pen shall be mine, but the 

■ ink and paper must be yours, else how can you 
f say it is your petition ? Nor have I need to pe- 
1 /ition for myself, because I have not offended.' 
He also added as folio weth : ' No petition goes 

* from me in my name to the Prince, and so to his 
f Father by him, but when the people, that are 
'chiefly concerned therein, join in heart and soul 
' in the matter, for that must be inserted therein/ 

So they heartily agreed with the sentence of the 
Lord, and a petition was forthwith drawn up for 
them. But now who shall carry it, that was the 
next. But the Secretary advised that captain Cre- 
dence should carry it, for he was a well spoken 
inan. They therefore called for him, and propound- 
ed]^ him the business. Well, said the captain, I 
gladly accept of the motion ; and though I am 
lame, I will do this business for you, with as much 
speed* and as well as I can. The contents of the 
petition were to this purpose : 

' O our Lord and Sovereign Prince Emanuel, 

* the potent, the long-suffering Prince : Grace is 
( poured into thy lips, and to thee belong mercy and 
' forgiveness, though we have rebelled against thee. 

* We who are no more worthy to he called thy Man- 
f soul, nor yet fit to partake of common benefits, 
I do beseech thee, and thy Father by thee, to do 
f away our transgressions. We confess that thoa 
f mightest cast us away for them, but $o it not for 



HOLY WAR. 317 



1 thy name's ?ake ; let the Lord rather take an op- 
' portunity at our miserable condition, to let out 
' his bowels of compassion to us, we are compassed 
' on every side ; Lord, our own backslidings reprove 

* us, our Diacolonians within our town fright us, 
1 and the army of the angel of tlie bottomless pit 
' distress us. Thy grace can be our salvation, and 
' whither to go but to thee we know not. 

* Furthermore, O gracious Prince we have weak- 
' ened our captains, and they are discouraged, sick, 
c and of late seme of them grievously worsted, and 
' beaten out of the field by the power and force 
' of the tyrant. Yea, even those o.f our captains, in 
' whose valour we formerly used to put most of our 

• confidence, they are as wou&ded men. Besides, 
' Lord, our enemies are lively, and they are strong, 
' they vaunt and boast themselves and threaten to 
' part us among themselves for a booty. They are 
■ fallen al.*o upon us with many thousand Doubt- 
' eiis, such as with whom we cannot tell what to do ; 
' they are all grim-looked, and unmerciful ones, and 
' they bid defiance to us and thee. 

f Our wisdom is gone, our power is gone, because 
< thou art departed from us^ nor have we what we 
' can call ours, but sin, shame, and confusion of 
f face for sin. Take pity upon us, O Lord, take 
' pity u P on us tn y miserable town of Mansoul, 
' and save us out of the hands of our enemies. 
' Amen/ 

This petition, as was touched afore, was handed 
)?y the Lord Secretary, and carried to the court by 



SIS HOLY WAR. 



lTAN hates prayer. 



the brave and most stout captain Credence. 
Now he carried it out at Mouth-gate, for that, as 
I said, was the sally-port of the town ; and he went., 
andcameto Emanuel with it. Now how it came 
out I do not know, but for certain it did, and that 
so far as to reach the ears of Diabolus. Thus I 
conclude, because that the tyrant had it presently 
by the end, and charged the town of Mansoul with 
it, saying, e Thou rebellious and sfubborn-hearted 
' Mansoul, I will makethee to leave off petition- 

* ing ; art thou yet for petitioning ? 1 will make 
' thee to leave off.' Yea, he also knew who the 
messenger was that carried the petition to the 
Prince, and it made him both fear and rage. Where- 
fore he commanded that his drum should be beat 
again, a thing that Mansoul could not abide to 
hear ; but when Diabolus would have his drum 
beat, Mansoul must abide the noise. Well, the 
drum was beat, and the Diabolonians were ga- 
thered together, 

Then said Diabolus, ' O ye stout Diabolo- 

* nians, be it known unto you, that there is treaco- 
' ery hatched against us in the rebellious town of 

/Mansoul; for albeit the town is in our posses- 

* sion, as you see, yet these miserable Mansoul- 
e ians have attempted to dare, and have been so 
"hardy as yet to send to the court of Emanuel 
f for help. This I give you to understand, that ye 
s may yet know how to carry it to the town of 

* Mansoul. Wherefore, O my trusty Diabolo- 

* nians, I command that yet more and more J© 



HOLY WAR. 310 



And dislikes fait/: 



* distress this town of Mansoul, and vex it with 
' your wiles ; ravish their women,, deflower their 
' virgins, slay their children, brain their antients, 
' fire their town, and do what other mischief you 
f can ; and let this be the reward of the Mansoul- 

* ians from me, for their desperate rebellion against 
' me.* 

This you see was the charge, but something stept 
in betwixt that and execution, for as yet there was 
but little more done than to rage. 

Moreover, when Diabolus had done thus, he. 
went the next day to the castle-gates, and demanded 
that upon pain of death, the gates should be open- 
ed tu him, and th^i entrance should be given him 
and his men that followed after. To whom Mr. 
Godly-fear replied (for he it was that had the 
charge of that gate,) e That the gate should not be 
' opened unto him, or to the men that followed af- 

* ter him/ Ke said moreover, ' That Mansoul, 
f when she had suffered a while, should be made 
s perfect, strengthened, and settled.' 

Then said Diabolus, ' Deliver me then the men 
' that have petitioned against me, especially cap- 
'tain Credence that carried it to your Prince, 

* deliver that varlet into my hands, and I will de» 
1 part from the town/ 

Then upstarts a Diabolonian, whose name was 
Mr. Fooling, and said, c My lord offereth you 
' fair, it is better . for you that one man perish, 

* than that your whole Mansoul should be un^ 
' done/ 



320 - HOLY WAIt. 



b:\TAN s rage. 



But Mr. Godly-fear made him this replication, 
' How long will Mansoul be kept out of the 

* dungeon, when she hath given up her faith to Di- 
' abolus ! As good lose the town as lose captain 
f Credence ; for if one be gone, the other must 

* follow.' But to that Mr. Fooling said no- 
thing. 

Then did my lord-mayor reply, and said, ' O thou 
'devouring tyrant, be it known unto thee, we shall 
4 hearken to none of thy words ; we are resolved to 
' resist thee as long as a captain, a man, a sling, and 
*' a stone to throw at thee, shall be found in the town 
' of Mansoul.' 

But Diabolus answered, c Do you hope, do 
e you wait, do you look for help and deliverance ? 

* You fi*va sent to Emanuel, but your wickedness 
c sticks too close in your skirts, to let innocent 
1 prayer come out of your lips. Think you that 

* )ou shall be prevailers, and prosper in this de- 
' sign ? You will fail in your wish, and will fail 

* in your attempts ; for it re not only I, but your 

* Emanuel is against you. Yea, it is he that hath 
' sent me against you, to subdue you ; for what then 
' do you Lope, or by what means w ill you es- 

* cape ?* 

Then said my lord-mayor, c We have sinned in- 
: deed, but that shall be no' help to thee, for our 
4 Emanuel hath said it,' and that in great faithful- 
' ness, ( And him that cometh to me, I will in v.o 
'wise cast out.' He hath also told us (O our 
' enemy) that all manner of sin and blasphemy shall 



noLT wAtt m 



ijeason of grace. 



' be forgiven to the sons of men.' Therefore we 
dare not despair,, but will look for, and wait for 
Snercv. 

And now by this time captain Credence was 
come from the court from Emanuel to the castle 
of Mansoul, and he returned to them with a pac- 
ket. So my lord major, hearing that captain CrsI- 
Pence was come., withdrew himself from the noise 
of the roaring of the tyrant, and left him to yell at 
the wall of the town/ or against the gatesofthe 
castle. He then came up to the captain's lodgings, 
and saluting him, asked him of his welfare, and 
what was the best news at court ? But when he 
asked captain Credence that, the water stood in 
his eyes. Then said the captain., Chear up, my 
lord, for all will be Well in time. And with that he 
first produced his packet and laid it by, but that the 
lord-mayor and rest of the captains took for a sigh 
of good tidings. (Now a season of grace being 
come, he sent for all the captains and elders of the 
town that were here and there in their lodgings, m 
the castle, and upon their guard, to let them kno\V 
that captain Credence was returned from thto 
court, and that he had something in general, and 
something in special to communicate to them.) So 
they all came up to him, and saluted him, and ask- 
ed him concerning his journey, and what was the 
best news at court ? And he answered them as he 
had done the lord-mayor before, that all would bs 
Well at last 

Now when the captain had thus saluted tbera> W& 
s s 



B22 HOLY WAR, 



Courage for God approved. 



opened his packet, and thence drew out of it seve* 
ral notes for those that he had sent for. And the 
first note was for my lord-mayor, wherein was sig- 
nified : f The Prince Emanuel had taken it well 
' that my lord-major had been so true and trusty in 
' his office, and the great concerns that lay upon 

* him for the town and people of Mansoul. Also 

* he bid him to know that he took it well that he 
f had been so bold for his Prince Emanuel, and 

* had engaged so faithfully in his cause against 
' Diabolus. He also signified at the close of his 
' letter, that he should shortly receive his re- 
' ward/ 

The second note that came out, was for the noble 
lori Will-be-will, wherein there was signified, 
'That his Prince Emanuel did well understand 
'how valiant and courageous he had been for the 
' honour of his Lord, now in his absence, and when 

* his name was under contempt by Diabolus. 
e There was signified also that his Prince had taken 
' it well that he had been so faithful to the town of 

* Mansoul, in his keeping so strict a hand and eye 
' over, and so strict a rein upon the necks of 
' the Diabolonians that still were lurking in 
c their several holes in the famous town of Man- 

' SOUL.' 

He signified moreover, f That he understood that 
r my lord had with his own hand done great esecu- 
f tion upon some of the chief of the rebels there, 

* to th»e great discouragement of the adverse party, 
' and to the good example of the whole town of 



HOLY" WAR. 323 



Hope of an answer to prayer. 



' Mansoul., and that shortly his lordship should 
f have his reward.' 

The third nole came out for the subordinate- 
preacher, wherein was signified, c That his Prince 
' took it well from him that he had so honestly and 

* faithfully performed his office, and executed the 
' trust committed to him by his Lord, while he ex- 
' horted, rebuked, and forewarned Mansoul ac- 
' cording- to the laws of the town/ He signified 
moreover, ' that he took it well at his hand, that 
'* he called to fasting, to sackcloth aiid ashes, when 
' Mansoul Mas under her revolt. Also that he 
' called for the aid of captain Boanerges to help in 
' so mighty a work, and that shortly he also should 
f receive his reward/ 

The fourth uote came out for Mr. Godly-fear, 
wherein his lord thus signified : f Thai his Lord- 
' ship observed, that he was the first of all the men 
f in Mansoul that detected Mr. Carnal-securi- 
' ty, as the only one that through his subtlety and 
' cunning had obtained for Diaeolus a defection 
' and decay of goodness in the blessed town of M*s- 
'soul. Moreover his Lord gave him to under- 

* stand, that he still remembered his tears and 

* mourning for the state of Mansoul.' It was 
also observed by the same note, ( tbas his Lord took 
'notice of his detecting of this Mr. Carnal-se> 
' curity at bistable among his guests, in his own 

* house, and that in the mi&st of his jolliness, even 
'while he was seeking to perfect his villanies 
'against the town of Mansoul. Emanuel also 



324 HOLY WAR. 



Comfort for Mansoui 



took notice, that tbis reverend person, Mr. God- 
ly-fear, stood stoutly to it at the gates of the 
castle, against all the threats ajid attempts of the 
tyrant, and that he had ]iiit the townsmen in a way 
to make their petition to their Prince, so as that 
he might accept thereof, and as that they might 
obtain an answer of peace ; and that therefore 
shortly lie should receive his reward.* 
After all this, there was yet produced a mote which 
was written to the whole town of Mansoul, where- 
by they perceived^ ' That their Lord took nqtice of 

* their so often repeating petitions to him, and that 
' they should see more of the fruits of such their 

* doings in time to come.* Their Prince also, there- 
in told them, ' that he took it well that their 

* heart and mind now at last abode fixed upon him 

* and his ways, though Diabolus had made such 
« inroads upon them, and that neither flatteries on 

* the one hand, nor hardships on the other, could 
'* make them yield to serve his cruel designs.' There 
was also inserted at the bottom of this note, • That 
' hie Lordship had left the town of Mansoul ill 
' the hands of the Lord Secretary, and under the 
f conduct of captain Credence, saying. Beware 
« that yoo yet yield yourselves unto their gover- 
« nance, and in due time you shall receive your re* 
' ward/ 

After the brave captainCREDENCE had delivered 
|iis notes to those to whom they belonged, he retired 
himself to my Lord Secretary's lodgings, and there 
ipends his time in conversing with him ; for thpy 



HOLY WAR. 325 



Faith exalted. 



two were very great one with another, and indeed 
knew more bow things would go with Mansoul> 
than aINbe townsmen besides. The Lord Secre- 
tary also loved captain Credence dearly, yea many a 
good bit was sent him from my lord's table ; also he 
might have a shew of countenance when the rest of 
Mansoul lay under ihe clouds; so after some time 
for converse was spent, the captain betook himself 
to his chamber to rest. But not long after my lord 
sent for the captain again ; so the captain came to 
him, and they greeted one another with the usual 
sal -jral ions. Then said the captain to the Lord Se- 
cretary, ' What hath my lord to say to his servant ?* 
So the Lord Secretary took him aside, and after a 
sign or two more of favour, he said, ' I have made 
f theo the lord-iieutenant over all the forces in 
' Mansoul ; so that from this day forward all men 
' in Mansoul shall be at thy word, and thou shalt 

* be he that shall lead in, and that shall lead out 
c Mansoul. Thou shalt therefore manage, ac- 
' cording to thy place, the war for thy Prince, and 
c for the town of Mansoul, against the force and 
' power of Oiaboi.us, and at thy command shall 

* the rest of the captains be.' 

Now the townsmen began to perceive what in- 
terest the captain h>»d, both with the court and also 
with the Lord Secretary in Mansoul; for no man 
before could speed when sent, nor bring such good 
news from Emanuel as he. Wherefore what do 
they, after some lamentation that they made no 
more use of him in their distresses, hut send hy 



$m HOLY WAR. 



Faith the greatest resister of Satan. 



their subordinate preacher to the Lord Secretary, 
to desire of him that all that ever they were and had 
might be put under the government, care, custody, 
and conduct of captain Credence. 

So their preacher went and did his errand, and 
received this answer from the mouth of his Lord, 
that captain Credence should be the great doer in 
all the King's army against the King's enemies, and 
also for the welfare of Mansoul. So he bowed to 
the ground, and thanked his Lordship, and returned 
and told his news to the townsfolk. But all this 
was done with ail imaginable secrecy, because the 
foes had yet great strength in the town. But to 
return to our story again : 

When Dei bolus saw himself thus boldly con- 
fronted by the lord mayor, and perceived the stout- 
ness of Mr. Godly-fear, he fell into a rage, and 
forthwith called a council of war, that he might be 
revenged on Mansoul. So all the princes of the 
pit came together, and old Incredulity at the 
head of them, with all the captains of his army. So 
they consulted what to do. Now the effect and 
conclusion of the council that day was, how they 
might take the castle, because they could not con- 
clude themselves masters of the town so long as that 
was in the possession of their enemies. So one ad- 
vised this way, and another advised that ; but when 
they could cot a«ree in their verdict, Apollvon, 
the president of the council, stood up, and thus he 
began : ' My brotherhood (quoth he) I have some 
c things to propound unto you, and my first is this ; 



holy war. 327 



Sai \N'b advice. 



' Let us withdraw ourselves from ilic town into the 
' plain again, fir our presence here will do us no 
f good, because the castle is yet in our enemies' 
e bauds ; nor is it possible that we should take that, 
c so long as so many brave captains are in it, and 
f this bold fellow Godly-fear is made the keeper 
( of the gates of it. 

f Now when we have withdrawn ourselves into 
' the plain, they of their own accord will be glad of 

* some little ease, and it may be of their own ac- 

* cord they again may begin to be remiss, and even 
' their so being will give them a bigger blow than 
' we can possibly give them ourselves. But if that 
' should fail, our going forth of the town may draw 
'■ the captains out after us, and you know what it 

* cost them when they fought us in the field before* 
' Besides, can we but draw them out into the fields, 

* we may lay an ambush behind the town, which 

* shall, when they are come forth abroad, rush in 
' and take possession of the castle/ But Beelze- 
eub stood up and replied, saying, t It is impos- 
sible to draw them all off from the castle; some 

* you may be sure will lie thereto keep that ; where- 

* fore it will be but in vain thus to attempt, unless 
' we are sure they will all come out.' He there- 
fore concluded, that what was done must be done 
by some other means. And the most likely means 
that the greatest of their heads could invent, was 
that which Apollyon had advised to before, to wit, 
to get the townsmen again to sin. For, said he, it is 
not our being in the town, nor in ihe field, jaor qui 



B25 HOLY WXR. 

Sin alone ran subjfcct the soul. 

fighting", nor our killing of their men,, that can make 
us the masters of Mansoul ,* for so long as one in 
the town is able to lift up his finger against us, Ema- 
kuel will take their parts ; and if he shall take 
their parts, we know what time a day will he with 
us. Wherefore for my part, quoth he, there is in 
my judgment no way to bring them into bondage 
to us, like inventing a way to make them sin. Had 
we, said he, left all our Doubters at home, we had 
done as well as we have done now, unless we could 
have made them the masters and governors of the 
castle ; for Doubters at a distance are but like 
objections repelled with arguments. Indeed, can 
we but get them into the hold, and make them pos- 
sessors of that, the day will be our own. Let us 
therefore withdraw ourselves into the plain (not ex-* 
peeling that the captains in Mansoul should fol- 
low us, )' but yet I say, let us do this, and before we 
so do, let us advise again with our trusty Diabolo- 
kians that are yet in the holds of Mansoul, and 
set them to work to betray the town to us ; for 
they indeed must do it, or it will be left undone for 
ever. By these sayings of Beelzebub ( for I think 
it was he that gave this counsel, )the whole conclave 
was forced to be of his opinion, to wit, that the way 
to get the castle, was, to get the town to sin. Then 
they fell to inventing by what means they might do 
this thing. 

Then Lucifer stood up and said> ' The counsel 

* of Beelzebub is pertinent : now the way to bring 

* this to pass, in mine opinion., is this : let us with- 



HOLY WAR. 329 



* draw our force from the town of Mansoul ; let 
' us do this, and let us terrify them no more, either 
e with summonses or threats, or with the noise of our 
' drum, or any other awakening mean. Only let 
' us lie in the field at a distance, and be as if we 
' regarded them not (for frights I see do but awak- 
c en them, and make them stand more to their 
1 aims. ) I have also another stratagem in my head : 
' you know Mansoul is a market-town, a town 
' that delights in commerce ! what therefore if some 
' of cur Diabolonians shall feign themselves far 
f country-men, and shall go out and bring to the 
' market of Mansoul some of our wares to sell; 
' and what matter at what rates they sell their wares 
* though it be but for half their worth ? Now let 
' those that thus trade in their market, be those that 
' are witty and true to us, and I will lay down my 
' crown to pawn, it will do. There are two that are 
c come to my thoughts already, that I think will be 
' arch at this work, they are Mr. Penny-wise- 
c pound-foolish, and Mr. Get-i'th'-hundred- 
f an d-lose-i'tii '-shire ; nor is this man with the 
c Jong name at all inferior to the other. What also 
' if you join with them Mr. Sweet-world, and Mr. 
e Present-good, they are men that are civil and 
' cunning, but our true friends and helpers. Let 
c these with as many more engage in this business for 
' us, and let Mansoul be taken up in much husi- 
* ness, let them grow full and rich and this is the way 
c to get the ground of them ; remember ye not, that 
' thus we prevailed upon Laopicea, and how many 

T t 



330 HOLY WAR. 



Deceitfulness of riches. 



' at present do we hold in this snare ? Now when 

* they begin to grow full, they will forget their mise- 

* ry; and, if we shall not affright them, may happen to 
' fall asleep, and so be got to neglect their town-watch, 
' their castle-watch, as well as their watch at the gates, 

' Yea, may we not by this means so cumber 
' Mansoul with abundance, that they shall be for- 
' cedto make of their castle a warehouse instead of 
f a garrison fortified against us, and a receptacle of 

* men of war ? Thus if we get our goods and com- 
t modities thither, I reckon the castle is more than 
' half ours. Besides, could we so order it, that they 
' should be filled with such kind of wares, then if 

* we made a sudden assault upon them, it would be 
' hard for the captains to take a shelter there. Do 
*' you know that of the parable, Luke viii. 14. 
" The deceitfulness of riches choaks^the work/' 
' And again, ce When the heart is overcharged with 
ef surfeiting and drunkenness, and the cares of this 
" life, all mischief comes upon them unawares." 
Chap. xxi. 34. 

' Furthermore, my lords, ( quoth he) you very well 

* know that it is not easy for a people to be filled 
' with our things, and not to have some of our Di- 
e abolonians as retainers to their houses and ser- 
c vices. Where is a Mansoulian that is full of 
' this world, that has not for his servants and wait- 

* ing-men, Mr. Profuse, or Mr. Prodigality, 
' or some other of our Diabolonian gang, as 

* Mr. Voluptuousness, Mr. Pragmatical, Mr. 
'Ostentation, or the like? Now these cau 



HOLY WAR. 331 



>f Christ's presence. 



* take the castle of Mansoul, or blow it up, or 
' make it unfit for a garrison for Emanuel, and 
r any of these will do. Yea, these, for aught I 
' know, may do it for us sooner than an army of 
' twenty thousand men. Wherefore, to end as I 

* began, my advice is, that we quietly withdraw 
' ourselves, not offering any further force or forci- 
r ble attempt upon the castle, at least at this time, 
' and let us set on foot our new project, and let us 

* see if that will not make them destroy themselves.' 

This advice was highly applauded by them all. 
and was accounted the very master piece of hell, to 
wit, to choak Mansoul with a fulness of this 
world, and to surfeit her heart with the good things 
thereof. But see how things meet together. Just 
as this Diabolonian council was broken up, cap- 
tain Credence received a letter from Emanuel, 
the contents whereof were these : ' That upon the 
'third day he would meet him in the field, in the 

* plains about Mansoul.' Meet me in the field ! 
quoth the captain. What meaneth my] Lord by 
this ? I know not what he meaneth by meeting me 
in the field. So he took the note in his hand, and 
carried it to my Lord Secretary, to ask his thoughts 
thereupon ( for my Lord was a seer in alJ matters 
concerning the King, and also for the good and 
comfort of the town of Mansoul. ) So he shewed 
my Lord the note, and desired his opinion thereup- 
on : For my part, quoth captain Cdedence, I 
know not the meaning thereof. So my Lord read 
it, and after a little pause, he said, The Diabqlo- 



332 HOLY WAR. 



Joy at the promises. 



nians have had against Mansoul a great consul- 
tation to-day : they have, I say, this day been con- 
triving the utter ruin of the town ; and the result of 
their counsel is, to set Mansoul into such a way, 
which, if taken, will surely make her destroy her- 
self. And to this end they are making ready for 
their own departure out of the town, intending to 
betake themselves to field again., and there to lie till 
they shall see whether this their project will take or 
no. But be thou ready with the men of thy Lord, 
for on the third day they will be in the plain, there 
to fall upon the Diabolonians ; for the Prince 
■will by that time be in the Held : yea, by that it is 
break of day, sun-rising, or before, and that with a 
mighty farce against them. So he shall be before 
them, and thou shalt be behind them, and betwixt 
you both their army shall be destroyed. 

When captain Credence heard this, away goes 
be to the rest of the captains, and tells them what a 
note he had a while since received from the hand of 
Emanuel. And, said he, that which was dark 
therein has my Lord Secretary expounded unto me. 
He told them, moreover, what by himself and by 
them must be done to answer the mind of their Lord. 
Then were the captains glad, and captain Cre- 
dence commanded, that all the King's trumpeters 
should ascend on the battlements of the castle, and 
there in the audience of Diaeolus, and of the 
•whole town of Mansoul, make the best music that 
heart could invent. The trumpeters then did as 
ihey were commanded : they got themselves up to 



fl.OLY WAR. 333 



T.'lc DlABOl 0NI.V5TS v . .-elves frOIll Mi 



the top of the castle, c^d thus they began to sound. 
Then did Diabolus start, and said, What can be 
the meaning of this ? they neither sound Boof-and- 
saddle, nor Horse-and-awa y, nor a Charge. What 
do these madmen mean, that yet they should be so 
merry and glad ? then answered him one of them- 
selves, and said. This is for joy that their Prince 
Emanuel is^coming to relieve the town of Man- 
soul ; that to this end he is at {he head of an army, 
and that this relief is near. 

The men of Mansoul also were greatly concern- 
ed at this melodious charm of the trumpets ; they 
said, yea, they answered one to another, saying, This 
can he no harm to us ; surely this can be no harm 
to us. Then said the Diabolonians, What had 
-we best to do ? And it was answered it was best to 
quit the town ; and that, said one, ye may do in pur- 
suance of your last counsel, and by so doing also be 
better able to give the enemy battle, should an army 
from without come upon us. So on the second 
day they withdrew themselves from Mansoul, and 
abode in the plains without ; but they encamped 
themselves before Eye-gate, in what terrene and 
terrible manner they could. The reason why they 
could not abide in the town (besides the reasons that 
were debated in their late conclave, ) was, for that 
they were not possessed of the strong hold, and be- 
cause, said they, we shall have more convenience 
to fight, and also to fly, if need be, when we are en- 
camped in the open plain. }]eside3, the town 
would have been a pit for them, rather than a place 



23* HOLY WAR. 



Preparations for battle. 



of defence, had the Prince came up and enclosed 
theoi fast therein. Therefore they betook them- 
selves to the field, that they might also be out of 
the reach of the slings, by which they were much 
annoyed all the while they were in the town. 

Well, the time that the captains were to fall upon 
the Diabolonians being come, they eagerly pre- 
pared themselves for action ; for captain Cre- 
dence having told the captains over night, that 
they should meet their Princein the field to-mor- 
row, was like oil to a flaming fire ; for of a long 
time they had been at a distance ; they therefore 
were for this the more earnest and desirous of the 
work. So, as I said, the hour being come, captain 
Credence, with the rest of the men of war, drew 
out their forces before it was day by the sally-port of 
the town. And being all ready, captain Credence 
went up to the head of the army, and gave to the 
rest of the captains the word, and they to the under 
officers and soldiers, which was, c The sword of the 

* Prince Emanuel and the shield of captain Cre- 
e dence !' which is in the Mansoulian tongue, 

* The word of God and faith. Then the captains 
fell on, and began roundly to front and flank and 
rear Diabolus' camp. 

Now they left captain Experience in the town, 
because he was ill of his wounds which the Diabo- 
lonians had given him in the last fight. But when 
he perceived that the captains were at it, what does 
he, hut calling for his crutches in haste, gets up, 
and away he goes to the battle, paying, f Shall I lay 



HOLY WAR. 535 



* here when ray brethren are in the fighr, and when 

* Emanuel the Prince will shew himself inthe field 
' to his servants ?' But when the enemy saw the man 
come with his crutches, they were daunted yet the 
more, for thought they, what spirit has possessed 
these Mansoulians, that they fight us upon their 
crutches ! Well, the captains, as I said, fell on, and 
bravely handled their weapons, still crying out, and 
shouting as they laid on blows, e The sword of the 
' Prince Emanuel, and the shield of captain Cre- 
* dence !' 

Now when Diabolus saw that the captains were 
come out, and that so valiantly they surrounded 
his men, he concluded, that for the present nothing 
from them was to be looked for but blows, with the 
dints of their two-edged swords. Wherefore he 
also falls upon the Prince's army, with all his dead- 
ly force. So the battle was joined. Now who was 
it that at first Diabolus met with in the fight, but 
captain Credence on the one hand, and the lord 
Will-be-will on the other ; now Will-be-will's 
blows were like the blows of a giant, for that man 
bad a strong arm, and he fell in upon the Elec- 
tion-Doubters, for they were the life-guard of 
Diabolus, and he kept them in play agood while, 
cutting and battering shrewdly. Now when cap- 
tain Credence saw my lord engaged, he stoutly 
on the other hand fell upon the same company al- 
so, so they put them to great disorder. Now cap- 
tain Good-hope had engaged the Vocation- 
Dovbters, and they were sturdy men ; but the 



336 HOLY WAR. 



The battle renewed. 



captain was a valiant man : captain Experience 
also sent him some aid : so he made the Vocation- 
DauBTERS retreat. The rest of the armies were 
hotly engaged, and that on every side, and the Di- 
abolonians fought stoutly. Then my Lord Se- 
cretary commanded that the sling's from the castle 
should by played, and his -111611 could throw stones 
at an hair's breadth. But after a while those that 
fled before the captains of the Prince, began to rally 
again, and they came up stoutly upon the rear of 
the Prince's army, wherefore the Prince's army be- 
gan to faint ; but remembering they should see the 
face of their Prince by and by, they took courage, 
and a very fierce battle was fought. Then shouted 
the captains, saying, ' The sword of the Prince 
' Emanuel, and the shield of captain Credence !' 
and with that Diabolus gave back, thinking that 
more aid had been come. But no Emanuel as yet 
appeared. Moreover the battle hung in doubt; 
and they made a little retreat on both sides. Now 
in the time of respite, captain Credence bravely 
encouraged his men to stand to it, and Diabolus 
did the like as well as he. could. But captain 
Credence made a brave speech to his soldiers, the 
contents whereof here follow : 

' Gentlemen soldiers, and my brethren in this de~ 
c sign, it rejoiceth me much to see in the field, for 
'our Prince this day, so stout and so valiant 'an 
c army, and faithful lovers of Mansoul. You 
e have hitherto, as hath become you, shewn your- 
* selves men of truth and courage against the Dja- 



HOLY WAR. 



Christ's presence expected to the son!. 



' colon i an forces, so that for all their boast, they 
' have not vet cause much to boast of their gettings. 
f Now take to yourselves your wonted courage, and 
' shew yourselves men, even this once only ; for in a 

* few minutes after the next engagement this time, 
r you shall sec your Prince shew himself in the field ; 
' for we must make this second assault upon this 

• tyrant Diabolus, and then Emanuel comes.' 

No sooner had the captain made this speech to 
his soldiers, but Mr. Speedy came post to the cap- 
tain from the Prince, to tell him that Emanuel was 
at hand. This news, when the captain had received, 
lie communicated to the other h'eld officers, and they 
again to their soldiers and men of war. Wherefore, 
tike' men raised from the dead, so the captains znd 
their men arose ; made up to the enemy, and cried 
as before, ' The sword of the Prince Emanuel and 
( the shield of captain Credence !' 

The DiABOLOMANs also bestirred themselves, 
and made resistance as well as they could, but in 
this last engagement they lost their courage, and 
many of the Doubters fell down dead to the ground. 
Now when they had been in heat of battle aboutan 
hour or more, captain Credence lifted up his eyes, 
and beheld Emanuel coming, and he came with 
colours flying, trumpets sounding, and the feet of 
his men scarce touched the ground, they hasted with 
that celerity towards the captains that were engaged. 
Then captain Credence wheeled his men to the 
townward, and gave to Diabolus the field. So 
Emanuel came upon him on the one side, and the 

W IS' 



338 HOLY War. 



Christ destroys all doubts.. 



enemies' place was betwixt them both ; then again 
they fell to it afresh, and a little while afterwards 
Emanuel and captain Credence met, still tramp- 
ling down the siain as they came, ' 

Bat when the captains saw that the Prince was 
/some, and that he fell upon the Diabolonians on 
the other side, and that captain Credence and his 
Highness had got them up betwixt them, they shout- 
ed (they so shouted -that the ground rent again.) 
saying'' The sword of Emanuel, and the shield of 
* captain Credence V Now when, Diabolu*s saw 
that he and his forces were so hard beset by the 
Prince and his princely army, what does he and the 
lords of the pit that were with him, but make their 
escape, and forsake their army, and leave them to 
fall by the hand of Emanuel, and of, his noble cap- 
tain Credence : so they fell all down slain before 
them, before his Prince, and before his royal army ; 
there was not left so much as one Doubter alive ; 
they lay spread upon the ground like dead men, a# 
©ne would spread dung upon the land. 

When the battle was over, all things caraein or- 
der in the camp ; then the captains and elders of 
Mansoul came together to salute Emanuel, while 
Without the corporation; so they saluted him, and 
welcomed him, and that with a thousand welcomes, 
for that he was come to the borders of Mansoul 
again. So he smiled upon them, and said, e Peace 
c be unto you.' Then they addressed themselves to 
go to the town ; they went then > to go up to Man- 
souLjth&y, the Prince, with all the new forces that 



HOLY WAR. 389 



Christ re-poasesses M 



now he had brought with him to the war. Also all 
the gates of the town were set open for his reception, 
so glad were they of his blessed return. And this 
wa6 the manner and order of his going into Man- 

St>UL. 

First, as I said, all the ga»€3 of the town were set 
open, yea, the gates of the castle ; the elders too of 
the town of Mansoul placed themselves at the 
gates of the town, to salute him at his entrance 
thither : and so they did, for as he drew near, and 
approached towards the gate, they said, " Lift up 
*' your heads, O ye gates, and be lift up ye ever- 
" lasting doors, and the King of glory shall coma 
"in." And they answered again, " Who is this 
" King of glory ?" And they made return to them- 
selves, " The Lord strong and mighty, the Lord is 
*■' mighty in battle. Lift up your heads, O y<e 
" gates, even lift them up, ye everlasting doors." 
&c. 

Secondly, It was ordered also by those of Man- 
soul, that all the way from the town-gates to those 
t»f the castle, his blessed majesty should be enter- 
tained with the song, by them that had best skill in 
music in all the town of Mansoul ; then the elders 
and the rest of the men of Mansoul answered one 
another as Emanuel entered the town, till he came 
to the castle-gates, with songs and sounds of trum- 
pets, saying, " They have seen thy goings, O God, 
■ e even the goings of my God, my King, in the sanc- 
" tuary. So the singers went before, the players»QH 



340 . HOLY- WAR. 



Jo}*ful reception of Christ. 



cr instruments followed after, and among them were 
(( the damsels playing on timbfela." 

Thirdly, Then the captains, (for I wouldspeak a 
word for them) in their order waited on the Prince 
as he entered into the gates of Mansoul : captain 
Credence went before, and captain Good-hope 
with him ; captain Charity came behind, with 
other of his companions, and captain Patience 
followed after all, and the rest of the captains, some 
on the right hand, and some on the left, accompanied 
Emanuel into Mansoul. And all the while the 
colours were displayed, the trumpets sounded, and 
continual shoutings were among the soldiers. The 
Prince himself rode into the town in his armour, 
which was all of beaten gold ; and in his chariot, 
the pillars of it were of silver, the bottom thereof 
of £old, the covering of it was of purple, the midst 
thereof being paved with love for the daughters of 
the town of Mansoul. 

Fourthly, When the Prince was come to the en- 
trance of Mansoul, he fuund all the streets strew- 
ed with lilies and flowers, curiously decked with 
boughs and branches from the green trees, that stood 
round about the town. Every door also was filled 
with persons, who had adorned every one their fore- 
part against their house with somethingof variety and 
singular excellency, to entertain him withal as he 
passed in the streets ; they also themselves, as Ema- 
nuel passed by, welcomed him with shouts and 
acclamations of joy, saying, ' Blessed be the Prince 



ilOLY WAR. 341 



Emawdel is welcomed at the castie-gafes. 



'that comcth in the name of his Father Shad- 

* DAI.' 

Fifthly, At the castle-gates the elders of Man- 
soul, to wit, my lord-mayor, lord Will -ee-will, 
the subordinate-preacher, Mr. Knowledge, and 
Mr. Mind, with other of the gentry of the place, 
saluted Em and el again ; they bowed before him, 
they kissed the dust of his feet, they thanked, they 
blessed and praised his Highness for not taking ad- 
vantage against them for their sins, but rather had 
pity upon them in their misery, and returned to 
them with mercies, and to build up their Mansoul 
for ever. Thus was he had up straitway to the 
castle ; for that was the royal palace, and the place 
where his honour was to dwell ; which was ready 
prepared for his highness by the presei^ce of the 
Lord Secretary, and the work of captain Credence. 
So he entered in. 

Sixthly, Then the people and commonalty of the 
town of Mansoul came to him in the castle to 
mourn, weep, and lament for their wickedness, by 
which they had forced him out of the town. So 
they, when they were come, bowed themselves to 
the ground seven times, they also wept, they wept 
aloud, and asked forgiveness of the Prince, and 
prayed that he would again, as of old, confirm his 
love to Mansoul. 

To which the great Prince replied, ' Weep not, 
* but go your way, eat the fat and drink the sweet, 
' and send portions to them for whom nought is 
' prepared, for, <f the joy of your Lord is your 



m- HOLY WAR. 



Fountain opened to wash and tie clean. ^ 

- ' - - ■ •* 

" strength. '* I am returned to Mansoul with 
' mercies, and my name shall be set up, exalted and 
* magnified by it.'" He also took these inhabitants, 

and kissed them, and laid them in his bosom. 

Moreover, he gave to the elders of Mansoul, 
arid to each town officer, a chain of gold, and a sig- 
»et. He also sent to their wives ear-rings, and 
jewels, and bracelets, and other things. He also 
bestowed upon the true-born children of Mansoul, 
many precious things. 

When Emanuel the Prince had done all these 
things for the famous town of Mansoul, then he 
said unto them, * First, wasli your garments, then 
e put on your ornaments, and then come to me 
f info the castle of Mansoul.'* So they went to 
the fountain that was set open for Judaii and Je- 
rusalem to wash in ; and there they washed, and 
there they made their garments white, and came 
again to the Prince 1 into the castle, and thus they 
stood before him.f 

And now there was music and dancing through- 
cut the whole town of Mansoul : and that because 
their Prince had again granted to them his presence^ 
s^id light of his countenance; ,the bells also 
rung, and the sun shone comfortably upon them for 
a great while together. 



* Let thy garments be always white ; and let thy head lack no 
ointment. Eccl. ix. 8. 

f Io that day day there shall be a fountain opened to the house 
c# Qftvid, and to the inhabitants of J^usalein, for sin and for im- 
deanaess* Zech. xiii, 1- 



. 



Sins must be I 



The town of Mansoul also now more thoroughly 
sought the destruction and ruin of all rema 
Df abolomans that abode in the walls, and the 
dens, that they had in the town of Mansoul, for 
there was of them that had to this day escaped with 
life aud limb from the hand of their suppressors in 
the famous town of Mansoul. 

But my lord Will-be-will was a greater ter- 
ror to them now than ever he had been before, for- 
asmuch as his heart was yet more fully bent to seek, 
contrive, and pursue them to the death ; her pur- 
sued them night and day,,. and put them now to sore 
distress, as will afterwards appear. 

After things were thus far put into order in the 
famous town of Mansoul, care was taken, and or- 
der given by the blessed Prince Emanuel, that tha 
townsmen should, without 'further delay, appoint 
some to go .forth into the plain to bury the dead 
that were there ; the dead that fell by the sword of 
Emanuel, and by the shield of captain Credence, 
lest the fumes and ill savours that would arise from 
them, might infect the air, and so annoy the famous 
town of Mansoul. This also was a reason of this 
order., to wit, that as much as in Mansoul lay, thev 
might cut off the name and being and remembrance 
of those enemies from the thought of the famous 
town of Mansoul and its inhabitants. 

So order was given out by the lord-mayor, that 
wise -and trusty friend of the town of Mansoul, 
that persons should be employed about this neces- 
sary business ; and Mr. Godly-fear, and cue 



m HOLY WAR. 



All doubts buricrl. 



Mr. Upright were to be overseers about this mat- 
ter : so persons were put under them to work in the 
fields, and to bury the slain that lay dead in the 
plains. And these were their places of employment ; 
some were to make the graves, some were to bury 
the dead, and some were to go to and fro in the 
plains, and also round the borders of Mansoul, to 
see if a skull or a bone, or a piece of a bone of a 
Doubter was yet to be found above ground any 
where near the corporation ; and if any were found, 
it was ordered that the searchers that searched 
should set up a mark thereby, and a sign, that those 
that were appointed to bury them might find it and 
bury it out of sight, that the name and remem- 
brance of a Diabolonian Doubter might be 
blotted out from under heaven. And that the 
children and they that were to be born in Mansoul 
might not know, if possible, what a skull, what a 
bone, or a piece of a bone of a Doubter was. So 
theburiers and those that were appointed for that 
purpose, did as they were commanded ; they buried 
the Doubters and all skulls and bones, and pieces 
of bones of Doubters wherever they found them, 
and so they cleansed the plains. Now also Mr. 
God's-peace took up his commission, and acted 
again as in former days. 

Thus they hurled in the plains about Mansoul, 
the Election Doubters, the Vocation Doubt- 
ers, the Grace-Doubters, the Perseverance- 
Doubtrrs, the Resurrection-Doubters, the < 
■SALVATioN-Pbeo-TERs; and the Glory-Doubt- 



HOLY WAR. 345 



Burial of the slaic. 



ERS, whose captains were captain Rage, and cap- 
tain Cruel, captain Damnation, captain Insa- 
tiable, captain Brimstone, captain Torment, 
captain No-ease, captain Sepulchre, and cap- 
tain Past-hope ; and old Incred.ulity was un- 
der Diabolus their general ; there was was also the 
seven heads of (heir army, and they were the lord 
Beelzeeub, the lord Lucifer, the lord Legion, 
the lord Apollyon, the lord Pithon, the lord 
Cerberus, and the lord Belial. But the princes 
and captains, with old Incredulity their general, 
all made their escape : so their men fell down upon 
the slain bv the power of the Prince's forces, and by 
the hands of the men of the town of Mansoul. 
They also were buried, as is before related, to the 
exceeding- great joy of the town of Mansoul : they 
that buried them, buried also with them their arms, 
which were cruel instruments of death (their wea- 
pons were arrows, darts, mauls, firebrands, and the 
like ; ) they buried also their armour, colours, and 
banners, with the standard of Diabolus, and what 
else soever they could fiiid that did but smell of s 
Diabolonian Doubter. 

Now when the tyrant was arrived at Hell-gate- 
hill, with his old friend Incredulity, they imme- 
diately descended the den, and havingtherc with their 
followers for a while condoled their misfortune, and 
the great loss they sustained before the towrt of Man- 
soul, they fell at length into a rxission, and revenged 
they would he for the loss that they sustained before 
the town of Mansoul; wherefore they presently call 
x x 



346 HOLY WAR. 



Satan's desire tb possess the soui. 



a council to contrive jet further what was to be done 
against the famous town of Mansoul ; for their 
yawning paunches could not wait to see the result of 
their lord Lucifer's and their loFd Apollyon's 
counsel that they had given before, for their raging 
gorge thought every day even as long as a short for- 
ever, until they were filled with the body and soul 
with the flesh and bones, and with all the delicacies. 
of Mansoul. They therefore resolved to make 
another attempt upon the town of Mansoul; and 
that by an army mixed and made up partly of Doubt- 
ers, and partly of Blood- men. A more particu- 
lar account now take of both. 

The Doubters are such as have their name from 
their nature, as well as from the lord and kingdom 
where they were born ; their nature is to put a 
question upon every one of the truths of Emanuel, 
and their country is the. land of Doubting, and 
that land lieth off, and furtherest remote to the 
north, between the land of Darkness, and that cal- 
led the Valley of the Shadow, of Death- For 
though the land of Darkness, and that called the 
land of the Shadow of Death, be sometimes cal- 
led as if they were one and the self-same place; 
jet indeed they are two, lying but a little way 
asunder, arid the land of Doubting points in, and 
lieth between them. This is the land of Doubting, 
and those that came with Diabolus to ruin the 
town of Mansoul, are the natives of that coun- 
try. 

The Blood-men ar« a people tfe^t have their 



HOLY WAR. 347 

Sat a 5 raiiea new troop?. 

name derived frcm the malignity of their nature, 
and from the fury that is in tbem to execute it upon 
the town of Manboul; their land lieth under the 
Dog star, and by that they arc governed as to intel- 
lectuals. The name of the country is the province 
of Loath-good the remote parts of it are far dis- 
tant from the land of Doubting, yet they do both 
butt and bound upon the hfll called Hell-gate- 
hill. These people are always in league with the 
Doubters, for they jointly make question of the 
faith and fidelity of the men of the town of Man* 
soul, and so are both alike qualified for the service 
of their prince. 

Now of these two countries did Diabolus by the 
beating of his drum raise another army against the 
town of Mansoul, of five-and-twenty thousand 
strong. There were ten thousand Doubteus and 
fifteen thousand Blood-men, and they were put 
under several captains for the war ; and old In- 
credulity was again made general of the army. 

As for the Doubters, their captains were five of 
the seven that were heads of the last DiabolvNIAn - 
army, and these are their names ; captain Beelze- 
bub, captain Lucifek, captain Apollyon, cap- 
tain Legion, and captain Cereerus, and the 
captains that they had before were some of them 
made lieutenants, and some ensigns of the army. 
. But Diabolus did nol count that in thisexpedi- 
tioft of his these Doubters would prove his prin- 
cipal men, for their manhood had been tried be- 
fore ; also the Mansoviians had put them to the 



S48 HOLY AVAR. 



Satan's officers. 



worst, only he brought them to multiply a number, 
and to help, if need was, at a pinch ; but his trust he 
put in his Bloqd-me\ t , for they were all rugged 
villains, and he knew that they had done feats here- 
tofore. 

As for the Blood-men, -they also were under 
command, and the names. of their captains were, 
captain Cain, captain Nim rod, captain Ishmaet,, 
captain Esau, captain Saul, captain Absalom, 
captain Judas, and captain Pope. 

1. Captain Cain was over two bands, to wit, 
the Zealous and the Angry Blood-men .; his stand- 
ard-bearer bore the red colours, and his scutcheon 
was the murdering club.* 

%. Captain Nimrod was captain over two bands, 
to wit, the Tyrannical and Incroaching Blood- 
men ; his standard-bearer bore the red colours, 
and his scutcheon was the great bleod-hound. 

3. Captain Ishmael was captain oyer two bands, 
to wit, over the Mocking and Scorning Blood-men ; 
his standard-bearer bore the red colours, and his 
scutcheon was one mocking at Abraham's IsAAc.f 

4. Captain Esau was captain over two bands, 



* And Cain talked with Abel his brother : and it came to pass, 
when they were in the field, that Cain rose up against Abel his 
brother, and slew him. Gen. iv. 8. 

+ And Sarah saw the son of Kag&r the Egyptian, which she had 
born unto Abraham, mocking. Wherefore she said unto Abra- 
ham, Cast out this bond-woman and her son : for the son of this 
bond-woman shall not be heir with my son, ever, with Isaac, 
Gen. xxi. 9, 10. 



HOLY WAR. 319 



And soldiers 



to wit, the Blood-men that grudged that another 
should have the blessing; also over the Blood- 
men that are for executing their private revenge 
upon others ; his standard-bearer bore the red co- 
lours, and his scutcheon was one privately lurking 
to murder Jacob." 

5. Captain Saul was captain over two bands, to 
wit, the Groudlessly Jealous and the Devilishly 
Furious Blood-men; his standard-bearer bore the 
red colours, and his scutcheon was three bloody 
darts cast at harmless David. -j- 

6. Captain Absalom was captain over two bands, 
to wit, over the Blood-men that will kill a father 
or a friend, for the glory of this world ; also over 
those Blood-men that hold one fair in hand with 
■words, till they shall have pierced him with their 
swords ; his standard-bearer bore the red colours, 
and his scutcheon was the son pursuing the father's 
blood. 

Captain Judas was over two bands, to wit, 
the Blood-men that will sell a man's life for money, 
and those also that will betray their friend with a 
kiss ; his standard-bearer bore the red colours, and 



* And these words of Esau her elder son were told toliebekah. 
And she .sent and called Jacob her younger son, and said unto 
him, BohoJd, thy brother Esau, as touching thee, cloth comfort 
himself, purposing to kill thee. Gen. xxvii. 42. 

+ And Saul cast the javelin ; for he said, I will smite David 
even to the wall with it. And Day id avoided out of his rjresenca 
tv,ice. 1 Sam. sviii. 11. 



S50 HOLY WAR. 



Unbelief Sat a' ns principal officer. 



fi£g scutcheon was thirty pieces of silver,- and the 

IsaSteri* 

8-- Captain Pope was captain over one hand, for 
all these spirits are joined in one under him ; hia 
standard -bearer bore the red colours, and his scut- 
cbeoo was the stake,, the flamo, and the good man m 
iiL 

Mow the reason why Diabolus so soon rallied 
another force after he had been beaten out of the 
field,, was, for that be put mighty confidence in this 
xcmyof Blood-men, for he put a great deal of 
Mcore trust in them than he did before in his army of 
Ushbtbrs, though they had also often done great 
aKv&c* for him in the strengthening of him in his 
lingdom, But those Blood-men he had often 
provee!, .and their sword seldom returned empty. 
Besides, he knew that these like mastiffs, would fast- 
.«» upon any ; upon father, mother, brother, sister, 
prince, or governor, yea upon the Prince of princes, 
Mn& that which encouraged him the more was, for 
that they once forced Emanuel out of the kingdom 
®rf Universe ; and why, thought he, may they 
w.&4 drive him from the town ©f Mansoul ? 

So'ihis army, Hve-and-twenfy thoussand strong, 
mas hy their general, the lord Incredulity, led 



*Thea one of the twelve, called Judas Iscariot, wenstlnito the 
cMef priests, and saM unto tkem. What will ye give me, and I 
■will deliver him ante yoti ? And they coyenanted with him for 
tMrty pieces- rf salve*. And from that time he sought opportu- 
nity to betray hue. Mat. xzviL 14. 15, l&. 



ROI.Y WAR. 

The tcvrn sumiDODcd. 



up against the town of Mansoll. No\* 
Pkywel, the scout-master-gejieral, went out to spy, 
and he brought Mansoul tidings of their c> 
Wherefore they shut up their gates, and put 
selves into a postuie of defence against these nzw 
Diabolonians that came up against the town. 

So Diabolus brought up his array, and belea- 
guered the town of Mansoul ; the Doubt &&• 
were placed about Feel-gate, and the Blood- 
men set down before Eye-gate, and Ear-gate, 

Now when this army had thus encamped them- 
selves, Incredulity, in the name of Diabolus, 
in his own name, and in the name of the Blooey- 
men, and the rest that were with him, sent a sum- 
mons as hot as a sed hot iron to Mansoul, to yield 
to their demands, threatening, that if they still stood 
it out against them^ they would presently burn down 
Mansoul with fire. For you must know, that $s 
for the Rloor-men, they were not so much that 
Mansoul should be surrendered, as that Man- 
soul should be destroyed, and cut off out of the 
land of the living.* True, they sent them to surren- 
der ; but should they so do, that would not quench 
(he thirst of these men ; tbfey must have bloody ibe 
blood of Mansoul, else they die ; and it is from 
thence that they have their name. Wherefore these 
Blood-men he reserved while now, that they might, 



* Their feet run to evil, a6d they make haste to shad iaitioceajt 
blood, their thoughts are thoughts ol* iniquity ; vrastiag aad d<*. 
etruction are ia their path*. Isa. Ux. 7. 



S52 HOLY WAT?. 



Apply to Chkist in danger. 



when all engines proved ineffectual ; as his last and 
sure card,, be played against the town of Man- 
soul. 

Now when the townsmen had received this red- 
hot summons, it begat in thcrri at present some 
changing and interchanging thoughts ; but they 
jointly agreed in less than half an hour, to carry the 
summons to the Prince, which they did when they 
writ at the bottom of it, ' Lord,, save Mansoul 
* from bloody men/ 

So he took it, and looked upon it, and considered 
it, and took notice also of that short petition that 
the men of Mansoul had written at the bottom of 
it, and called unto him the noble captain Credence^ 
aud bid him go and take captain Patience with 
him, and go and take care of that side of Mansoul. 
that was beleaguered by the Blood-men.* So they 
went and did as they were commanded ; then cap- 
tain Credence went and took captain Patience, 
and they both secured that side of Mansoul that 
was besieged by the Blood-men. 

Then he commanded that captain Good-hope 
and captain Charity, and my lord Will-be-will 
should take charge of the other side of the town ; 
and I, said the Frince, will set up my standard upon 
the battlements of your castle, and do you three 
watch against the Doubters. This dune he again 



* That ye be not slothful, but followers of them who through 
faith and patience inherit the promises. And so after he had^ 
patiootly endured, he obtained the promise. Heb. vi« 12,15* 



HOLY WAR. 353 



Christ's orders to secure the soul. 



commanded that the brave captain Experience 
should draw up his men in the market-place, and 
that there also he should exercise them day by day 
before the people of the town of Mansoul. Now 
the seige Mas long, and many a fierce attempt did 
the enemy, especially those called Blood-men, 
make upon the town of Mansoul, and many .a 
shrewd brush did some of the townsmen meet with 
from them ; especially captain Self-denial ; who, 
I should have told you before, was commanded to 
take the care of Ear-gate and Eye-gate now 
against the Blood-men. This captain Self-de- 
nial was a young man, but stout, and a townsman 
in Mansoul, as captain Experience also was; 
and Emanuel at his second return to Mansoul, 
made him a captain over a thousand of the Man- 
soulians, for the good of the corporation. This 
captain, therefore, being an hardy man, a man of 
great courage, and willing to venture himself for 
the good of the town of Mansoul, would now and 
then salh out upon the Blood-men, and give theni 
many notable alarms, and had several skirmishes 
with them, and also did some execution upon them ; 
yet ou must think that this could not easily be 
done, but he must meet with brushes himself, for 
he carried several ot their marks in his face ; yea, 
and some in other parts of his body. 

So after gome time spent for the trial of the faith, 

hope and love of the town of Mansoul, the Prince 

Emanuel upon a day calls his captains and men of 

was together, and divides them into two companies ; 

% Y 



154 HOLY WAR. 



Directions for the battle. 



this done, he commands them at the time appointed, 
and that in the morning very early, to~ sally out 
upon the enemy ; saying, ' Let half of you fall tip- 
' on the Doubters, and half of you fall upon the 
f Blood-men. Those of you that go out against 
4 the Doubters, kill and slay, and cause to perish 
'so many of them as by any means you can lay 
' hands on ; but for you that go out against the 
' .Blood-men, slay them not, but take then* 
' alive/ 

Accordingly at the time appointed, betimes in the 
morning, the captains went out as they were com- 
manded against the enemies : captain Good-- hope, 
captain Charity, and those that were joined with 
them, as captain Innocent, and captain Experi- 
ence, went out against the Doubters : and cap- 
tain Credence and captain Patience, with cap- 
tain Self-denial, and the rest that were to join 
with them, went out against the Blood- men. 

Now those that went out against the Doubters, 
drew up in a body before the plain, and marched 
on to win the battle : but the Doubters, remember- 
ing their last success, made a retreat, not daring to 
stand the shock, but fled from the Prince's men : 
wherefore they pursued them, and in their pursuit 
slew many, but they could not catch them all. Now 
those that escaped went some of them home ; and 
the rest, by fives, nines, and seventeens, like wan- 
derers, went straggling up and down the country, 
where they shewed and exercised many of their 
Diabolsnian actions upon the barbarous people; 



HOLY WAR. 355 



The result of Hie bailie. 



nor did these people rise up in arms against them, 
but suffered themselves to be enslaved by them. 
They would also after -this shew themselves in com- 
panies before the town of Mansoul, hut never to 
abide it ; for if captain Credence, captain Good- 
hope, or captain Experience did but shew them- 
selves they (led. 

Those that were against the Blood-men, did as 
they were commanded ; they forebore to slay any, 
but sought to compass them about. But the Blood- 
men, when they saw that no Emanuel was in the 
field, concluded also that no Emanuel was in 
Mansoul; wherefore they looked upon what the 
captains did, to be, as they called it, a fruit of the 
extravagancy of their wild and foolish fancies, rather 
despised than feared them : but the captains, mind- 
ing their business, at last compassed them round ; 
they also that bad routed the Doubters, came m 
amain to their aid ; so in tine, after some struggling 
(for the Blood-men also would have run for it, 
only now it was too late ; for though they are mis- 
ci?.ievous and cruel when they can overcome, yet 
all Blood-men are chicken-hearted men, when 
they once come to see themselves matched and 
equalled,) so, I say, the captains took them, and 
brought them to the Prince. 

o 

N">w when they were taken, had before the Prince, 
arid examined, he found them to be of three sever 
ral counties, though they all came out of one 
land. 

1. One sort of them come out of Blindman- 



HOLY WAR. 



The Blood-men's conduct and residence described. 

shire, and they w ere such as did ignorantly what 
they did. 

2. Another sort of them -came out of Blind- 
Kealshire, and they did superstitiously what they 
did. 

S. The third sort of them came out of the town 
of Malice, in the county of Envy, and they did 
what they did out of spite and implacableness. 

For the first of these, to wit, they that came out 
of Blindmansiiire, when they saw where they 
were, and against whom they had fought, trembled, 
and cried as they stood before him ; and as many 
of -those as asked him mercy, he touched their lips 
with his golden sceptre. 

They that came out of Blindzealshire, did 
riot as their fellows, for they pleaded that they had 
a right to do what they did, because Mansoul was 
a town whose laws and customs were diverse from 
all that dwelt thereabouts ; very few of these could 
be brought to see their evil, but those that did and 
asked mercy, they also obtained favour. 

Now they that came out of the town of Malice, 
that is in the county of Envy, they neither wept 
nor disputed, but stood gnawing of their tongues 
before him for anguish and madness, because they 
could not have their will upon Mansoul. Now 
those last, with all those of the other two sorts that 
unfeignedly asked pardon for their faults ; those he 
made to enter into sufficient bond to answer for 
what they had done against Mansoul, and against 
her King, at the great and general assizes to b© 



HOLY WAR. 357 



Doners still cr, 



holden for our Lord the Kins:, where be himself 
should appoint for the country and kingdom of 

Universe. So they became bound each man f r 
himself to come in when called upon, to answer be- 
fore our Lord the King for what they had done be- 
fore. 

And thus much concerning this second army 
that was sent by Diabolus to overthrow Man- 
soul. 

But there were three of those that came from the 
land of Doubting., who, after they had wandered and 
ranged the country awhile, and perceived that they 
had escaped, were so hardy as to thrust themselves, 
knowing that yet there were in the town some who 
took part with Diabolus, I say, they were so hardy 
as to thrust themselves into Mansoul among them. 
(Three did I say ? I think there were four. ) Now 
to whose house should these Diabolonian Dot et- 
jers go but to the houseof an old Diabolonun in 
Mansm l, whose name was Evil-questioning ? 
a very great enemy he was to Mansoul, and a 
great doer among the Diabolonians there. Well 
to this Evil-questioning's house, as was said, 
did these Diabolonians come (you may be sure 
that they had directions how to find their way 
thither,) so he made them welcome, pitied their 
misfortune, and succoured them with the best he 
had in his house. Now after a little acquaintance, 
and it was not long before they had that, this Evil- 
questioning asked the Doubters if they were all 
©f a town, he knew that they were all of one king- 



358 HOLY WAR. 



IScR^nnriiTY Satan's best servant. 

dom, and they answered, No, nor of one shire nei- 
ther ; for I, said one, am an Election-Doubter ; 
I, said another, am a Vocation-Doubter ; then 
said the third, I am a Salvalion-Doubter ; and 
the fourth said he was a Grace-Doubter. Well, 
quoth the old gentleman, be of what shire 3011 well, 
I am persuaded that you are town-boys, you have 
the very length of my foot, are one with my heart, 
and shall be welcome to me. So they thanked him, 
and were glad that tfeey had found themselves an 
harbour in Mansoul. Then said Evil-question- 
ing to them, How many of your company might 
there be that came with you to the siege of Man- 
eoul ? And they answered, That there were but 
ten thousand Doubters in all, for the rest of the 
army consisted of fifteen thousand Blood-men : 
these Blood- men, quoth they, border upon our 
country : but, poor men, we hear, they were every 
cue t^ken by Emanuel's forces. Ten thousand ! 
quoth the old gentleman, I'll promise you that's a 
round company. But how came it to pass, since you 
were so mighty a number, that you fainted and 
durst not fight your foes ? Our general said they, 
was the first man that ran for it. Pray, quoth their 
landlord, who was that your cowardly general ? He 
was once the lord-mayor of Mansoul, said they. 
But pray call him not a cowardly general, for whe- 
ther any from the east to the west has done more ser- 
vice for our prince Diaeolus, than has my lord In- 
credulity, will be a bard question for you to an- 
swer. But, had they catched him, they would fof 



HOLY WAR. 3.59 



K.SATION overhear:! by Diligence. 



certain have hanged him, and we promise 30 u hang- 
ing is but a bad business. 

Then said the old gentleman, I would that all the 
ten thousand Doubters were now all well armed in 
Mansoul, and myself at the head of them, I would 
see what 1 could do. Ah, said they, that would be 
well, if we could see that : but wishes, aias ! what 
are they ? Aud these words were spoken aloud. 
Well, said old Evil-questioning, take heed that 
ye talk not too loud, you must be quiet aud close, 
and must take care of yourselves while you are here,, 
or I will assure you, you will be snapt. 

Why ? quoth the Doubters. 

Why ? quoth the old gentleman : why, because 
both the Prince and lord Secretary, and their cap- 
tains and soldiers, are all at present in town : yea, 
the town is as full of them as it can hold Aud be- 
sides, there is one whose name is Will-be-will, 
a most cruel enemy of ours, and him the Prince 
hath made keeper of the gates, and has commanded 
him, that with all the diligence he can, he should 
look for, search out, and destroy all and all manner 
of Diabolonians. Aud if lie lighteth upon you, 
-down you go, though your heads be made of 
gold. 

And now, to see how it happened, one of the iord 
Will-be-will's faithful soldiers, whose name was 
Mr. DrLiGENCE, stood all the while listening un- 
der old Evil-questioning's eaves, and heard all 
the talk that had been betwixt him and the Doubt- 
jSp.s that he entertained under his roof. This soldier 



S60 HOLY WAR. 



Diligence searcheth out sins. 



wr.s a man that my lord bad much confidence in, 
and that he loved dearly, and that both because he 
was a man of courage, and also a man that was un- 
wearied in seeking after Diabolonians to appre- 
hend them. 

Now this man, as I told you, heard s all the talk 
that was between old Evil-questioning and these 
Diabolonians ; wherefore what does he, but goes 
to his lord, and tells him what he had heard. And 
say est thou so, my trusty ? quoth my lord. Ay, 
quoth Diligence, that I do, and if your lordship 
will be pleased to go with me, you shall find it as I 
have said. And are they there ? quoth my lord, 
1 know Evil-questioning well, for he and I were 
great at the time of our apostacy ; but know not 
now where he dwells. But I do, said this man, and 
if your lordship will go, I will lead you the way to 
his den. Go ! quoth my lord, that I will. Come, 
my Diligence, let us go find them out. So my 
lord and his man went together the direct way to 
his house. Now this man went before to shew him 
the way, and they went till they came even under 
old Mr. Evil-questioning's wall. Then said 
Diligence, Hark, my lord, do you know the old 
gentleman's tongue v. hen you hear it ? . Yes said 
my lord I know it well, but I have not seen him 
many &i$&y. This I know, he is cunning £ wish he 
may not give us the slip. Let me alone for that, 
said his servant Diligence. But how shall we 
find the door ? quoth my lord. Let me alone for 
that too, said his man. So he had my lord Will- 



HOLT WAR. 361 



■ 



be-will about, and shewed bira the way to the 
door. Then my lord, without more ado, broke 
open the door, rushed into the house, *nd caught 
them all five together, even a* Diligence his man 
had told him. So my lord apprehended them, and 
led them away, and committed them to the hand of 
Mr. Trueman the gaoler, and he commanded and 
put them in ward. This done, my loid-mayor was 
acquainted in the morning with what my lord Will- 
be-wtll had done over night, and his lordship re- 
joiced much at the news, not only because there 
were Doubters apprehended, hut because that old 
Evil-questioning was taken ; for he had been a 
very great trouble to Mansoul, and much affliction 
to my lord mayor himself. He had also been sought 
for often, but no hand could ever be laid on him 
till now. 

Well, the next thing w T as, to make preparations 
to try these five that by my lord had been appre- 
hended, and that were in the hands of Mr. Trui.- 
man the gaoler. So the day was set, and the 
court called and came together, and the prisoners 
brought to the bar. My lord Wi ll-be-will had 
power to have slain them when first lie took them, 
and that without any more ado, but he thought it at 
this time more for the honour of the Prince, the 
comfort of Man soul, and the discouragement of 
the enemy, to bring them forth to public Judgment. 
But I say, Mr. Trueman brought them in chains 
to the bar, to the town-hall, for that was the place 
of judgment. So to be short, the jury was panrtel 
2z 



362 HOLY WAR. 



Tria). of Etil-questioning. 



led, the witnesses sworn, and the prisoners tried for 
their lives ; the jury was the same that tried Mr. 
No-truth, Pitiless, Haughty, and the rest of 
their companions. 

And first, old Evil-questioning himself was 
set to the bar ; for he was the receiver, the enter- 
tainer, and comforter of these Doubters, that by 
nation were outlandish men ; and he was bid to 
hearken to his charge, and was told that he had li- 
berty to object, if he had aught to say for himself. 
So his indictment was read, the manner and form 
here follows : 

' Mr. Questioning, thou art here indicted by 
' the name of Evil-questioning, an intruder up- 
' on the town of Mansoul, for that thou art a Dr- 
' abolonian by nature, and also a hater of the 
' Prince Emanuel, and one that hast studied the 
" ruin of Mansoul. Thou art also here indicted, 
' for entertaining the King's enemies, after whole- 
' some laws made to the contrary : for, 

' 1. Thou hast questioned the truth of her doc- 

* trine and state. 

' 2. In wishing that ten thousand Doubters 
' were in her. In receiving, entertaining, and en- 
' couraging of her enemies, that came from their 
•' arm) unto thee. What gayest thou to this indict- 

* inent ? Art thou guilty, or not guilty ?' 

' My lord, (quoth he) I know not the meaning of 

* this indictment, forasmuch as I am not the man 
'concerned in it; the man that standeth by this 
' charge accused before this bench, is called by the 



HOLY WAR. 365 



The eTidencc. 



' name of Evil-questioning, which name I deny 
'to be mine, mine being Hv)nest-inquiring. 

■ The one indeed sounds like the other, but I trow 
' jour loTdships know that between these two there 
' is a wide difference : for I hope that a man, even 

■ in the worst of times, and that too amongst the 
f worst of men, may make an honest inquiry after 
' things, without running the danger of death/ 

Then spake my lord Will-be-will, for he was 
one of the. witnesses : ' My lord, and you the ho~ 
' nourable bench and magistrates of the town of 
f Mansoul, you all have heard with their ears, 
' that the prisoner at the bar has denied his name, 
c and so thinks to shift from the charge of the in- 
c dictment. But I know him to be the man con- 
' cerned, and that his proper name is Evtl-ques- 
c tioning. I have known him, my lord, above 
r these thirty years, for he and I (a shame it is for 

■ me to speak it) were great acquaintance, whea 
' DrABOLiis that tyrant had the government of 
* Mansoul ; and I testify that he is a Biabolo- 
' nian by nature, an enemy to our Prince, and an 
r hater of the blessed town of Mansoul. He has 
' in times of rebellion been at, and laid in my house, 
c my lord, not so little as twenty nights together. 
' and we used to talk then ( for the substance of talk ) 
' as he and his Doubters have talked of late. 
' True, I have not seen him many a day, I suppose 
' that the coming of Emanuel to Mansoul has 
' made him change his lodgings, as this indictment 



m HOLY WAR. 



Evidence of Diligence. 



•' has driven him to change his name ; but this is the 
f raanj my lord.' 

Then said the court unto him, Hast thou any more 
to say ? 

* Yes, ( quoth the old gentleman ) that I have ; 
' for all that has yet been said against me, is but 
' by the mouth of one witness, and it is not lawful 
' for the famous town of Mansoul, at the mouth of 

* one witness, to put any man to death.' 

Then stood forth Mr. Diligence, and said, 
' My lord, as I was upon my watch such a night at 
'the bead of Bad-street, in this town, I chanced to 
' hear a muttering within the gentleman's house; 
' then thought I, What's to do here ? So I went 
' up close, but very softly, to the side of the house to 
' listen, thinking, as indeed it fell out, that there I 
' might light of some Diabolonian conventicle. 
,' So, as I said, I drew nearer and nearer, and when 

* I was got up close to the wall, it was but a while 
'before I perceived that there were outlandish men 
' in the house, but I understood their speech, for 
' I have been a traveller myself: now hearing such 
' language in such a tottering cottage this old gentle- 

* man dwelt in, I clapt mine ear to a hole in the 
4 window, and there heard them talk as followeth. 
' This old Mr. Questioning asked these' Doubt- 
' ep.s what they were, whence they came, and what 
' was their business in these parts ? And they an- 

* swered him to all these questions, yet he enter- 
' tained them. He also asked what numbers there 



HOLY WAR. 365 



A defence. 



f were of them ; and they told him, ten thousand 
' men. He then asked them why they made no 
( more manly assault upon Mansoul ? and they. 
r told him. So he called their general coward for 

* marching' off when he should have fought for his 
r prince. Further, this old EvrL-QUESTioxnvG 

* wished, and I heard him wish, Would all the ten 

* thousand Doubtebs were now in Mans oul, and 
' himself at the head of them ! He bid them also 
' take heed and lie quiet; for if they were taken 
' they must die, although they had heads of gold.' 

Then said the court, Mr. ' Evil-questioning, 
' here is now another witness against you, and this 
f testimony is full.' 

( 1. He swears that you have received these men 
■ into your house, and that you nourished them 

* there, though you knew that they were Diabolo- 
e nians, and the King's enemies/ 

' 2. He swears that you wished ten thousand of 
s them in Mansoul.' 

e 3. He swears that you gave them advice to be 
' quiet and close, lest they were taken by the 

* King's servants. All which manifesteth that thou 

* art a Diabolonian; but hadst thou been a 
' friend to the King, thou wouldst have apprehended 
' them.' 

Then said Evil-qjuestioning, To the first of 
these I answer, The men that came into mine house 
■were strangers, and I took them in ; and is it now 
become a crime in Mansoul for a man to entertain 
iirangers ? That I also nourished thern, is true ; 



SG6 HOLY WAR. 



Election-Doubter trier!. 



and why should my charity be blamed ? As for the 
reason why I wished tea thousand of them in Man- 
soul, I never told it to the witnesses, nor to them- 
selves, i might wish them to be taken, and so rny 
wish might mean well to Mansoul, for aught that 
any yet knows. I also bid them take heed that they 
fell not into the captain's hands, but that might be 
because I am unwilling that any man should be slain, 
and not because I would have the king's enemies, 
as such, escape. 

My lord mayor then replied, ' That though it 
c was a virtue to entertain strangers, yet it was trea- 
' son to entertain the king's enemies. And for 
' what else thou hast said, thou dost by words but 

* labour to evade, and defer the execution of judg- 

* merit. Hut could there be no more proved against 

* thee but that thou art a Biabolonian, thou 
c must for that die the death by the law ; but to be 
e a receiver, a nourisher, a countenancer, and a 

* barbourer of others of them, yea, of outlandish 
r Diabolonians ; yea, of them that came from 

* far, on purpose to cut off and destroy our Man- 
f soul ; this must not be borne.' 

Then said Evil-questioning, I see how the 
game will go. I must die for my name, and for my 
charity. And so held his peace. 

Then they called the outlandish Doubters to 
the bar, and the first of them that was arraigned, 
was the Election-Doubter ; so his indictment 
was read, and because he was an outlandish man, 
thesubstajice of it was toki to him by an interpreter; 



HOLY WAR. 



Vocation-Doubter tried. 



to wit, ' That he was there charged with be ii 
' enemy ( to Emanuel the Prince, a hater of the 
f town of Mansoul, and an op poser of her most 
* wholesome doctrine/ 

Then the judge asked him if he would plead? 
but he said only this, ' That he confessed that he 
c was an Election-Doubter, and that that was 
' the religion that he had ever been brought up 
c in. And said moreover, If I must die for my re- 
■ ligion, I trow, I shall die a martyr, and so I care 
r the less/ 

Then the judge replied. To question ejection is 
to overthrow a great doctrine of the gospel ; to wit, 
the omniscience, and power, and wilt of God, to 
take away the liberty of God with his creature, t-) 
6tumble the faith of the town of Mansoul, and to 
make salvation to depend upon works and not upon 
grace. It also belied the word, and disquieted th@ 
minds of the men of Mansoul,, therefore by the 
be.^t of laws he must die. 

Then was the Vocation-Doubter culled, and 
set to the bar ; and his indictment for substance wag 
the same with the other, only he was particularly 
charged with denying the calling of Mansoul. 

The judge asked him also what he had to say for 
himself ? 

So he replied, c That he never believed that 
' there wa? any such thing as a distinct and power- 
' ful call of (Mod to Mansoul,, otherwise than by 
' the general voice of the svord, nor by that neither, 
c otherwise than. as it exhorted them to forbear evil, 



HOLY WAR. 



Grace-Doubter tried. 



* and do to that which is goed, and in so doing ft 
e promise of happiness is annexed/ 

Then said the judge, Thou art a Diabolonian, 
and hast denied a great part of one of the most ex- 
perimental truths of the Prince of the town of Man- 
soul ; for he has called, and she has heard a most 
distinct and powerful call of her Emanukl, by 
which she has been quickened, awakened, and pos- 
sessed with heavenly grace to desire to have com- 
munion with her Prince, to serve him, and to do 
his will, and to look for happiness merely of his 
good pleasure. And for thine abhorrence of this 
good doctrine, thou must die the death. 

Then the Grace-Doubter wa? called, and his 
indictment was read, and he replied thereto, That 
though he was of the land of Doubting, his father 
was the offspring of a Pharisee, and lived in good 
fashion among his neighbours, and that he taught 
them to believe (and believe I do, and will) that 
Mansoul shall never be saved freely by grace. 

Then said the judge, Why, the law of the Prince 
is plain ; Negatively, " not of works 5 ' (Rom. iii.) 
2. Positively, " By grace you are saved." ( Eph. ii. ) 
And thy religion settleth in and upon the works of 
the flesh. For the works of *he law are the works of 
the flesh. Besides, in saying, " Thou hast done," 
thou hast robbed God of his glory, and given it to 
a sinful man : thou hast robbed Christ of the ne- 
cessity of his undertaking, and the sufficiency there- 
of, and bast given both these to the works of the 
flesh. Thou hast despised the works of the Holy 



HOLY WAR. S69 



Sentence against sinful doubU. 



Ghost, and ha'i. magnified the will of the flesh and 
of the legal mind. Thou art a Diabolonian, the 
son of a Diaboloniav ; and for thy Djaeoloni- 
an principles thou must die. 

The court then having- proceeded thus far with 
them sent out the jury, who forthwith brought them 
in guilty of death. Then stood up the recorder, 
and addressed himself to the prisoners : ' You the 

* prisoners at the bar, you have been here indicted 

* and proved guilty of high crimes against Em anuex. 
' our Prince., and against the welfare of the famous 
' town of Mansoul : crimes for which ye must be 
' put to death ; and die ye accordingly/ 

So they were sentenced to the death of the cross : 
the place assigned them for execution was that 
were Diabolus drew up his last army against 
Mansoul; save only that old Evil-questioning 
was hanged at the top of Bio-street, just over- 
against his own door. 

When the town of Mansoul had thus far rid 
themselves of their enemies, and of the troublersof 
their peace, in the next place a strict commandment 
was given out, that yet my lord Will-be-will 
should, with Diligence his man, search for, and 
do his best to apprehend what town Diabolonians 
were yet alive in Mansoul. The names of several 
of them were Mr. Fooling, Mr. Let-goo d-slip, 
Mr. Slavish-fear, Mr. No-love^ Mr. Mistrust, 
Mr. Flesh, and Mr. Sloth. It was also com- 
manded that he should apprehend Mr. Evil- 
questioning's children that he left behind hirr«, 
3 A 



370 HOLY WAR. 



Sins to be carefully found out. 



and that they should demolish his house there ; 
Mr. Doubt was his eldest son ; the next to him 
was Legal-life, Unbelief,, Wrong-thoughts- 
of-Christ, Clip-promise., Carnal-sense, Live- 
by-feel, Self-love. All these he had by one 
wife, and her name was No-hope, she was the kins- 
woman of old Incredulity, for he was her. uncle, 
and when her father old Dark was dead, he took 
her and brought her up, and when she was mar- 
riageable, he gave her to this old Evil-question- 
ing to wife. 

Now the lord Will-be-will put into execution 
his commission, with great Diligence his man. He 
took Fooling in the streets, and hanged him up in 
WANT-wrr-alley, over against his own house. Thiis 
fooling was he that would have had the town of 
Mansoul deliver up captain Credence into the 
hands of Diabolus, provided that then he would 
have withdrawn his forces out of the town : he alse 
took Mr. Let-good-slip one day as he was busy 
is the market, and executed him according to law. 
Now there was an honest poor man in Mansoul, 
and his name was Mr. Meditation and one of 
no great account in the days of apostasy ; but now 
of repute with the best of the town. This man 
therefore they were willing to prefer. Now Mr. 
Let-good-slip had a great deal of wealth hereto- 
fore in Mansoul, and at Emanuel's coming it 
was sequestered to the use of the Prince; this 
therefore was now given to Mr. Meditation to 
improve for the common good, and after him to bis 



HOLY WAR. S7I 



Other criminals detected. 



son Mr. Think-well ; this Think-well he had 
by Mrs. Piety his wife, and she was the daughter 
of Mr. Reeorder. 

After this mv lord apprehended Clip-promise ; 
now because he was a notorios villain, for by his 
doings much of the King's coin was abused, there- 
fore he was made a public example. He was ar- 
raigned, and adjudged to be first set in the pillory, 
and then to be whipped by all the children and ser- 
vants in Mansoul, and then to be hanged till he 
was dead. Some may wonder at the severity of this 
man's punishment, but they that are honest traders 
in Mansoul, are sensible of the great abuse that 
one Clipper of promises in little time may do to the 
town of Mansoul. And truly my judgment is, 
that all those of his name and life should be served 
even as he. 

He also apprehended Carnal-sense, and put 
him in hold ; but how it came about I cannot tell, 
but he broke prison and made his escape. Yea, 
and the bold villain will not yet quit the town, but 
lurks in the Diabolonian dens a-days, and haunts 
like a ghost honest men's houses a-nights. Where- 
fore there was a proclamation set up in the market- 
place in Mansoul, signifying, that whosoever 
could discover Carnal-sense, and apprehend him 
and slay him, should be admitted daily to the Prince's 
table, and should be made keeper of the treasure of 
Mansoul. Many therefore bent themselves to do 
this thing ; but take him and slay him they could 
i\pL though he was often discovered. But my lord 



HOLY WAR. 



Self-love destroyed. 



took Mr. Wrong-thoughts-of-Christ, and put 
him in prison, and he died of a lingering consump- 
tion. 

Self-love was also taken and committed to cus- 
tody, but there were many that were allied to him 
in Mansoul, so his judgment was deferred ; 
but at last Mr. Self-denial stood up, and said, 
If such villains as these may be winked at in Man- 
soul, I will lay down my commission. He also 
took him from the crowd, and had him among his 
soldiers, and there was brained. But some in Man- 
soul muttered at it, though none durst speak plain- 
ly because Emanuel was in the town. But this 
brave act of captain Self-denial came to the 
Prince's ears, so he sent for him, and made him a 
lord in Mansoul. My lord Will-be-will also 
obtained great commendation from Emanuel for 
what he had done for the town of Mansoul. 

Then my lord Self-denial took courage, and 
set to the pursuing of the Diabolonians with my 
lord Will-be-will; and they took Live-by- 
feeling, and they took Legal- life, and put them 
in hold till they died. But Mr. Unbelief was a 
nimble jack, him they could never lay hold of, 
though the} r attempted to do it often. He there- 
fore, and some of the subtlest of the Diaboloni- 
an tribe, yet remained in Mansoul, to the time 
that Mansoul left off to dwell any longer in the 
kingdom of Universe but they kept them to 
their dens and holes ; if one of them appeared, or 
happened to be seen in one of the streets of the towa 



HOLY WAR. 373 



Sins destroyed produce peace. 



of Mansoul, the whole town would be up in arras 
after them, yea, the very children in Man soul 
would cry out after them as after a thief, and would 
wish that they might stone them to death with 
stones. And now Mansoul arrived to some good 
degree of peace and quiet, her Prince also abode 
within her borders, her captains also, and her soldiers 
did their duties, and Mansoul minded the trade 
that she had with the country afar off; also she 
was busy in her manufacture.* 

When the town of Mansoul had thus far rid 
themselves of so many of their enemies, and the 
troublers of their peace; the Prince sent to them, 
and appointed a day wherein he would meet the 
whole people at the market-place, and there give 
them in charge concerning the future matters, that, 
if observed, would tend to their farther safety and 
comfort, and to the condemnation and destruction 
of their home-bred Diabolonians. So the day 
appointed was come, and the townsmen met to- 
gether ; Emanuel also came down in his chariot, 
and all his captains in their state attending of him on 
the right-hand and on the left. Then was an O- 
yes made for silence and after some mutual 
carriages of love, the Prince began, and thus pro- 
ceeded : 

' You, my Mansoul, and the beloved of mine 

* Thine eves shall see the king in his beauty : they shall behold 
the lam! that is very far off. Isa. xxxiii. 17. For our conversa- 
tion is in heaven, from whence also we look for the Saviour, the 
Lord Jesus Christ, Phil, in, 20. 



374 HOLY WAR. 



Christ's love to the soul. 



e heart, many and great are the privileges that I 
' have bestowed upon you ; I have singled you out 
S from others, and have chosen you to myself, 

* not for your worthiness, but for mine own sake. 
' I have also redeemed you, not only from the 
' dread of my Father's law, but from the hand of 
' Diabolus. This I have done because I loved 
' you, and because I have set my heart upon you 

* to do you good. I have also, that all things that 
f might hinder thy way to the pleasures of Para- 
' dise might be taken out of the way. laid down 
f for thee, for thy soul, a plenary satisfaction, and 
i have bought thee for myself; a price not of cor- 

* ruptible things, as of silver and gold, but -a price of 
5 blood, mine own blood, which. I have freely spilt 
e upon the ground to make thee mine. So I have 
f reconciled thee, O my Mansoul, to my Father, 
1 and intrusted thee in the mansion-houses that are 
\ with my Father in the royal city, where things are, 
f O my Mansoul, that eye hath not seen, nor hath 
r entered into the heart of man to conceive. 

c Besides, O my Mansoul, thou seest what ' I 
f have done, and how I have taken thee out of the 

* hand of thine enemies ; unto whom thou hast deep- 
f ly revolted from my Father, and by whom thou 
e wast content to be possessed, and also to be des- 

* troyed. I came to thee first by my law, then by my 
c gospel, to awaken thee, and shew thee m> glory. 
■ And thou knowest. what thou wast, what thou 
( saidst, what thou didst, and how many times thou 
? rebelledst against my Father and nie ; yet I left 



HOLY WAR. 575 



Salvation through Christ. 



.;<>t, as tliou seest this day, but came to thee, 
have borne thy manners, have wailed upon ihee, 
and after all,, accepted of thee even of my mere 
grace and favour ; and would not suffer thee to 
be lost, as thou wouldst most willingly have been. 
I also compassed thee about, afflicted thee on 
every side, that I might make thee weary of thy 
ways, and bring down thy heart, with molestation 
to a willingness to close with thy good and happi- 
ness. And when I had gotten a complete con- 
quest over thee, I turned it to thy advantage. 
' Thou seest also what a company of myFather's 
host I have lodged within thy borders, captains 
and rulers, soldiers, men of war, engines and ex- 
cellent devices, to subdue and bring down thy 
foes; thou knowest my meaning, O Mansoul. 
And they are my servants and thine too, Man- 
soul. Yea, my design of possessing of thee with 
them, and the natural tendency of each of them, 
is to defend, purge, strengthen, and sweeten thee 
for myself, O Mansoul, and to make thee meet 
for my Father's presence, blessing, and glory; for 
thou my Mansoul, art created to be prepared un- 
to these. 

' Thou seest moreover, my Mansoul, how I 
have passed by thy backsliding, and have healed 
thee. Indeed I was angry with thee, but 1 have 
turned away mine anger, and mine indignation is 
ceased in the destruction of thine enemies, O 
Mansoul. Nor did thy -goodness fetch me again 
unto thee, after that I for thy transgressions had 



S76 HOLY WAR. 



Promise of a resurrection. 



hid my face, and withdrawn my presence from thee. 
The way of backsliding was thine,, but the way and 
means of recovery was mine. I invented the 
means of thy return ; it is I that made an hedge 
and a wall, when thou wast beginning to turn to 
things in which I delighted not. It was I that 
mad.e thy sweet bitter, thy day night, thy smooth 
way thorny,and that also confounded all that sought 
thy destruction. It was I that set Mr. Godly- 
fear to work in Mansoul. It was I that stirred 
up thy conscience and understanding, thy will 
and thy affections, after thy great and woful de- 
cay. It was I that put life into thee, O Mansoul, 
to seek me, that thou mightest find me, and in thy 
finding, find thine own health, happiness, and sal- 
vation. It was I that fetched the second time the 
Diabolonians out of Mansoul; it was I that 
overcame them and destroyed them before thy 
face. 

e And now, my Mansoul,, I am returned to thee 
in peace, and thy transgressions against me are as 
if they had not been. Nor shall it be with the® 
as in former days, but I will do better for thee than 
at thy beginning. For yet a little while, O my 
Mansoul, even after a few more times are gone 
over thy head, I will, but be not thou troubled at 
what I say, take down this famous town of Man- 
soul, stick and stone to the ground. And I will 
carry the stones thereof, and the timber thereof, 
and the walls thereof, and the dust thereof, and 
inhabitants thereof, into mine own country, even 



HOLY WAR. 37' 



Promisa of a resiirreGUoa. 



1 into the kingdom of my Father ; and I will there 
' set up in such strength and glory as it never did 
1 see in the kingdom where now it is placed. I 
' will even there set it up for my Father's habitation, 
c because for that purpose it was at first erected in 
f the kingdom of Universe ; and there will I make 
' it a spectacle of wonder, a monument of mercy. 
' There shall the natives of Mansoul see all that of 
' which they have seen nothing here ; there shall 
f they be equal to those unto whom the) have been 
r inferior here. And there shalt thou, O my Man* 
' soul, have such communion with me, with my 
' Father, and with your Lord Secretary, as is not 
' possible here to be enjoyed, nor .ever could be, 

* shouldest thou live in Universe the space of a 
' thousand years. 

' There, O my Mansoul, thou shalt be afraid 

* of murders no more; of Diabolonians nomore. 
' There shall be no more plots, nor contrivances, 
' nor designs against thee, O my Mansoul. There 
' thou shalt no more hear evil tidings, or the noise 
4 of the Diabolonian drum. There thou shalt 
f not see the Diabolonian standard-bearers, 
f nor yet behold Diabolus's standard. No Dr- 
' aboi.onian mount shall be cast up against thee 
' there, nor shall there the Diabolonian standard 
' beset up to make thee afraid. There thou shalt 
' meet with no sorrow nor giief, nor shall it be pos- 
f sible that any Diabolonian should again (for 

* ever) be able to creep into thv skirts, burrow in 

3 b " 



378 HOLY WAR. 



Happiness of heaven. 



thy walls, or to be seen within thy borders all the 
days of eternity. Life shall there last longer than 
here you are able to desire it should, and yet it 
shall always be sweet and new, nor shall any im- 
pediment attend it for ever. 

' There, O Mansoul, thou shalt meet with many 
of those that have been like thee, and that have 
been partakers of thy sorrows ; even su-ch as I 
have chosen and redeemed, and set apart, as thou 
for my Father's court and city royal. All they 
will be glad in thee : and thou, when thou seest 
them, shall be giad in thine heart. 
e There are things, O Mansoul, even things 
of thy Father's providing and mine, that never 
were seen since the beginning of the world, and 
they are laid up with my Father, and sealed 
up among his treasures for thee, till thou shait 
come hither to them. I told you before that I 
would remove my Mansoul, and set it up else- 
where ; and where I will set it, there are those 
that love thee, and those that rejoice in thee now, 
but much more when they see thee exalted to 
honour. My Father will then send them for you 
to fetch vou ; and their bosoms are chariots to 
put you in. And thou, O my Mansoul, shalt 
ride upon the wings of the wind.* They will 



* The chariots of God ave twenty thousand, even thousands of 
angels : the Lord is among them as in Sinai, in the holy place. 

psaiai IsYiii. ]?- 



HOLY WAR. 37<J 



The clothing of the saints. 



' come to convey, conduct, and bring you to that. 

* when your eyes see more, that will be your de- 
' sired haven. 

'■ And thus, O my Mansoul, I have shewed 
' unto thee, what shall be done to thee hereafter, if 
f thou canst understand ; and now I will tell thee 
'■ what at present! must be thy duty and practice, 
' until I shall come and fetch thee to myself, accord- 
' ing as it is related in the scriptures of truth. 

' First, I charge thee that thou dost hereafter 
' keep more white and clean the liveries which I 
' gave thee before my last withdrawing from thee, 
s Do it, I say, for this will be thy wisdom. They 

* are in themselves fine linen, but thou must keep 
' them white and clean. This will be your wisdom, 
f your honour, and will be greatly for my glory. 
' When your garments are white the world will 
1 count you mine. Also when your garments are 

* white, then I am delighted in your ways ; for then 
f your goings to and fro will be like a flash of light- 
( ning, that those that are present must take notice 
' of, also their eyes will be made to dazzle thereat. 
*. Deck thyself therefore according to my bidding, 

■ and make thyself by my law, straight steps for thy 
f feet, so shall thy King greatly desire thy beauty, 

■ for he is thy Lord and worship thou him. 

f Now that thou mayest keep them as I bid thee, 
' I have, as I before told thee, provided for thee an 

* open fountain to v ash thy garments in. Look 
' therefore that thou wash often in my fountain, and 

* go not in defiled garments ; for as it is to my dis- 



380 HOLY WAR. 



We should keep our garments clean. 



' honour, and my disgrace, so it will be to thy dis- 

* comfort, when thou shalt walk in filthy garments.* 
' Let not therefore my garments, your garments, 
f the garments that I gave thee, be defiled or spot- 
.' ted by the flesh. f Keep thy garments always 

* white, and let thy head lack no ointment. 

f My Mansoui, I have oft-times delivered thee 
' from the designs, plots, attempts, and conspiracies 
' of Diabolus, and for all this I ask thee nothing, 
'but that thou render not me evil for my good, but 

* that thou bear in mind my love, and the continua- 
' tion of my kindness to my beloved Mansoul, so 
J as to provoke thee to walk, in thy measure, ac- 
' cording to the benefit bestowed on thee, Of old 
f the sacrifices were bound with cords to the horns 
( of the golden altar. Consider what is said to 
f thee, O my blessed Mansoul. 

' O my Mansoul, I have lived, I have died ; I 
e live, and will die no more for thee ; I live, that 
' thou mayest not die. Because I live, thou shalt 
f live also.. I reconciled thee to my Father by the 
' blood of my cross, and being reconciled thou shalt 

* live through me. I will pray for thee, I will fight 

* for thee, I will yet 'do ijn^e £ood. 

* Now joshna was clothed with filthy garments, and stood be- 
fore the angel. And he answered, and spake unto those that stood 
before him, saying, lake away the filthy garments from him. And 
unto him he said, Behold, I have caused thine iniquity to pass from 
thee, and I will clothe thee with change of raiment. Zech. iii. 3, 4. 

f And others save with fear, pulling them m t of the fire ; hating 
even the garment spotted by the flesh judti 23 



HOLY WAR. 381 



Watchfulness recommended. 



' Nothing can hurt thee but sin, nothing can 
' grieve me but sin ; nothing can make thee base 
' before thy foes bu-t sin : take heed of sin, my 
' Man soul. 

' And dost thou know why I at first,, and do still 
' suffer Diaboloxiaxs to dwell within thy walls, 
' O Mansoul ? It is to keep thee waiting, to try 
' thy love., to make thee watchful, and to cause thee 
' yet to prize my noble captains, their soldiers, and 
' my mercy. 

' It is also that thou mayest be made to remem- 
' ber what a deplorable condition thou once wast in, 
' I mean when, not some, but all did dwell, not in 
' thy wall, but in thy castle, and in thy strong-hold, 
c O Mansoul. 

4 O my Mansoul, should I slay all them within, 
' many there be without that would bring thee into 
' bondage ; for were all these within cut off, those 
* without would find thee sleeping, and then as in a 
' moment they would swallow up my Mansoul. I 
' therefore left them in thee, not to do thee hurt 
' (the which they yet will, if thou hearken to them, 
f and serve them,) but. to do thee good, the which 
' they must, if thou watch and fight against them. 
' Know therefore, that whatever they shall tempt 
' thee to, my design is, that they should drive thee, 
' not further off, but nearer to my Father, to learn 
' thee war, to make petitioning desirable to thee, 
' and to make thee little in thine own eyes. Hear- 
' ken diligently to this, my Mansoul. 

' Shew ine then thy love, my Maxsoul, and let 



382 HOLY WAR. 



Exhortations. 



' not those that are within thy walls,, take thy af- 
' fections off from him that hath redeemed thy soul. 
5 Yea, let the sight of a Diabolonian heighten 
' thy love to me I came once and twice, and 
e thrice, to save thee from the poison of those ar- 

* rows that would have wrought thy death ; stand 
f for me, my friend, my Mansoul, against the 
' Diabolonians, and I will stand for thee before 

* my Father, and all his court. Love me against 
'temptation ; and I will love thee, notwithstanding 
' thine infirmities. 

' O my Mansoul, remember what my captains, 
' my soldiers, and mine engines have done for thee. 
f They have fought for thee, they have borne much 

* at thy hand to do thee good, O Mansoul. 
' Hadst thou not had them to help thee, Diabolus 
( had certainly made a hand of thee. Nourish 

* them therefore my Mansoul. When thou 
' dost well they will be well ; when thou dost 
' ill, they will be ill, and sick and weak. Make 
'not my captains sick, O Mansoul; for if they 
f .be sick, thou canst not be well ; if they be weak, 
f thou canst not be strong; if they be faint, thou 

* canst not be stout and valiant for thy King O 

* Mansoul. Nor must thou think always to live 
e by sense, thou must live upon my word. Thou 
f must believe, O my Mansoul, when I am for 

* thee, that yet I Love and bear thee upon mine heart 
' forever. 

( Remember therefore, O my Mansoul, that 
( thou art beloved of me : as I have therefore taught 



HOLY WAR. 383 



' thee to watch, to fight, to pray, and to make war 
' against ray foes, so now I command thee to believe 
' that my love is constant to thee, O my Mansoul, 
' now have I set my heart and love upon thee, 
' \^atch : " Behold 1 lay none other burden upon 
" thee than what thou hast already, hold fast till 
" I come/'aRev. ii. 24. 



THE END. 

